FOREST LIFE.
CHAPTER XXXII.
At his outset he was not what he became. * * * It is true there was
always a large stock of Individualitybut how many ideas, how many
sentiments, how many inclinations are changed in him!
Guizot.
A year
and a half had elapsed since the
abstraction
of the grapes, and the skin had grown over
Seymour's knuckles, and also the bark over certain
letters which he had carved in very high places on
some of Mr. Hay's forest-trees; and,
sympathetically
perhaps, a suitable covering over the wounds
made in his heart by the scornful eyes of the
unconscious
Caroline. His figure had changed its
proportions, as if by a wire-drawing process, since
what it had gained in length was evidently
subtracted
from its breadth. The potato redness of
his cheeks had subsided into a more presentable
complexion, and his teeth were whiter than ever,
while the yawns which used to exhibit them
unseasonably
had given place to a tolerable flow of
conversation, scarcely tinctured by
mauvaise honte
.
In short, considering that he was endowed with a
good share of common sense, he was really a
handsome
young man. Not but some moss was still
discoverable. It takes a good while to rub off
inborn rusticity, especially when there is much
force of character. The soft are more easily
moulded.
Seymour had spent this interval in the most
sedulous
application;such application as few young
men exhibit, except those who have been denied
the opportunity of acquiring knowledge until they
have learned to feel keenly their own deficiencies.
It was by such effort that he had managed to
make one year's time, under the best instruction in
one of our Western cities, do the work of three at
least; and the result was, that on his return home,
his father, a sturdy stickler for republican simplicity,
and one of that numerous class who think
republicans
ought to be rough and coarse, thought
Seymour
a leetle too slick for his liking. Not that
our young friend was the least of a dandy. What
he had seen of that sort during his city campaign
had but served to deepen that contempt for
effeminacy
which is the heritage of every true son of the
forest. But his manners were extremely quiet;
he no longer gave a certain twang to his parts of
speech, without which no language is considered
strictly classical among us; and he had learned to
require conveniences for washing and dressing in
his own room instead of sharing the family basin
1*
and comb in the kitchen. Besides all this he dressed
with a strict neatness which was supposed to
indicate
an incipient inclination to stick up; and
he evinced decided objections to taking his turn at
milking the twenty cows that came lowing into
his father's barn-yard at sunset. These were bad
signs.
However, when the old man found that in more
important business Seymour was far more competent
than before, and especially when he observed the
clerkly skill and neatness with which he could use
the pen, (an accomplishment but too rare in the
neighborhood,) his respect for his son increased very
rapidly, and he began to think it quite time to
set him off a farm of his own, and try if he could
put so much larnin' to any real use.
These eighteen months, so important to Seymour,
his scarce-remembered flame, Caroline Hay, had
spent in New York, perhaps less profitably. She
had gone to the city by invitation of a dear aunt,
her father's sister, a member of the society of
Friends;childless, and longing for the cheering
companionship of the young. Mr. Hay was
scarcely
willing to see his daughter depart for the gay
city, even under such guardianship as that of his
meek and pious sister. He feared that the
fascinations
of polished lifethe very comforts and
conveniences
of the domestic arrangements she would
enjoywould cause her to look with cold eyes on
her Western home, rude and laborious as that must
ever be by comparison. Still, the pleadings of Mrs.
Tennett, of Mrs. Hay, and, above all, of Caroline
herself, overcame his better judgment, and he gave
his reluctant consent to the visit.
For some time Mrs. Tennett's letters were full
of her niece's improvement, both in point of health
and of the various studies to which she had
directed
her attention. She could not say enough
of her unvarying sweetness of temper,of her
docility,of her willingness to abide by the plain
and quiet style of her aunt's house and company.
Caroline, she would say, is so lovable,
so exactly what I could wish for a daughter, that I
could almost be selfish enough, my dear brother,
to ask her of thee for a life-long comfort. With
four sweet girls left, would it be too much?
But gradually, and by degrees almost
imperceptible
to any but a parent's watchful heart, the good
aunt's letters had assumed a different tone.
Caroline
had become very healthy and blooming, and
went out a good deal. She had become acquainted
with a number of world's people, so wrote her
kind and scrupulous guardian; and her father was
given to know that dress was much more in
requisition
than formerly by frequent requests for
money from Caroline herself.
Then Mrs. Tennett felt obliged to mention that
her niece was receiving the attentions of a young
man whose gay exterior and plausible address
seemed to please her more than her aunt could
think safe, since the gentleman, though only an
employ
in a public office, yet carried the air and
indulged in the expenses of a man of fortune.
After this followed a silence of unusual length.
Come we now to a cold evening in May, the west
yet red with the last sun-gleam, while the north
and east were heavy with clouds driven on by a
bleak and damp wind. A storm was evidently in
prospect, yet Mr. Hay, well wrapped, mounted
Hourglass for a ride to the post-office, three miles
distant. Many times had he done the same, hoping
for a letter from Caroline, now the theme of many
an anxious thought, and as he went, he resolved,
should he be as unsuccessful now as before, he
would write requesting her immediate return, so
strong a hold had the idea of impending ill taken
of his mind.
But this evening, so soon as he could succeed
in approaching the counter at the post-office, a
counter that served as well for the dispensation
of bitters and tobacco as of letters, he received
a letter in the hand-writing of his sister. It was
closely written and carefully crossed, yet there
stood Mr. Hay,elbowed and shoved,amid all
the din of spelling out newspapers, higgling about
postage, and anxious but ineffectual efforts to get
letters without paying for themuntil he had
read it quite through, by the dim rays of the one
greasy lamp which shed its oil and a modicum of
light from a beam over his head.
This done, he mounted Hourglass again, and
striking off at a brisk trot in the teeth of a sleety
shower, he stinted not nor staid till he drew bridle
at his own door. It is not difficult to guess the
purport of Mrs. Tennett's letter. She was about
to return her fair charge to her father, with some
fears that the invitation so kindly intended had not
been productive of unmixed good.
Any news from Caroline, father? said several
voices.
Yes, a letter from your aunt, said Mr. Hay;
less cheerily than usual.
What is the matter, father?Isn't she well?
Oh yes! quite well; she is coming home.
Much joy was expressed by the young folks,
and Mrs. Hay, though she shared her husband's
anxiety, could think of nothing now but the
happiness
of once more embracing the long absent object
of so much care. Seymour, who, though no longer
an inmate, was a frequent guest at Mr. Hay's, and
who now sat by Mrs. Hay's work-table helping
one of the little girls on a hard sum she had
brought home from school, began to ask himself
seriously whether he felt pleased or otherwise at
the expected return of a young lady who had
shown him so little favor in his chrysalis state,
and who was now, probably,
Grown ten times perter than before.
Before he had time even to debate the
question
,
much less to decide it, a carriage drove up to
the door,there was a slight bustle in the hall, and
the object of the thoughts of all present entered the
room, radiant in beauty, all smiles and tears, and
almost overcome with the joy of seeing once more
the beloved home and its circle of happy faces. She
was followed by a Quaker lady and gentleman
whom she introduced as friends of her aunt, who
had placed her under their care;Mr. and Mrs.
Thurston Caroline called them; they would have
given themselves out in plainer style.
The warm greetings were said, and Miss Hay's
fashionable courtesy to Mr. Bullitt accomplished,
with scarce a suspicion on her part that the
well-looking
young man before her could be the yawning
hero of the snapping-turtle. The Friends (
exceedingly
polite and well-bred people, by the by)
received
due welcome on the part of Mr. and Mrs. Hay,
and were much urged to remain for the night.
We must decline your kindness, said Mr.
Thurston, with but little of the formality supposed
by those, who do not know them, to belong to the
members of his society; my wife has set her
heart on seeing her sister to-night if it may be. I
think Joseph Ellingham's is but a few miles
beyond
this?
Ellingham's! Ellingham's! repeated more
than one voice, as if unconsciously, while each
looked to each as if in perplexity.
Mr. Thurston noticed at once the changed
expression
of countenance on all around him.
You have heard evil of Joseph or his family, I
fear, said he, hesitatingly, and with some emotion.
The road is very bad, said Mr. Hay, and the
night stormy;wouldn't it be better to wait till
morning?
If it be only the road and the storm, said Mr.
Thurston,our driver is well acquainted with
your roads, and if there is no other difficultybut
I fear from thy aspect, friend Hay, that there may
be
There is, said Mr. Hay, kindly, taking Mr.
Thurston's hand, there is, my good friend. Our
neighbor Mr. Ellingham has met with a great loss
the greatesthe is a lonely man.
My sister! said or rather sighed Mrs.
Thurston
,
as she sank back, covering her face with her
hands and weeping abundantly, but in silence,
while her husband's sympathies, though evidently
much excited, were repressed as by a powerful
effort.
And when was this? said Mr. Thurston, after
a long pause, during which nothing was heard but
the stifled sobbing of his wife.
Three weeks since, was the reply.
And how? Thou hast heard of course.
By a dreadful accidentby fire, said Mr.
Hay, in a whisper.
By fire! alas! alas! said the poor lady, whose
watchful grief had caught the sound; and now no
longer able to exercise the strict control at which
she had aimed, she fell on her knees on the floor,
mingling her heart-wrung sobs with prayers and
incoherent and bitter lamentations.
Lydia! said her husband, my dear Lydia,
recollect thyself; and as he bent over her, his tears
dropped fast upon her smooth cap; our Heavenly
Father doeth all things well! we are allowed to
mourn, but we must not murmur.
And when the mourner accepted his offered
assistance
,
and meekly suffered herself to be raised from
the floor and placed on the sofa, she wept in silence,
and seemed to suppress forcibly the passionate grief
into which she had at first been surprised. And
she might have observed that of the circle whose
smiling faces had brightened the fireside, none
remained to witness her distress except Mr. and
Mrs. Hay and Caroline, the rest having, with a
delicacy not unknown in the woods, retired silently
to another room.
Few words were required to tell the particulars
of a casualty but too common where the country
is thinly inhabited, and the dwellings built with
little precaution against fire. The result is not
often so fatal, but when a fire occurs during the
night, children may perish by families without a
possibility of rescue.
Some two or three broad stones for the hearth,
and one or two more for the back of the chimney,
are usually the only parts of a log-house not made
of wood; the parts adjacent to the fire and the
chimney itself being all of oak, the latter slightly
covered within with clay. When this chimney
takes fire, as it is very apt to do in spots where the
clay has crumbled off, the loft where the children
usually sleep may be all in flames before the
inmates
of the lower room are aware.
In this case nothing was ever known but that
Mr. Ellingham, returning home late in the evening,
after a short absence, found his two little daughters
crying in the wood, and learned from them that
the light which he saw at some distance proceeded
not as he supposed from a brush-heap, but from his
own dwelling. When he reached the spot a
blazing
ruin was all that remained. The poor babes
said, mother had brought them out, and then went
back, and did not come any more.
It is not surprising that Mrs. Thurston, learning
that Mr. Ellingham was provided with another
dwelling, still desired to proceed at once. To see
the dear motherless infants would be at least a
melancholy satisfaction. And Seymour, learning
this from Mrs. Hay, offered to be their guide
through the woods,an offer which was
thankfully
accepted, as the road was newly cut and
abounding in stumps and fallen trees.
VOL. II. 2
CHAPTER XXXIII.
Art
thou
not changed? Do the same feelings now
Come fresh and joyous that were once thine own?
When clustering locks lay on thy childish brow,
And life was new, and almost all unknown?
T.
Colton
.
Before
Caroline Hay had been three days at
home, she had become painfully sensible that her
father's
forebodings as to the effect of a city residence
had not been unfounded. All was changed to her
eye, if not to her heart. Much as she loved the
dear inmates of the plentiful farm-house,and she
loved them as dearly as ever,an air of coarseness,
which she had never before observed, met her at
every turn. Her mother's dress and occupations,
the homely phraseology of her sisters, the furniture,
the style of living, though certainly unchanged, or
at least not changed for the worse, struck her
unpleasantly
,
and chilled her feelings even against the
pleadings of her heart and of her better judgment.
She saw and acknowledged that all was good and
true, generous and contented and happy, that her
father's house was a well-spring of bounty to all
who were in need, and that to him, and to his
excellent
partner and help in all ood things, the
whole neighborhood looked with undoubting trust
for sympathy and kindness. She compared the
simplicity and ease of her rustic home with the
feverish excitement of the scene she had left,
and though her reason and her good sense told her
which to approve, she found that habit had
become
tyrannical, and likely to maintain a struggle in
her mind which would cost her many bitter tears.
The acquaintance which she had accidentally
formed in the city beyond her aunt's sober circle,
had been rather showy than solid people, who were
however possessed of sufficient refinement to add a
degree of fascination to their gay tastes and habits;
so that the eyes and ears of the inexperienced
country
girl were at once dazzled and delighted, and she
learned to look upon elegance as almost
synonymous
with
dashing,
and to find every thing insipid
or vulgar which was characterized by plainness
and sobriety. No wonder she contemplated with
mortified pride the unadorned aspect of things at
home! We are all, it is true enough, marvellously
forgetful of the outward life after we have lived
long enough at the West to become indoctrinated
with the current opinions;but to return.
Unpleasant feelings were not wanting on the
other side. So prone is youth to extremes, that it
is not surprising that Caroline should have used her
liberty and her father's liberal allowance in
providing
herself with dress which was rather gaudy than
elegant. Her aunt had felt her inability to be a
counsellor on a subject where her own views were
averse to even the smallest indulgence of taste or
fancy, and the dress-maker had been but too happy
to display all her art on so elegant a formthose
artists generally considering their employers rather
in the light of sign-posts than of rational beings.
So our poor Caroline was very fine. There were
such loads of curls that the fair head reminded one
of a flourishing bed of Scotch kail, or of the
decorations
of some lucky child, who, having the
petites
entres
of a carpenter's shop, makes use of the
opportunity
to cover her eyes and ears with elegant
pine shavings. Her fingers were heaped with
incongruous
rings, and worse than all were the long
ear-pendants, which vibrated with every word, and
seemed determined to repose their weary length on
the snow-white shoulders below.
A costume, which would appear a little ultra even
in the city, wears an air of absolute ridicule in the
country; and while Caroline was feeling the
plainness
of her mother and sisters as a mortification
to her pride, they, on their part, were absolutely
ashamed of her finery. They could not think her
ornaments improved her beauty, and, as a further
and incontestable proof of their rustic breeding,
they told her so; which made her cry, and then
they were sorry, and on the whole there was a
degree of constraint in their intercourse which cast
a shadow on the delight of having Caroline at
home once more.
These things being so, we must acknowledge
that it afforded rather a relief when word came that
Mrs. Thurston, overcome by distress and fatigue,
added to some exposure in her night-ride, was quite
ill at Mr. Ellingham's, and much in need of some
friendly aid from Caroline or her mother.
Seymour
Bullitt brought the message, and Caroline,
when she saw him by daylight, was more struck
than before with the marvellous improvement in
his appearance, and particularly with the quiet
self-possession
of his manner. Indeed she could not
but own to herself that she had known a person,
far his inferior in most respects, pass in the city as
a splendid fellowbut then, old recollections,
and such a
countrified
name!
Mrs. Hay went to Mrs. Thurston, who grew
worse daily; and after a few days' effort, ague
accomplished
its usual work by prostrating the nurse;
and Caroline took her mother's place by the
bedside
of the sufferer.
This was a new scene for her, and one which
soon proved of an absorbing interest. Mrs.
Thurston's
symptoms became more and more alarming,
while she herself won more and more upon the
affections
of her young attendant. She was of a saintly
piety, and so lovely in disposition and manner that
it was impossible for a young and ingenuous mind
to know her without loving her. No extremity of
suffering ever overtasked her patience, no
disappointment
or omission of duty in others ever ruffled
her serene countenance. Hers was that perfect
2*
self-forgetfulness which binds all around to a warm
and voluntary attention and remembrance, and
Caroline felt that the cares and fatigues of such a
sick chamber were any thing but a task. She was
sole nurse, for though every effort had been made
to procure a regular one, there was no such being
within ken, and the neighbors, though all kindness,
were distant, and could not leave their homes, or
perhaps were detained by the illness of their own
families, for it is one of the disadvantages of the
country that sickness is very apt to prevail in
neighborhoods so as to make it difficult to procure
attendance.
During this time of trial and anxiety Seymour
was by no means an idle spectator. He had
become
interested in Mrs. Thurston and her husband
from the circumstances of his first meeting with
them, and they in turn had appreciated his kind
manner, and felt gratified by his friendly attentions.
Now that they were in need of real and substantial
aid, Seymour was at the service of the sick and
afflicted, and many times a day might have been
observed galloping in various directions, on different
errands of mercy, a most useful auxiliary in the
country where population is so scattered, and the
ordinary comforts of the invalid sometimes so far to
seek. It not unfrequently fell to his lot to be the
bearer of messages or more ponderous matters
between
Mr. Hay's house and the scene of suffering,
and sometimes to escort to and fro the young nurse,
when she could be spared for a little while.
It would be difficult to say just what were
Seymour's
feelings towards his fair enemy at this
period. He thought them those belonging to
indifference
;
indeed, he sometimes concluded, of dislike.
Her manner, though softened much by the late
rousing of her sensibilities, was still that of one
who had been accustomed to admiration; and
though she had gradually, and almost unconsciously,
laid by all her finery, her appearance retained
something
of that dashing air which struck Seymour
unpleasantly, both from his natural taste for grave
simplicity and from its unsuitableness to the
objects
by which they were surrounded. And Miss
Hay, if she thought of Seymour at all, had all old
impressions habitually present, although she was
often surprised to notice traits which she could not
reconcile to those impressions. But she was not
much concerned to do justice to one whom she had
known as a clodhopper; so their intercourse,
though civil and frequent, was frigid enough.
They were one evening at sunset returning
together
to Mr. Ellingham's, and had turned from
the high road into the wood, when they were
overtaken
by a horseman, whose rapid pace continued
till he had passed them, when he reined up
suddenly
,
and greeted Miss Hay as an old
acquaintance
.
He was a young man of gentlemanly
appearance, and his face was of that striking and
animated cast which one does not easily forget.
His whole exterior was such as would claim some
praise any where, and of course it was remarkable
enough in a wild Western forest.
Caroline was evidently embarrassed at the
meeting, but recovering herself, introduced the
gentleman as Mr. Avenard, and made inquiries
after some city friends. The stranger's manner,
in spite of manifest effort, betrayed a degree of
agitation, and he eyed Seymour with no gratified
air. The latter felt himself in the way, but he did
not know very well how to get out of it, so the
trio rode together to Mr. Ellingham's.
Here Caroline apologized for not inviting the
stranger to enter, on account of the situation of the
family. His dark eyes flashed at this, and drawing
as near her as possible, he asked, in a low tone,
when he might hope to see her again.
Caroline felt cruelly embarrassed. A thousand
indistinct thoughts flashed across her mind in an
instant. She knew that Avenard, though never a
declared lover, had had abundant reason to suppose
himself not disagreeable to her, and her heart
whispered that if her sudden departure from the
city had not prevented, he would probably have
been not only a declared but an accepted one. But
even the short time which had flown since her
return had been sufficient, under the circumstances,
to throw an air of coldness and hollowness over
most of her city reminiscences, and even over her
partiality for this gay young man. The grief of
Mrs. Thurston, her distressing illness, and the
angelic
piety which sustained her under all, had
opened to Caroline a new world of thought and
feeling; and the delightful consciousness of being
useful had given her a sense of the true value and
aim of life. So that Avenard and his claims had
been for the time forgotten, and now that they
were presented anew, she felt unprepared and
uncomfortable
.
In reply to his question, she said, in a voice as
low as his own, I cannot receive a visit here,
but if you will come in the morning, I will ride
over with you to my father's.
He bowed proudly and without speaking, and,
turning his horse's head, rode away evidently
dissatisfied
;
and Seymour Bullitt, not entering as
usual, went his way too, with his heart beating
inconveniently, and his face almost as red as when
Caroline first knew himand about what?
He could not make up his own mind on this
point. What was it to him that this dashing young
stranger had evidently expected a favorable
reception
from Miss Hay? He called to mind all
the evidences of the young lady's dislike to
himself
,and
they were faithfully recorded in his
memory,and then tried to bring proof equally
satisfactory, of his own indifference to her likes or
dislikes. It required all the time occupied in a
very long
dtour
a gallop of half a dozen miles
or soto think over these things, and after all,
when Seymour went to bed, the only fruit of his
reflections was a manful resolution not to call at
Mr. Ellingham's again while the strenger was in
the neighborhood.
CHAPTER XXXIV.
Here are old trees, tall oaks, and gnarled pines,
That stream with gray-green mosses; here the ground
Was never trenched by spade, and flowers spring up unsown,
And die ungathered.
Bryant
.
But hark! What voice, as thunder loud,
Now shakes the wilderness profound?
Crystalina
.
Mrs. Thurston
was so ill that night, and
seemed so dreadfully prostrated in the morning,
that it was feared she could not survive the day,
Caroline, absorbed in grief and anxiety, had scarcely
thought of her promise to Avenard, and, when he
appeared to claim it, she met him at the gate, and
declared it impossible to leave her friend.
You seem to have found very dear friends here,
Miss Hay, said he, bitterly.
So dear, she replied, that I feel that I could
almost lay down my own life to save that of the
one I am now attendingon her death-bed I fear
though I have known her but for a few weeks.
It is
new
friends then who are so fortunate
as to interest you! Perhaps the gentleman with
whom I found you riding last evening was one of
those happy beings whom you have not known
long enough to despise!'
On the contrary, said Caroline, he is an old
acquaintance, and a particular friend of my father's
family.
Oh! an old acquaintance and a family friend!
very convenient relations, certainly! I presume you
often claim his services as escort!
Mr. Avenard, said Caroline, with some touch
of her natural spirit, though she was a little
humbled
by the consciousness that the gentleman had
some right to complain,I know not by what
right you address yourself to me in this manner!
I deny your claim to the slightest interference in
my choice of society.
Caroline! he said, in a changed and mournful
tone, do not drive me quite mad. I am unhappy,
wretched,and to you at least I looked for
sympathy and kindness! Do not trifle with my
despair, but tell me when you will give me an
opportunity to converse with you without
interruption
.
I am about to leave the country.
Caroline was keenly touched by the change in his
manner. Her eyes filled with tears, and she was
on the point of promising an early meeting, when
she was called anxiously from the house, and
without
an adieu to her companion, she was at the
bedside
of Mrs. Thurston in an instant.
Avenard waited as long as he decently could,
and then, finding she did not return, he plunged
into the wood, and hovered about within sight of
the cottage until he had seen Seymour dismount at
the door and go in without ceremony.
* * * * * *
Seymour had found an excellent necessity for
calling at Mr. Ellingham's. Finding a number of
letters lying at the post-office for Mr. Thurston, he
had judged it incumbent on him to ride over with
them; and indeed, without this, he would have
found it difficult to absent himself from a house
where his services had been required daily for some
time, and where he was always expected, and often
waited for with anxiety.
Mr. Thurston was pacing the little garden with
rapid steps, endeavoring to regain his wonted
calmness
,
after a night of watchfulness and great
distress
of mind. Mrs. Thurston was now sleeping
quietly, and her physicians were awaiting with
solicitude
the result of her repose.
Thou art very kind, said Mr. Thurston, as
he took the letters from the hand of his young
friend; and from his lips these words were not
words of course. As he read his letters, his
countenance
exhibited surprise and emotion. When he
had finished, he said to Seymour that he wished
immediately
to send one of those letters to Mr. Hay.
Seymour of course offered to be the bearer, and Mr.
Thurston said,
It is like thee, for thou art kind. Tell friend
VOL. II. 3
Hay, please, that I am somewhat afraid of seeming
intrusive, yet I feel as if I ought not to conceal
from him the intelligence contained in this letter.
If I am mistaken, I trust he will excuse me.
And Seymour departed, having seen Caroline
only for an instant in passing.
He was scarcely out of sight of Mr. Ellingham's
when he was joined by Avenard.
Have you seen Miss Hay this morning?
asked the latter abruptly.
Seymour answered that he had just seen her,
and he was vexed to think that, so indifferent as
he was, he should have given these few words a
flurried air. The sight of Avenard, he thought,
seemed to cast a spell upon him.
You seem to be a favored visitor! said the
stranger scornfully; pray, may I ask by what
right you intrude yourself upon Miss Hay at all
hours?
When I know by what right you interfere
with my movements, said Seymour in reply, I
may be disposed to answer such a question,not
till then certainly.
Quite cavalier! well, sir! if I should inform
you that I consider myself accepted by Miss Hay,
you will think perhaps
That is a matter with which I have no
concern
,
said Seymour abruptly; but my visits at
Mr. Ellingham's have another object, and my visits
to Miss Hay will be regulated by herself. And
he quickened his horse's pace as if to escape further
discussion of a point which seemed likely to lead
to no pleasant results. Indeed the stranger seemed,
by the disorder and impetuosity of his manner, to
have a desire to pick a quarrel, which Seymour
was determined to avoid if possible, though his
Western blood had been stirred not a little, by the
Newyorker's impertinent air.
Before he reached Mr. Hay's, however, Avenard
was again at his side, seeming hurried, as if to
follow had been a recent thought.
You are on your way to Mr. Hay's, I presume,
said he, more civilly than before. I wish to call
on him, and I will trouble you to introduce me, as
I have not the pleasure of a personal acquaintance
with him. Miss Hay was not at liberty to leave
her friend this morning.
Seymour bowed coldly, as if not well pleased
with the office; but they presently found
themselves
at the gate.
Mr. Avenard was, as we have said, handsome
and prepossessing; and though his manners lacked
that quietness and
retenue
which bespeak a mind
at ease, he pleased Mr. Hay exceedingly, and the
old gentleman's scrutiny was by no means an
indifferent
one, since rumors of Caroline's
New-york
beau had already reached his ears.
Seymour was ill at ease, and vexed with himself
for being so; and he took the earliest opportunity
to call Mr. Hay aside, to give him Mr. Thurston's
letter, and the accompanying message, and to
make his parting bow.
In the deep shade of the forest he endeavored
to recover his wonted coolness, but in vain; and
it was with a feeling of absolute despair that he for
the first time owned to himself the interest with
which Caroline, in her new character, as the angel
of the house of mourning, had inspired him.
His hands abandoned the reinhe ceased to
guide his horse, and he did not even notice that
the animal had wandered, browsing, far from the
beaten track, when he was recalled from a vortex
of busy thoughts by a violent blow; and Avenard,
his eyes flashing fire, his horse in a foam, and his
whole appearance betokening complete distraction,
stood beside him.
Villain! he shouted, mean pitiful scoundrel!
this is your indifference! you were too much of a
coward to dare to avow your intentions, so you
resorted to the expedient of undermining! You do
not escape me! And the madman drew a pistol
before Seymour had collected his senses.
Seymour was unarmed of course, for honest men
do not carry weapons in a peaceful land;but
with the instinct of self-defence he turned upon
Avenard, and urged his horse forward with the
spur. The animal was a heavy and powerful one,
and easily rode down the other, which was of a
lighter make, and Avenard, unhorsed by the
unexpected
shock, fell prostrate with the whole weight
of his own horse across his body. The pistol went
off however, and the ball broke Seymour's bridle
arm. He lost all consciousness, and sank forward,
with his face on his horse's neck; upon which that
wise beast took the well-known way to a good
stable, and carried his master safely to Mr. Hay's
gate.
We cannot report the extent to which our gay
Newyorker may have been injured by this rough
handling, for he quitted the country without any
further effort to see Miss Hay. Mr. Thurston's
letters
had brought intelligence of one of those
developments
which too often close the career of city
youths, who, unfortunately born with the tastes of
a duke without his income, find it convenient to
borrow of those who have more money than they
have the spirit to spend. Avenard had written
somebody
else's name by mistake, and received various
sums of money thereupon, and he was now on his
way to more congenial climes.
All that could be guessed of his intention in
coming to this country was, the cruel and base
design of persuading the innocent Caroline to share
his exile, but we will hope he was not so utterly
vile; though it may be doubted whether a person
of his selfish and unprincipled habits is capable of
any form of disinterested affection.
3*
CHAPTER XXXV.
When the flame of love is kindled first,
'Tis the fire-fly's light at even;
'Tis dim as the wandering stars that burst
In the blue of the summer heaven.
Sleep, heart of mine!
Wherefore art thou beating?
Do dreams stir thy slumbers,
Vainest hopes repeating?
L. E. L.
Seymour's
broken arm might have been no very
terrible accident for a young backwoodsman, but
the excitement and agitation of his mind were
unfavorable
to a speedy cure, and for several days, the
physician went backwards and forwards between
Mr. Hay's and Mr. Ellingham's, leaving almost
equally anxious faces in both. But happily all
went well, and Mrs. Thurston and Seymour were
nearly at the same time pronounced convalescent.
The latter was most carefully nursed at Mr. Hay's,
and occasionally visited for a few moments by
Caroline
herself. She was looking pale, sad, and
spiritworn
from her long anxiety and confinement, added
to the distressing thoughts naturally arising from
the whole course of the Avenard affair. Between
Seymour and herself there was a hopeful degree of
constraint; for in his account of the affray he had
unavoidably allowed it to be guessed that jealousy
was the moving cause of the young man's fury,
and this presenting him in a new light to Caroline,
forbade her feeling quite the ancient cool
indifference
,
while Seymour, novice-like, was amusingly
conscious.
Mr. Thurston now began to think of his return
home, and he left nothing unsaid or undone to
show his sense of the kindness with which he had
been treated. He proposed to our friend Seymour
to return with him to Newyork.
We can do but little, my dear young friend,
said he, to show how we appreciate the kindness
of all about us, but I hope thou wilt be willing to
help us do what we can. I think I see in thee all
that I can desire as a companion in business. Now,
if thou wilt go with us to town, I will make thee
such proposals as cannot but prove very
advantageous
to thy worldly interests, and such as will
probably fix thee in the city permanently; and I
am sure thou wilt not doubt that myself and my
wife will do all in our power in return for thy
great kindness to us in this our extremity. My
business is such as thou art well fitted for, and such
as will make thy station in society all thou couldst
desire. Now I have made thee a long discourse,
concluded the good man with a smile, and I hope
thou wilt give me a short answer, and one favorable
to my wishes.But no! he added, recollecting
himself, I did wrong to ask thee for a sudden
answer. Affairs of importance should be better
weighed. I was consulting my own wishes rather
than thy good in this. Take a week for thy
consideration of my proposal, and ask the
counsel
of thy friends. They will be better judges
of thy real interest than I can be, for I am
doubtless
biased by my desire to have thee with me.
Seymour gratefully acknowledged Mr.
Thurston's
generous kindness, and, Mr. Hay coming in
at the moment, the proposition was submitted for
his judgment.
You would probably live and die a richer man,
Seymour, said he, in the city than in the
country
;
whether you would be a happier one may be
doubted. But you are young enough to make the
trial, and you have good sense enough to give it up
if you find yourself unfitted, by character or habit,
for a city life. And here the matter rested for the
present.
Mr. Hay, who had always been extremely active
in his habi's, was now failing in health in some
degree, though he had hardly yet reached the age
when the strong men shall bow themselves. He
had been among the earliest pioneers of the West,
and the labors and privations of his younger days
had left their traces in his constitution, producing
a premature old age not uncommon among the
settlers. His interest in the duties and occupations
of his situation were in no wise diminished, yet he
was frequently prevented from taking his usual
active part in them;a state of things which
affected his spirits more than he was willing to
own.
About the time of which we have been speaking,
and particularly a day or two after Mr. Thurston's
proposal to Seymour, Mr. Hay was quite indisposed,
and more than usually depressed in spirits, in
consequence
of being unable to attend an election
inwhich
his old adjutant, Tim Rice, was much
interested
.
Seymour, who observed his uneasiness,
offered to go in his place, and supply the deficiency
as well as he could; and Mr. Hay, though fearful
that Seymour was not yet strong enough for the
effort, permitted him to make it, and gave him the
necessary instructions.
As he was going out, accoutred for the trip, he
encountered Miss Hay in the hall.
Are you going to ride this morning? said
she.
Yes, to, to try to forward the election of
your old friend Tim Rice.
My friend! said the young lady, with a
scornful
curl of the lip. But you are not well enough!
You look very pale!
Pale! do I? said Seymour, the blood
rushing
to his face to supply the deficiency.
Caroline blushed most sympathetically, and after
an instant's awkward pause, and without another
word spoken, Seymour mounted his horse and was
off. He had not been in so good spirits in a long
time. Perhaps the brilliant opening offered by Mr.
Thurston inspired him. It certainly could not
have been so slight a thing as a young lady's blush.
Arrived at the ground, he set about his
secondhand
canvassing with the very best intentions of
fulfilling Mr. Hay's directions and wishes. His
own partialities were certainly not in favor of Tim
Rice, since we cannot always love our benefactors;
and his view of Tim's character was a good deal
clearer, and cooler, and less indulgent than was Mr.
Hay's, this latter gentleman being what may well
be called a warm friend, though he could not justly
be styled a bitter enemy.
Seymour found Tim already warmly engaged,
and all the world shouting at the very top of their
powers, in order to make things clearer. There
was a considerable assemblage of the farmers of
the neighborhood, and we may venture to assert,
without having been present, that a more
respectable
looking set of men cannot be found any where
under the same circumstances. To be sure, as is
often sagely observed, it takes some of all sorts
to make a world; and so it does to make an
election meeting; and this all sorts comprised
some curious specimens. There was one tall
fellow
with his hat knocked in on one side, and a
rifle on his shoulder, who was insisting on his own
qualifications for a constableship; another with a
blazing nose more generously advocating the claims
of his friend.
He's a little high just now, to be sure, said
this Achates, but he's never the fellow to get
drunk when he's got any thing to do.
Vote for Spriggins, said one; he's a
high-flyer
!
he licked Kneeland last winter 'cause he
said he wa'n't no gentleman!
Don't put Kneeland in, said a ragged youth,
confidentially to a circle of a dozen; don't vote
for him; he's a mean tee-totaller!
A cart, drawn up within convenient distance
from the scene of action, contained the elements
of a hundred quarrels and twice the number of
black eyes; and there was still standing-place left
on the back part. On this conspicuous perch, sure
of entranced and stationary auditors, Mr. Rice now
exhibited his well-known person, not dressed as for
a gala-day, but studiously slovenly and common in
his array. The time for opening the poll was near
at hand, and not a moment was to be lost.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
I did but prompt the age to quit their clogs
By the known laws of
modern
liberty.
Milton
.
Gentlemen,
said the orator, taking off his hat
and waving it in a courteous and inviting manner,
while he wiped his brow with a faded cotton
handkerchief
,Gentlemen!
may I beg your attention
for a few moments! You are aware that I do not
often draw very largely on your patience, and also
that I am not a man who is fond of talking about
himself. It is indeed a most unpleasant thing to
me to be in a manner forced to advocate my own
cause, and nothing short of the desire I feel to have
an opportunity of advancing the interest of my
friends and neighbors in the legislature would
induce
me to submit to it.
Somebody groaned, Oh, Tim, that's tough!
Yes, gentlemen! as you observe, it
is
tough; it
is a thing that always hurts a man's feelings. But
as I was observing, we must go through with
whatever
is for the good of our country. The greatest
good of the greatest number,
I
say!
By this time the auditory had greatly increased,
and comprised indeed nearly all the voters. Mr.
Rice went on with increasing animation.
This is the principle to go upon, and if this
was only carried out, we should all have been better
off long ago. This is where the legislature wants
mending. They always stop short of the right
mark. They get frightened, gentlemen! yes,
frightened
,
scar't! they always have a lot of these small
souls among themsouls cut after a scant pattern
souls that are afraid of their own shadows
that object to all measures that would really relieve
the people, so they just give the people a taste to
keep them quiet, and no more, for fear of what folks
a thousand miles off would say! You've heard of
the jackass that was scar't at a penny trumpet
well, these jackasses are scar't at what isn't louder
than a penny trumpet, nor half so loud.
Here was a laugh, which gave the orator time to
moisten his throat from a tumbler handed up by a
friend.
Now you see, gentlemen, nobody would have
said a word against that exemption bill, if every
body was as much in favor of the people as I am.
I don't care who knows it, gentlemen,
I
am in
favor of the people. Don't the people want relief?
And what greater relief can they have than not to
be obliged to pay their debts, when they have
nothing to pay them with? that is, nothing that
they can spare conveniently. I call that measure
a half-way measure, gentlemen,it is a measure
that leaves a way open to take a man's property if
he happens to have a little laid bya little of his
VOL. II. 4
hard earnings, gentlemen; and you all know what
hard earnings are.
What is the use of having the privilege of
making
laws if we can't make them to suit ourselves?
We might as well be a territory again, instead of
a sovereign state, if we are a-going to legislate to
favor the people of other states at the expense of
our own people. I don't approve of the plan of
creditors from other states coming here to take
away our property. Folks are very fond of talking
about honesty, and good faith, and all that. As to
faith they may talk, but I'm more for works; and
the man that works hard and can't pay his debts is
the one that ought to be helped, in my
judgment
.
They'll tell you that the man that sues for a
debt is owing somebody else, and wants his money
to pay with. Now,
I
say, he's just the man that
ought to feel for the other, and not want to crowd
him hard up. Besides, if we pass exemption laws,
don't we help him too? Isn't it as broad as it's
long?
A murmur of applause.
Then as to honesty; where'll you find an
honest
man if not among the people? and such
measures
are on purpose to relieve the people. The
aristocracy don't like 'em perhaps, but who cares
what
they
like? They like nothing but grinding
the face of the poor.
Here a shout of applause, and a long application
to the tumbler.
Gentlemen, continued Mr. Rice, some people
talk as if what debts were not paid were lost, but
it is no such thing. What one man don't get,
t'other keeps; so it's all the same in the long run.
Folks ought to be accommodating, and if they are
accommodating they won't object to any measures
for the relief of the people, and if they don't
want to be accommodating, we'll just make 'em,
that's all!
Some say it's bad to keep altering and
altering
the laws, till nobody knows what the law is.
That's a pretty principle, to be sure! what do we
have a legislature for, I should be glad to know, if
not to make laws? Do we pay them two dollars
and fifty cents a day to sit still and do nothing?
Look at the last legislature. They did not hold
on above two months, and passed rising of two
hundred laws, and didn't work o' Sundays neither!
Such men are the men you want, if they'll only
carry the laws far enough to do some good.
Now, gentlemen, I see the poll's open, and I
s'pose you want to be off, so I will not detain you
much longer. All I have to observe is, that
although
I am far from commending myself, I must
give you my candid opinion that a certain person
who has thrust himself before the public on this
occasion is unworthy of the suffrages of a free and
enlightened community like this. He's a man
that's always talking about doing justice to all, and
keeping up the reputation of the state, and a great
deal more stuff of the same sort; but it's all
humbug
!
nothing else; and he has an axe of his own
to grind, just like the rest of us. And worse than
all, gentlemen, as you very well know, he's one of
these tee-totallers, that are trying to coax free-born
Americans to sign away their liberty, and make
hypocrites of 'em. I'm a man that will never
refuse
to take a glass of grog with a fellow-citizen
because he wears a ragged coat. Liberty and
equality,
I
sayHurrah for liberty and equality!
three cheers for liberty and equality, and down
with the tee-totallers!
The orator had been so attentive to the tumbler,
that the sincerity of the latter part of his speech at
least could not be doubted; and indeed his
vehemence
was such as to alarm Seymour, who felt
already somewhat ashamed of the cause he was
bound to advocate, and who feared that a few more
tumblers would bring Tim to a point which would
render his advocacy unavailing. He therefore
sought an opportunity of a few moments' private
talk with the candidate, and ventured to hint that
if he became so enthusiastic that he could not
stand, he would have very little chance of sitting
in the legislature.
Now, Mr. Rice liked not such quiet youths as
our friend Seymour, and especially in his present
elevated frame did he look down with supreme
contempt upon any thing in the shape of advice on
so delicate a subject, so that Seymour got an
answer
which by no means increased his zeal in Mr.
Rice's service, though he still resolved to do his
best to fulfil the wishes of Mr: Hay.
Rice's conduct throughout the day was in
keeping
with the beginning which we have described,
and such was the disgust with which it inspired
Seymour, that he at length concluded to quit the
field, and tell Mr. Hay frankly that it was
impossible
for him to further the interests of so
unprincipled
a candidate.
4*
CHAPTER XXXVII.
It was sweet,
Yet sad, to see the perfect calm which blessed
His look, that hour.
Mrs. Hemans.
Touch us gently, Time!
We've not proud nor soaring wings;
Our ambition, our content,
Lies in simple things.
Barry Cornwall.
Mr. Hay
felt exceedingly vexed, and not at all
well pleased with Seymour, and visited his anger
upon him, as old gentlemen will do upon young
ones sometimes, by saying some things rather hard
to bear. Time Rice had always been very much
under restraint when in Mr. Hay's presence, and
from his quickness and readiness as a business man
had acquired no small share of his good graces
a sort of habitual liking which sometimes goes
further with us than a better-founded esteem
would do.
So Seymour was in disgrace all day, which
called forth the sympathies of the fair Caroline,
who was but a soft-hearted little thing after all,
and prone to take part with misfortune in any
shape. She told him that her father was really ill,
as indeed any body might observe, and that he
was only a little cross now and then, and so good
all the rest of the time that it made up for it and a
good deal more,and such like maidenly topics
of consolation; and Seymour was consoled; though
evening brought intelligence of the complete
defeat
of Mr. Rice, and Mr. Hay was more pettish
than ever. Mr. Rice had found listeners and
cheerers during the lucid exposition of his
sentiments
,
(which we were empowered to give through
the kindness of an able reporter,) but when it came
to the matter of actually putting into office a person
of such accommodating views, the sober farmers had
quietly cast their influence into the other scale,
and elected a candidate who never made a stump
speech in his life.
The very next morning, when Mr. Hay arose
from the breakfast table and laid his hand on the
great Bible as a signal for the commencement of
family worship, that hand dropped powerless at his
side, and he sank helpless, though not insensible,
upon the floor. He tried to speak, wishing to
reassure the terrified family, but no sound emanated
from those revered lips, and in a few moments
more he sank back with closed eyes and the pallor
of death upon his countenance.
It was evidently an apoplectic seizure, and there
was no physician within four miles. The
agonizing
distress of all may be conceived by those who
have witnessed such scenes under such
circumstances
,
but of these the dweller in the
close-packed
city can have but little idea. What then
was the relief of Mrs. Hay, when Seymour asked
to be allowed to bleed Mr. Hay, saying that he had
learned the art with an especial view to such
emergencies
.
He was hailed as a minister of mercy,
and when he performed the office with ease, and
when returning animation was the result, not a
member of the family but could have knelt at his
feet to bless him for the kind forethought which
had prompted him to acquire so inestimable a
knowledge.
When Mr. Hay was in some measure restored, it
was found that his right hand was almost useless,
and that he was otherwise much disabled by this
sudden attack. Seymour attended him constantly,
and was made to hear, oftener than he wished, the
regrets of his kind old friend at thought of that
day's pettishness.
You were right, my boy, and I was wrong, but
you must lay it all to the apoplexy. And here,
you see, I am justly punished by being obliged to
call upon you for aid all day long. But we are poor
helpless creatures, and we who live in the
wilderness
,
above all, must learn to bear with each other's
infirmities, since no one knows whose turn may
come next, and money will not buy what we need.
This is a truth which we are daily made to feel;
mutual kindness is often our sole dependence, and
the character of a good neighbor is the one most
coveted.
Mr. Thurston was often at the bedside of the
invalid, and when he saw him recovering, he at
last asked Seymour if he had come to a decision in
his favor. Here are our friends round us, said
Mr. Thurston, here is thine own fathernow tell
me, may I hope that thy mind is to go with us
and share our lot? Depend on me for doing at
least all I promise.
Seymour cast his eyes round the assembly, and
every look was turned on him. He knew his
father now felt sufficient confidence in him to be
willing he should decide for himself, but he looked
at Mr. Hay, helpless and dependent, and thought
of his growing infirmities, and emotion choked
his utterance.
Thou canst not decide? said Mr. Thurston.
O Seymour! don't go and leavefather
said Caroline Haytears trembling in her
eyes, and Seymour's difficulties were solved in
an instant.
I believe I may be more useful here, said
he to Mr. Thurston, and if more useful more
happy; so I can only return heartfelt thanks for
your generous offer.
Thou art right, undoubtedly, said the Friend,
but I wish my path could have been thine.
* * * * * *
Among the loads of gifts and keepsakes sent
back by Mr. and Mrs. Thurston after they once
more reached their home, was a valuable case of
books for Seymour, and one of more lady-like
reading for Caroline, and with the latter came a
dress so delicately fancied that it would have done
very well to stand up in meeting with, for one
of the plainest of the drab sisterhood. I shall like
to imagine thee dressed in it, dear Caroline, wrote
Mrs. Thurston, and I know it will suit friend
Seymour's
taste right well.
He did not find fault with it certainly, for in
some few months after that time it was worn as a
wedding-dress, and to Seymour at least Caroline
had never looked so beautiful.
* * * * * *
A wedded life begun by an act of virtuous
sacrifice
can scarcely fail to be a happy one. That
complacency of temper which sheds light over the
darkest hour is never more surely nourished than
by the habitual pleasure of doing good and
conferring
happiness. Seymour is Mr. Hay's right hand,
and his influence and that of his fair and gracious
Caroline is a daily blessing to the younger members
of both families. I feel assured that we shall be
able to point to them half a dozen years hence as
a proof that cultivation and refinement are any
thing but lost in the country.
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
But fayrest she when so she doth display
The gate with pearles and rubyes richly dight,
Through which her words so wise do make their way,
To beare the message of her gentle spright.
Spenser.
I hope
the reader has not forgotten Mr.
Sibthorpe
.
If he has, it must be because we have not
succeeded in introducing him so meaningly as we
meant to do. Our acquaintance with him and his
family was one of those short-lived pleasures
which so often gleam upon life's path only to
disappear and leave it darker than before.
I shall give some account of their American
experience
,
because their short story may be
considered
as a sketch of a class which is constantly
becoming more numerous among us. I think them
worth describing, because they were entirely free
from that silly arrogance of which some of their
countrymen who find it convenient to reside in
the United States are justly accused.
Mr. Sibthorpe's person and manner, dress and
ideas were all so thoroughly English, that the
dullest of my countrymen could not bid him good
evening as he passed him on the road in the
twilight
without saying to himself, There goes a John
Bull! Yet so universally popular did he become
by the affability and kindness of his demeanor,
that if he had remained a little longer within reach
of our good-will, it would have gone hard but we
had made him a justice of the peace at the very
least, if not something still more dignified, in
spite of himself.
One peculiarity marked our friend which I think
was never noted of so stout a gentleman before.
He was the most scheming and visionary of men.
His round, shining head was ever full of projects,
great or small, for himself or others. He should
(by rule) have been tall and slender, with all the
indications of the temperament scientifically
designated
as nervous-sanguine; and a head whose
developments should form little hills and dales
upon the cranium. But his kind easiness of
disposition
,
or something else, had rounded out head
and body until there were no inequalities left to
theorize upon. As a still further contradiction,
though almost a Bacchus in contour, he was stoical
in his indifference to personal accommodation and
indulgence. So that we can heartily say, May
his shadow never be less! since the substance
gives him no sort of inconvenience.
When I first visited Mrs. Sibthorpe, I found her
in a small and very inconvenient house, to which
several workmen were engaged in building an
additional
part, on a much more tasteful plan,
although
still in cottage style. All was confusion
and discomfort, as far as household arrangements
were concerned. Every corner was strewed with
boards, bricks, lime, and all the endless list of
etceteras which carpenters and masons take care to
scatter on all sides to give an air of importance to
their business. The floors were uncarpeted and
the windows were hung with paper curtains. The
room was almost unfurnished, for it had not been
judged best to open the boxes of household goods,
which were stored at some distance, until the dirt
and confusion which accompanies building any
where, and in this country above all, should be out
of the way.
The lady, a handsome woman of perhaps thirty
or more, was seated on a rough bench, such as is
sometimes used in farmers' kitchens, giving a lesson
in geography to a pretty little girl, Mr. Sibthorpe's
daughter by a former marriage. A small-sized
globe stood on the bench between them. Mrs.
Sibthorpe's eyes, shaded by a wilderness of ebon
curls, were black, and quick and piercing, and her
speech was correspondingly rapid and decided.
She spoke with a strong English accent, (which
does
not
mean
cockneyism,
whatever some of us
may think,) and her conversation evinced at once
the woman of the world and the romantic
enthusiast
a
rare combination certainly, but in this case
a very delightful one. Her manners were those of
VOL. II. 5
refined and fashionable society; her sentiments
fresh and artless enough for a Swiss mountain girl,
or a native of our own bright West.
She received us with frank cordiality, and with
scarcely a reference to the scene of confusion in
which we found her, though the bench on which
she was sitting formed a tolerably fair specimen of
the whole temporary arrangement. A small
writing-table
,
with implements of bronze and silver,
stood in a corner, and a handsome arm-chair was
wheeled round for me, contrasting oddly enough
with the bare floor and the paper-shaded windows.
But the lady did not need the appliances which are
all in all to the mere fashionable.
She was one in whose company one forgets
chairs and tables. She was not so unwise,
however
,
as to disdain the aid of dress, and, though
surrounded by coarse objects, she herself was
critically nice and lady-like in her appointments;
and she seemed, with her bright smiles and her
animated manner, to irradiate that rude cottage
parlor.
Her table tooI dwell on these things partly
because Mrs. Sibthorpe belonged to a much
calumniated
class of women, who, because they wear
blue stockings occasionally, are supposed not to
know how to wear any other, and partly because
I do love to talk about Mrs. Sibthorpe,the table
was laid with English precision; and although the
fare was plain enough, it was perfectly well served.
Indeed, if I ever envied any body an earthly
possession
,
I certainly envied the Sibthorpes the three
or four English servants who moved like
clockwork
through their several duties, in spite of the
discouraging aspect of things around them.
Something
that looked very much like a carpenter's
bench served as a side table, but it was covered
with delicate damask, and the sober-looking
attendant
used it as gravely as if it had been
mahogany
or marble.
The lady herself had evidently never yet known
any of the solicitudes of an American housekeeper
in the country. Her whole heart was in the
conversation, and the conversation was as far as
possible from all reference to those commonplace
affairs which fill the souls of so many of us. This
was perhaps the more noticeable and enviable to
me, because I amhabitually if not naturally
one whom cares devour, and who finds in the
minute attention required by the impossibility of
being well served in the woods, a dead weight
forever counterbalancing the pleasure to be derived
from the most interesting or brilliant conversation.
This is a weakness, I know,but it finds some
apology in the weakness of others. Who cannot
recollect, among his friends or visitors, some one
who is made utterly uncomfortable by the least
deficiency in the
mnage?
Such people abound
in the United States as well as elsewhere,
people
in whom a taste for physical well-being,
as De Tocqueville defines the foible,has almost
taken the place of all other tastes. To entertain
such people, in this country, with only home-bred
domestics, is a very trying pleasure indeed. Small
philosophy becomes very necessary on both sides.
When Mr. and Mrs. Sibthorpe returned our visit,
they had experienced some difficulties in
consequence
of the marriage of one of the maids with
an excellent man-servant who had been Mr.
Sibthorpe's
factotum, and who now bought land with
his wages, and assumed the position of country
neighbor instead of that of faithful domestic.
However, as the newly-married couple were living
quite near them, they still had the benefit of their
occasional services, and were in the mean time
making diligent inquiry after others, who might at
least be trained to fill their places. Mrs. Sibthorpe
was in fine spirits, boasting that she had learned to
make bread, and was even taking lessons in making
butter; and declaring that she really believed the
best thing that could happen to her would be the
desertion of all her servants in time, in order that
the domestic employments which she felt to be so
rational and so healthful, might become
compulsory
,
at least long enough to oblige her to obtain
an insight into their mysteries.
It was delightful to see her taking her
inoculation
thus kindly, and we found her gaiety and
good-humor
more charming than ever.
The next time we visited Newton Grange we
found its bright-eyed mistress with her sleeves
turned up, making an attempt at a pie. The only
maid who still remained with her was prostrate
with ague, and Mr. Sibthorpe himself had
experienced
a shake or two, and sat in the corner of the
great kitchen fireplace, looking doleful, to be sure.
The account of things was now somewhat shaded.
The bright tints which had been cast upon the
manufacture of bread and butter were dimmed a
little. Mrs. Sibthorpe had laid aside her rings, and
left the papillotes in her ringlets. A dress scarcely
suited to woodland kitchening was defended by an
apron borrowed from the maid. This said maid,
a devoted and excellent creature, had her little bed
in a corner of the kitchen, with the double view
of making the care of her chill days less laborious,
and of aiding her mistress in the household duties,
by suggestions, and hints, and cautions, which were
delivered with most amusing apologies, and
ceaseless
regrets that such business should fall into such
hands. O ma'am,if you pleasethe kettle
is boiling over! dear me! if I could but lift it
off myself! This
hager
is the
hoddest
thing!
yesterday I was quite stoutoh, please, ma'am,
don't scald yourself!O ma'am! I beg your
pardonbut the nasty pig is come in at the
door, and has got at master's gruel!
Mrs. Sibthorpe's spirits were almost as good as
ever, and she found amusement in all the vexatious
crosses of her present lot. Her husband was far
5*
more disturbed. He could not bear to see the
exertions
and sacrifices made by his wife, while he,
only half sick, but quite useless, sat looking on, a
sad and silent cipher.
And all this time no assistance to be procured in
any department. Ague is very impartial in its
visits, and often puts an entire neighborhood down
at once, so that it not unfrequently occurs that
there are not enough able persons in a whole
district
to attend properly to the sick.
CHAPTER XXXIX.
Nor from this deep retirement banished was
Th' amusing care of rural industry.
Oh, let not then waste luxury impair
That manly soul of toil which strings your nerves!
Oh, let not the soft, penetrating plague
Creep on the freeborn mind, and, working there,
With the sharp tooth of many a new-formed want,
Endless and idle all, eat out the heart
Of Liberty * *the swelling wish
For general good erasing from the mind.
Thomson.
After
this seasoning was at an end, and ague
seemed to have worn off, or nearly so, our English
friends began again to enjoy the real pleasures of a
country life, and to gather round them such
additional
means of comfort and convenience as had
been at first unprovided. The new part of the
dwelling was finished, and a sweet, low-browed,
many-sided cottage it was. Furniture came, and
was placed in its appropriate positionsthat is,
appropriate according to Mrs. Sibthorpe's views,
though sadly out of order in the estimation of her
neighbors. A fine piano-forte was drawn from its
hiding-place in a neighboring barn; books in
copious
measure filled every corner of the little nook
called a library. A rustic arbor was constructed in
the garden for Charlotte's especial use, and here
her school-books and her baby-things were
bestowed
,the
arbor having been carefully thatched
to protect the treasures from the weather. A
light open carriage and a pair of ponies were added
to the establishment, and one would have thought
there was little left for plain people to wish for.
But alack for short-sighted humanity! Parlors,
and libraries, and halls, and verandahs, require to be
swept and dusted. An air of slovenliness soon
spreads itself over gardens and shrubberies that are
not duly cared for. Horses exact the most odious
regularity in feeding and currying, and carriages give
very little comfort if we must use them muddy or
wash the mud off with our own hands. A late writer
has advanced the appalling doctrine that there is a
degree of immorality in dismembering one family for
the accommodation of another, i.e., that each family,
while in health, ought to have no greater amount of
domestic business than can be performed by its own
hands. Whether the speculations of this
philosopher
had not yet been communicated to the world,
or whether Mr. and Mrs. Sibthorpe had not
happened
to meet with them, or whether, in spite of
instruction, they still adhered to the old-fashioned
notions of the advantages of a division of labor, I
am not able to say. Certain it is that they found
the want of good domestics a sad drawback on
the comforts of their pleasant house and its
accompaniments
.
The one faithful damsel still kept her
place, and divided herself into as many parts as she
could, but she had ague enough to lessen her
efficiency
not a little, and besides, the more we enlarge
our bounds and increase our conveniences, the more
care and labor do we render necessary.
Many and desperate efforts did Mr. Sibthorpe
make to supply the deficiency. Women were
found who would undertake the business for good
wages, but they were ignorant and must be taught,
proud and must be conciliated. Some would
flounce out of doors and insist on being carried
back to their homes on the discovery that they
were to have a table separate from that of their
employer. Others would swallow this
mortification
for a while, until their own purpose was
answered
the
price of a new dress or a smart
bonnet
perhapsand then call up the latent dignity,
and declare they couldn't stan' it no longer.
These usually took a good deal of pains to make
known far and wide the ground of their
dissatisfaction
;
and it became, after a while, almost
equivalent
to a loss of caste to endure indignities which
so many had spurned.
Then domestics were brought from the city, at
enormously disproportioned expense, and these
invariably
became dissatisfied;some because they
were taught by busy neighbors to feel themselves
in a degraded position, and others for want of
company
and amusement. Poor Mr. Sibthorpe was
almost in despair, but his wife took all cheerily,
and learned to be so good a manager that the
discomforts
of imperfect arrangements were almost
forgotten, and Mr. Sibthorpe acknowledged that a
greater amount of absolute labor than he had
supposed
himself capable of, had really benefited his
health and spirits. To till the soil is tiresome
enough, but it was only pleasure to dig in the
garden
at his wife's solicitation. The care of horses
has its disagreeables; but he could generally hire
some kind of a biped who would attend to the
ponies after his own fashion, and for the restdid
not the daily drive with Florella and Charlotte
through the openings more than compensate for
all the personal supervision which he himself
bestowed
on them?
And so the time wore on, and, for people out of
their element, the Sibthorpes were the happiest
family I ever saw. But it so happened that Mrs.
Sibthorpe, who continued her active life after her
friends thought it would have been prudent to adopt
a more quiet one, was taken ill, unexpectedly, and
while all needful aid was distant and the roads in
their worst state.
The physician was six miles off, and the nurse a
good deal further, and the kindness and sympathy
of some women in the neighborhood were the only
available resource. With these, most happily, our
friend did as well, and perhaps better, than crowned
heads are apt to do in similar straits; and
something
which it is proper to call a fine boy, was
dressed and being fed and toasted when the doctor
arrived. But though all was thus happily over,
Mr. Sibthorpe's anxiety amounted to absolute
anguish
in view of the isolated position in which he
fancied himself. From the fever of solicitude in
which I found him the next day, I can but wonder
that he had not died outright before the physician
and nurse made their appearance. He walked the
floor with a most perturbed step, and wiped his
forehead almost as often as on that burning prairie
where we first met him. He declared that nothing
to be named, of earthly good, would tempt him to
endure
again the anxiety he had suffered; and we could
not but think his feelings very natural, although to
us old settlers they appeared so exaggerated. It
takes time, and something else too, before those
who have been accustomed to deify art can venture
to place confidence in nature. And it must be
allowed that few things are more depressing than
the lack of proper attendance for the sick.
Mrs. Sibthorpe was about very soon after, and
quite absorbed in her new cares, if cares they could
be called, which seemed to be mere recreation. She
was one of those enviable people who accomplish a
great deal without ever seeming busy; and by the
habit of never really losing a minute of time, she
was able to take good care of her baby with very
imperfect aid, and at the same time to find leisure
enough for her favorite pursuits. O! she was a
jewel of a woman, that dear Mrs. Sibthorpe! With
nothing of the pattern woman about her, she was
an example for any body; and yet we must lose
her!
This same difficulty of procuring any thing like
comfortable domestic service grew to be an
intolerable
evil. The cottage, with all its charms,and
they were many,required yet this addition
somebody to keep it clean. Little Dudley was a
treasure, and treasures must have keepers. Our
friend Mrs. Sibthorpe, lovely as she was, and is,
was yet mortal, and must have something to eat,
and Mr. Sibthorpe, though a philosopher, in his
way, was but a man, and had been accustomed to
lean a good deal on his fellow-men. While the
novelty lasted, it did very well to turn menial
labors into play, and split wood and curry the
horses for exercise. But it has always been found
that amusements after a while become tiresome,
and our friends were no exception to the general
rule. Only one of the four people who came with
them to the wilds now remained, and she, though
faithful as gold, had a terrible proneness to ague,
and was given to going beyond her strength as
soon as she was able to do any thing.
After much reluctance and many ingenious
expedients
Mr. Sibthorpe concluded to leave the
cottage
for the winters at least, and make a temporary
sojourn in Detroit, where a moderate amount of
money will buy a goodly number of comforts, and
where there is yet to be found a class of people
who are willing to sing second, for a
consideration
.
Mrs. Sibthorpe sighed and shook her head at this
plan. She would have preferred the dear cottage
with all drawbacks, and she felt assured that after
a while, some of these difficulties would be
overcome
.
But Mr. Sibthorpe's imagination was apt to
run away with him, and in this instance the one
frightful shadow of desertion in sickness had taken
possession of his fancy. He could have been
content
for himself to have lived on mashed
potatoes
without minced veal; but it was
impossible
to attempt to bring up an infant without a
physician at one's elbow. Laugh at this, O ye
thousands of ruddy urchins, whose dancing eyes
light up our forests! how many of you are there
on whom learned leech never looked! whose wild
pulses beat as they list, untouched by the finger of
science!
The thing was settledour regrets were but
too sincere and too natural, for winter is the time
when neighbors are most valuable. At this point
of affairs, two of Mr. Sibthorpe's English relatives
died within a week of each other, and our friend
found himself a rich man, with the necessity of
returning immediately to England. Here was a
dilemmawe did not know whether to be glad
or sorryaffection pleaded both ways.
Mrs. Sibthorpe declared she should never love
VOL. II. 6
any spot on earth so dearly as she did her
American
cottage; but, from what we hear of Dudley
Park, I fancy it will not be natural to sigh after
Newton Grange.
When our dear neighbours reached Newyork on
their way home, they sent us, among other kind
remembrances, a packet of lettersthe same
they had written to friends in the city during
the progress of their first year in the woods.
Knowing your interest in these matters, wrote
Mr. Sibthorpe, I thought you might like to see
the progress of our initiation into things so new to
us, and you are quite welcome to make such use
as you see fit of the quotable parts of these letters,
if you should think they might be of the slightest
use to any body. With this permission I venture
to select such portions of the correspondence as
refer more particularly to the character of forest
life, premising only that the letters were addressed
to a brother-in-law of Mr. Sibthorpe and his wife,
English people who had resided many years in
Newyork.
LETTER I.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
Is it possible, my dear Williamson, that after your
experience of the world's utter hollownessits
laborious pleasures and its heart-wringing
disappointments
you
can still be surprised at my preference
of a country life? you, who have sounded to its
core the heart of fashionable society in the old
world and the new, tested the value of its
friendship
,
and found it less than nothing; sifted its
pretensions of every kind, and expressed a thousand
times your disgust at their falsenessyou think it
absurd in me to venture upon so desperate a plan
as retirement? You consider me as a man who has
taken his last, worst step; and who will soon
deserve
to be set aside by his friends as an
irreclaimable
enthusiast. Perhaps you are right as to the
folly
of the thing, but that remains to be proved; and
I shall at least take care that my error, if it be one,
shall not be irrevocable.
It is true I left England in what you think a
temporary disgust; but the circumstances of
difficulty and vexation which suggested the removal
to America were of any thing but a momentary or
accidental character. It is true that I had been
tolerably successful, but it is also to be recollected
that in pursuance of my favorite plan I retired
earlier
then was warranted by prudence. This step
once taken was irretrievable. I had made choice
of a residence in the vicinity of D, and there,
in the society of a few intimate friends, I hoped to
pass the afternoon of life in the repose which
belongs
to unambitious thoughts, and a sincere though
humble love of letters. And I still think the dream
might have been realized, but that it pleased
the Almighty to take from me the wife of my
bosom; the being to whose companionship the
whole scheme owed its charm, and without whose
society and sympathy I could no longer hope for
happiness. My Charlotte once gone, the whole
aspect
of life was changed. My quiet home, before so
charming, wore an air of gloom which I could not
endure. The very sight of the infant which
remained
to me, gave me almost as much pain as
pleasure. I felt as one might who should see the
last plank slip from his grasp, leaving him to
struggle
unaided on the boundless ocean.
As the bitterness of grief began to soften under
the blessed influence of Time the consoler, I
felt a desire to mingle again with my fellow-men;
to seek in company the solace which my own
fireside
now denied me. I found my friends kindly
anxious to aid my return to cheerfulness and hope,
but a new difficulty soon presented itself. My
fortune
,
though sufficient for the simple and
unambitious
style which had fully satisfied my Charlotte's
wishes and my own, was far inferior to that of my
own family connections. These all lived in a
handsome and hospitable way, and when I began
to mingle with them in the frequent interchange of
visits, I was struck with the difference which
existed
between their establishments and my own.
While Charlotte lived I had never given it a
thought, but now, I was more dependent upon
circumstances, and these things made me
uncomfortable
.
It was a poor grief for a philosopher, I
own; but who has not felt the obstinate force of
petty vexations? I resolved against such unworthy
emulation, and at the same time detected myself in
contriving plans by which this unlucky inferiority
might be rendered less apparent. I felt my
difficulty
to be contemptible, yet it did not the less
disturb the enjoyment that I had hoped to find in
society.
Add to all this that Lord, on whose estate I
lived, and whose propensity to every variety of
ingenious
insolence is as well known to you as to
myself, thought proper to desire my conversion
to his own political views. From the moment
that he found I scorned his insidious bribes, he
became my bitter enemy; and unfortunately he
discovered, in my natural irritability of temper, now
not a little increased, all that he could wish for the
exercise of his petty malice. My life from this
time became intolerable. The consciousness that
I had thrown away the means of placing myself
6*
on a level with my friends, and in a good degree
beyond the reach of my overbearing neighbor,
vexed me to the soul, and at this very juncture,
and while I was boiling under a new insult from
Lord, I met with a considerable lossa loss
which diminished my income materially. My
dear Williamson, can you blame me for coming to
America, where my small means would still enable
me to live comfortably, if not handsomely; and
where I could hope to be always secure from the
insolence of the little great?
I have not thus far been disappointed in the
expectations I had formed of this land of true
liberty and equality. If I have at times wished
for a little more deference in the manners of the
lower classes, I have found even more worth and
dignity in the higher walks of life than I had
anticipated. The difficulty of which many of our
friends have complained as counterbalancing in a
great degree the advantages of a residence in
America,that, I mean, which arises from the want
of good servants,I obviated by bringing with
me from England several faithful domestics, who
serve me with no diminished zeal in the new world.
And on this side the water I have found, as you
well know, a successor to my Charlotte, a successor
worthy to be such; a mother to my daughter, a
friend inestimable to myself; a countrywoman of
my own too, and one whose views of life coincide
in all particulars with mine.
You will perhaps inquire, why, with these
advantages
,
I could not content myself in the city?
Simply because I longed for the freedom and
independence
of the woods. I cannot feel that I have
come to Americadistant, young, wild, new
Americatill I have seen her in her own peculiar
form; till I have learned to know her by those
features which distinguish her so decidedly from
the old world. I feel that the mountain nymph,
sweet Liberty, must be loveliest in her own
national
and characteristic costume. A city life, or a
life made up of city habits, is the same in
essentials
every where. There is the same living for
others rather than one's self; the same emulation
in despicable trifles; the same unmeaning bustle;
the same
gne;
in London, in Paris, in
New-york
,on
a greater or a smaller scale as the case
may be. I am tired of these. I am willing to
give upI will not say forever, for who can
answer for himself?but for a time at least, the
very questionable advantages of a life of
hackneyed
movements and recurring fatigues, for one of
primitive simplicity, of hardy exercise, of
uninterrupted
intellectual culture.
My dear Florella, who has the
single-heartedness
of a child, joined with much originality and
independence of feeling, agrees with me entirely.
She is as anxious as myself for unbroken mornings,
promenades
en deshabille,
and long cheery evenings
ending at ten o'clock. We bring books, music,
and all the means of comfort and employment;
and with these and the cherished correspondence
of a few dear friends (yourself among the number
we count on) we can never be dull even in the
woods which you represent as so ineffably dismal.
I shall give you a token now and then that ennui
has not absolutely devoured us; and I promise to
be honest. I will give you the dark shades of the
picture as well as the sunshine. And you in return
must promise to reform your worldly opinions, and
dress your estimate of comfort after our model in
any degree you shall see fit. Honor bright!
Yours,
T. Sibthorpe
.
LETTER II.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
* * *
Since
my last we have taken up our
abode in the wilderness in good earnest,not in
sober sadness, as you think the phrase ought to
be shaped. There is, to be sure, an insignificant
village within two or three miles of us, but our
house is the only dwelling on our little clearing
the immense trunks of trees, seemingly as old as
the creation, walling us in on every side. There
is an indescribable charm in this sort of solitary
possession. In Alexander Selkirk's case, I grant
that the idea of being monarch of all I survey,
with an impassable ocean around my narrow
empire
,
might suggest some inconvenient ideas. The
knowledge that the breathing and sentient world
is within a few minutes' walk, forms, it must be
owned, no unpleasant difference between our lot
and his. But
with
this knowledge, snugly in the
background, not obtrusive, but ready for use,
comparative
solitude has charms, believe me. The
constant sighing of the wind through the forest
leaves; the wild and various noises of which we
have not yet learned to distinguish one from the
otherdistinct yet softly mingledclearly
audible
,
yet only loud enough to make us remark
more frequently the silence which they seem
scarcely
to disturb, such masses of deep shade that even
in the sunny spots the light seems tinged with
greenthese things fill the mind with images of
repose, of leisure, of freedom, of tranquil happiness,
untrammelled by pride and ceremony;of
unbounded
opportunity for reflection, with the richest
materials for the cultivation of our better nature.
Nothing can be more delicious than the weather
at this season, in this Western country. Italian
skies may be
set
off, perhaps, by relics of ancient
power and splendor, and still more by the
associations
connected with those relics; but I am certain
that even you, scornful skeptic as you are on all
points touching what you are pleased to call rural
fury, could not deny that the deep, transparent
blue which roofs this natural Coliseum, gives out
the outline of yonder towering elm with an
accuracy
a
delicacywhich no Calabrian azure ever
surpassed. The very sun-glints that flash from the
white wings of the eagle which, even as I write,
soars majestically across the sky, are distinctly
visible
,
though the distance is so great as to make the
bird of heaven seem scarce larger than a dove.
But I am forgetting that all this will cost you
numberless
Fudges,
and I will quit the poetical
for the practical at once. Know then, O
common-place
mortal! that the fates have not denied to
your mad friends a tolerably comfortable house;
or rather, (I make the acknowledgment lest you
should be tempted by my descriptions to visit us
before we make our additions, and so accuse me
of delusion or exaggeration,) I confess that the
present house is, more properly, the beginning or
nucleus of a house, than a structure deserving that
title as serving for a gentleman's residence. Yet
here, where no allowance or provision is to be made
for pride, and where there is no necessity for
spending
money to buy the good graces of people who
are nobody to you, and who care as little about
you in return, the house answers our temporary
need tolerably well, having a (so called) parlor; a
kitchen; a bedchamber, of modest dimensions it
is true; a closet for our little Charlotte, and a loft
for Chadwell and the faithful Rose, who is willing
to put up with any thing but the
hodd
ways of
the people. John and Sophy, who, as you know,
have, by the aid of a neighboring justice of the
peace, lately become one, are obliged at present to
find lodging at the house of a neighbor who lives
somewhere within a mile of us, in the depths of the
wood.
On our first arrival, John proposed making an
extempore lodging-room in the barn, on which
occasion
we discovered that this essential addition to
a country house had been quite forgotten in my
survey of Mr. Doolittle's flattering bargain. You
may laugh, but who can think of every thing? and
really, the weather is so fine, that one is almost
independent of roofs and walls. A bivouac
beneath
such skies, would be rather attractive than
appalling.
Some difficulties have attended the transportation
of our movables, and I find too that my estimate
of the must-haves was rather limited. Florella,
who is, you know, of a meditative and abstract turn
of mind, would have thought a still shorter list
might comprise all that was necessary. But she, as
well as myself, will be glad of your friendly aid in
procuring for us certain articles which you will find
enumerated at the close of my letter, and which you
will be so good as to see securely packed, and
forwarded
to the care of Messrs., Detroit. The
piano-forte has not yet arrived, and I confess
myself
at a loss how to bestow it when it does come.
It had not occurred to me, that in a very small
parlor
,
embellished with no less than six doors and
four windows, to say nothing of a staircase and an
immense fireplace, there would be but little space
for large articles of furniture. And the sofa on
which I promised myself many a sweet siesta
during
the hot months, is taking its own rest
undisturbed
in its box, under a shed at some distance
from the house. But we shall soon build, and then
these little inconveniences will be obviated.
Besides
,
are there not sofas of turf? I find them a
more than tolerable substitute when they do not
smell of rheumatism.
In one respect I find myself disappointed. The
wheat lands, which I bought at a large additional
cost in consideration of their being broken up and
planted, wear at present an appearance very little
promising as to the approaching harvest. Wide
strips of unbroken soil intervene between the
scattered
lines of the plough; and if any seed was
sown on these, the solid sward has sent up no
return. The broad field that I survey just now
from the window, bears at least as much
resemblance
to a great green gridiron as the Escurial
does to a stone one. But it is something to feel
one's self a proprietor of the soil, and I anticipate
much pleasure in sending my own wheat to the
mill, be it little or much. I think however I can
now perceive why my friend Mr. Doolittle
complimented
me so highly on the extent of my
agricultural
knowledge, and declared his sentiments on
the subject of farming to agree precisely with my
own.
My letter is already femininely long, yet I must
give you an instance of rustic simplicity which
occurred this morninga verification indeed of
your repeated prediction. A stout youth of twenty
years or so applied for work, stating that he had
hearn tell how the 'squire wanted a hand. I
was glad to obtain an addition to our effective
force, and the bargain was nearly concluded when
our swain broke in with,
I say, uncle! does your hands eat with you?
Conceive of the question if you can, and you will
readily imagine the answer: but you can never
VOL. II. 7
paint to yourself the air with which this untamed
son of the forest turned on his heel, saying with
the utmost coolness,
If I a'n't good enough to eat with ye, I a'n't
good enough to work for ye, that's all!
Think of such companionship for Florella, who,
though a democrat in principle on all important
points, is, in personal habits, quite as fastidious as
one could wish. To me these things would be
matters of indifference, especially where the
contact
was only for a limited period. Mere accidents
in social condition are nothing in themselves; and
I have too high an idea of the dignity of labor to
despise the practical agriculturist, though I may
not relish his manners. But with ladies the case
is different, and I shall never attempt to conform,
in this particular, to the customs of the country,
When John and Sophy get their log-house finished,
they will relieve us from the disagreeable necessity
of boarding hands.
Do not fear such unreasonably long letters in
future
.
I expect to be much occupied with building
and other improvements, and shall hardly have
time to weary you with my favorite topics.
Ever yours,
T.
Sibthorpe
.
LETTER III.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
My dearest Catharine,
Why
have I not written you a dozen letters
before this time? I can give you no decent or
rational apology. Perhaps, because I have had
too much leisureperhaps too many things to
say. Something of this sort it certainly must be,
for I have none of the ordinary excuses to offer
for neglect of my dear correspondent. Think
any thing but that I love you less. This is the
very place in which to cherish loving memories.
But as to writing, this wild seclusion has so many
charms for me, this delicious summer weather so
many seductions, that my days glide away
imperceptibly
,
leaving scarcely a trace of any thing
accomplished
during their flight. I rise in the
morning
determined upon the most strenuous industry.
My broken credit with half a dozen
correspondents
whom I have treated as ill as yourself is to
be entirely redeemed before dinner. For this
purpose
I place my desk before a window that opens
towards the west, and which is consequently
shaded
during all the earlier part of the day. Here do
I seat myself with the resolute air of one who is not
to be tempted from duty. Nothing before me but
huge trees, between whose ancient mossy trunks
no ray of any but soft green light can reach the
moist sward below. The only sound is that of
the sighing wind that scarcely stirs the heavy
verdure
,
yet makes its presence known by a ceaseless
moan resembling almost precisely the soft rush of
summer waves upon a pebbly beach; magic music
any where, and fraught with dreams; but
particularly
so where we feel, as it were, alone in the
august presence of Nature, with nothing to limit
the flights of fancy, and with an unbounded leisure
which seems to promise time for every thing. Pen
in hand, eyes unconsciously exploring the
mysterious
arcades of the forest, behold your friend, her
heart full of affection, and her head of pleasant
musings, still hesitating for materials for an epistle,
which were never to seek while surrounded with
all that is supposed likely to occupy or to distract
the mind.
It may be that I have a lurking doubt of your
sympathy in the strange pleasure with which these
solitudes inspire me;or, possibly, a cowardly
fear of the ridicule that is always attached, by those
who live in the fashionable world, to any thing
which approaches the romantic, whether in
sentiment
or action. A true enthusiast, however, would
rather anticipate your speedy conversion, and, at
worst, why should I dread your kind smiles? You
could not, if you would, make me ashamed of my
happiness, and I am sure you would not if you
could.
* * * * * *
Our way of living just now is odd enough. John's
house is so nearly finished that he and Sophy live
in it and take our work-people as boarders. This
is quite convenient for us, since we could not
obtain laborers on any other terms. But I find
Sophy is sadly missed as the head of domestic
affairs, (I forget whether Mr. Sibthorpe has
mentioned
in any of his numerous and
lengthy
epistles,
that Chadwell has left us and returned to
New-york
,
because she couldn't a-bear the 'orrid beer
as they makes in Michiganthough this her
chosen comforter was manufactured by a
countryman
of her own, who is considered quite an adept
in the art.) Sophy's invention was all in all to Rose,
whose materials are so limited as to require all
Caleb Balderstone's ingenuity in order to set a table
which shall in any degree accord with her ideas of
propriety. Truth to say, I had a very unpractical
idea of what sort of things would be needed for
forest life. I forgot that our habits must be in
some degree the standard, whatever should be the
circumstances, and in planning for a simple country
life, I did not take into account the fact that we
had yet to learn to be country people. I find we
must simplify our habits exceedingly, to make out
at all with the moderate amount of household
conveniences
7*
we thought it necessary to bring with
us. But my good spouse is, as you know,
tant
soit peu
fidgetty about small matters, (he is
looking
over my shoulder even now,) and instead of
simplifying our habits, he is bent upon complicating
our accommodations, as I think very needlessly; for
we have already a list far greater than our
neighbors
,
who, most philosophically, make one thing
answer for a dozen different uses. Sophy has
already caught the spirit of the country, and is
beginning to keep house with a mere handful of
the simplest utensils.
Where we can possibly find places for all the
articles Mr. Sibthorpe has ordered, remains yet
to be discovered. Even after our new buildings
are completed, I fear there will be many very
excellent
and desirable things in the lamentable case
of the Primrose family picture.
We have been very civilly treated by our
neighbors
of the village; and we find several among
them whom we can visit with pleasure. These
seem delighted at having an addition to their little
circle, and we are not at all disposed to exclude the
cultivation of the social feelings from the
enjoyments
of country life. Here will, as I foresee, be
the grand difficulty after all. For want of
congenial
society one is in such danger of becoming
selfenclosed
and unsympathizinga most unlovely,
inhuman, and wicked form of pride, and one which
we must guard against if we would not forfeit our
share of that mercy, which is our only hope, and
which embraces alike the whole human family.
I can already perceive, that for want of this
companionship one may in time become too
bookish
,
too citatory and pedantic, through lack of that
fusion by conversation, which refines and
naturalizes
one's literary stores. One is apt to read too
much, and too miscellaneously. And as to writing,
it is so much more delightful to read other people's
reveries than to put one's own thoughts into words!
Doing nothing has so many charms, that even
writing looks like work, by contrast. The very
idea of an abundance of leisure makes us use our
leisure unprofitably. I have sketched out many
systems of regular employment; but never did
society, even in my gayest days, beguile me of my
resolutions of improvement like the enticing quiet
of the cool woods, with the certainty of long days
of delicious reading and reverie, undisturbed by
visitors and untrammelled by ceremony. I fear my
reformation must wait for rainy weather, since I
can never summon resolution to deny myself the
pleasure of rambling under such skies and such
moonlight as ours.
Dear little Charlotte feels all the delight of this
charming season. Her eyes seem always full of
gentle pleasure, and she often employs herself for
whole hours in weaving wreaths of wild flowers,
and dressing with them a great hollow tree in
which her large doll is seated, looking in its scarlet
frock like the lady in the lobster.
As for your friend my husband, it would require
the pen of De Foe himself to give a just idea of
his occupations, his plans, his expedients; his
ingenuity in contriving, his zeal in executing, the
various conveniences of our new dwelling. But
most surprising is the exemplary patience with
which he endures the many vexations attendant
upon employing workmen who are accustomed to
build according to their own very peculiar ideas,
and who require to be argued, if not persuaded,
into every deviation from the established method
of the neighborhood. For instanceit is difficult
to convince these primitive utilitarians that the
spacing of windows and doors is of any
consequence
;
or that to place the windows of two
stories exactly one over the other can make any
material difference in the appearance of a house. It
took a full hour to make our principal architect
acknowledge that water would run off a roof which
sloped at any less than quarter-pitch. In
passing
through the larger sort of villages in this
Western
world, you will notice comparatively few
proofs of this erratic taste; but the workmen who
content themselves in little isolated settlements are
often almost self-taught, and they frequently unite
farming with their other avocations, so that they
feel comparatively little interest in giving
satisfaction
or acquiring reputation in their several trades.
Nevertheless we feel that these are the people
whom we ought to employ while we live among
them, and we must, in common justice, bear
witness
to their good-humor and their obliging
dispositions
.
They argue, but they quarrel not, which
is something where opposition is so frequent. I
must confess that my indolence would have led me
to give up all the points that Mr. Sibthorpe has so
faithfully contested inch by inch. Indeed I often
run away to escape even the echo of one of these
interminable argumentations.
The result of all will be, I believe, a pretty
cottage
,
built without the violent contravention of any
of the ordinary rules, yet presenting an exterior of
rustic plainness, suited at once to its position in the
wild woods, and to the limited purse of the
proprietor
.
If we want pillars and arches, and corridors
and cloisters, we have them all close at hand, built
by mighty Nature, and ready to put to shame man's
puny efforts at imitation. This architecture never
tires. To me at least it is always new and
delightful
;
at once satisfying the eye, exciting the
imagination
,
and filling the soul with the most profound
sense of the presence of the divine Author.
Nature herself, it seems, would raise
A minster to her Maker's praise!
Nor for a meaner use ascend
Her columns, or her arches bend.
I am sure even your cloudless gaiety would feel
and own the sense of solemn awe which these
ancient shades are so well calculated to inspire.
But I must recollect, too, that you may very
possibly
weary of it as a theme, in my hands especially
so I spare you.
Write me soon and often, and pray write
yourself
out,
as I have done, or I shall learn to be
ashamed of my enthusiasm and may egotism.
Yours ever,
F.S.
LETTER IV.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
My dear Williamson,
July 15th
.
I hoped
to have been before this time so
deeply engaged with studs and siding, casings and
cornice, that letter-writing would have been out of
the question. But my lumber is at the saw-mill, and
all the horses in the neighborhood are too busy to
be spared for my service. I must have, of course,
horses of my own, but it is necessary first to build
a stable, so that I am at present dependent on
hiring them when necessary. This, I begin to
perceive, will cause unpleasant delays, since each
man keeps no more horses than he needs for his
own purposes. Here is a difficulty which recurs
at every turn, in the country. There is nothing like
a division of labor or capital. Every body tills the
ground, and, consequently, each must provide a
complete equipment of whatever is necessary for
his business, or lose the seasons when business
may be done to best advantage. At this season,
in particular, this difficulty is increased, because
the most important business of the year is crowded
into the space of a few months. Those who hire
extra help at no other period, now employ as much
as they are able to pay, which increases much the
usual scarcity of laborers. It is the time of year,
too, when people in new countries are apt to be
attacked
by the train of ills arising from marsh
miasmata
,
and this again diminishes the supply of able
hands.
I confess that this view of the obstacles to a
comfortable
outset in rural life had not occurred to me,
though I recollect having been struck by an
observation
of Sir Walter Scott in a letter to a friend
who was looking towards a country life; that if
one wants a bowl of milk, in the country, it is
necessary to keep a cow; while in the city you
need not buy a pennyworth more than you require.
I have cause to feel the practical good sense of this
observation twenty times a day, since we are
discovering
a thousand wants which have always
heretofore been so regularly and so easily supplied,
that we did not remember that they were wants.
Florella, who has never taken much interest in
household matters, finds only amusement in these
various deficiencies and inconveniences, as well as
in poor Rose's ludicrous perplexities and solemn
disapprovals of every thing to which she has been
unaccustomed. Rose declares against the people
and their ways, which she pronounces the
oncivilizedest
in the world, quite unaware all the time
that she herself is utterly incapable of one sentence
of pure English. I wish you could have seen her
yesterday, when a little boy came to me, without
salutation of any sort, with,
I say! what do you guess about lending me
your axe for a spell? Do you reckon you can
spare it?
I think but little of these instances of rusticity,
but I must say that the example of entire want of
personal deference, which is customary here, has
already some influence upon the manners of my
own peoplealways excepting Rose, who is too
devoted a creature to be spoiled by any example. I
can perceive that John and Sophy, who are
beginning
,
since their marriage, to feel something of
a separate and selfish interest, are not quite so
respectful in manner as before, although in their
services I have nothing to complain of. This is to
be expected, I know, but it is not pleasant in proof.
Little Charlotte is the person most disturbed by
the delay in our building operations. Children are
always longing for something new, and can
appreciate
none of the obstacles which often thwart our
best-laid plans. She wonders why papa cannot
build a pretty log-house, like John's, which she is
never weary of extolling. In truth I, who am
obliged almost to rest on my oars, look at John's
rapid progress with a feeling akin to envy. He
has but borrowed a few days' work of his
neighbors
,
which he is to repay in kind when called
upon; and with this slight aid to his own good
arm, his neat little dwelling is almost finished,
while mine, simple as it is to be, must wait the
VOL. II. 8
convenience of others, whom I am ready to pay
well for their services.
It is really surprising, the advantage which a
capacity for manual labor bestows, in a state of
society
like this. Money is comparatively ineffectual,
where there is no competitionwhere your
laborers
are sure that if you discharge them you can get
no others, and that the pay must ultimately fall into
their hands; any trifle is permitted to stand in the
way of serving you. But it would not do thus to
disappoint a neighbor, whose assistance you may
require upon some occasion of great haste or
importance
so
that here, as in other cases, the
strong-handed
have the best of it.
It is often supremely vexatious to find that
people will exercise their judgment as to whether
your occasion for despatch is as pressing as their
own, or as that of some neighbor. Even after
making a positive engagement to help you (for
pay) it is no uncommon thing to find your
workman
turning his back on you and his promise for a
while, having made up his mind that you can wait
better than others. Thus one has the double care
of making a bargain and inducing the other party
to keep it when made. It is no uncommon thing
to make a bargain and then hire it to be kept. I
must acknowledge there is, from some cause, a
laxity of morals on this same point of
bargain-making
.
While more ready than the people of
older countries to give gratuitous aid to each other
in straits and difficultiesmore inclined to be
generousour backwoods neighbors are less
observant
of their engagementsjustice being a far
less attractive and popular quality. They like a
little show about their virtues, like the world on a
larger scale. You know I promised you the shades
of the picturebut to return to the pointwhat
was it? Oh! John's house.
Charlotte is especially charmed with John's
chimney
.
It is so like baby-house buildingslender
sticks crossing each other at right angles in such a
manner as to form a hollow squareand this
carried up entirely on the outside of the house; it
has quite a gimcrack air. What Charlotte's
opinion
will be when she sees the whole finished
within
and without by a thick plastering of mud, I
cannot say. Even the house whose neat rustic
appearance so charms her, has to be chinked and
mudded, i. e. have its interstices filled first with
slender strips of wood and then with wet clay,
bountifully bestowed, to keep out the wintry
blasts. The cottage, after all, will really be a
pretty object in our prospect; for John, with an
attempt at taste not very common except among
English settlers here, has continued his roof down
on both sides so as to form a narrow verandah,
which he intends to ornament with vines; and he
has also a small enclosure in front of the house,
where roses of all hues are to make it look as much
like home as possible. By the way, what think
you of intensifying the odor of the rose by
planting
onions (!) around its root? Who knows but
this may be, after all, the true source of the power
of the Persian attar? If this were proved, what an
elegant way of making one's fortune!
I had intended that my garden should have been
at least laid out and partly planted this summer, but
I fear the lack of suitable laborers will prevent this
entirely. I have a strong desire to make an
experiment
in the manufacture of sugar from the stalks of
Indian corn, which was tried in some parts of
Germany
,
but relinquished, being found unprofitable.
I think the sun of Germany has not the power
which we experience in this level peninsula during
the three summer months. And if the summers
are to be ordinarily as hot as this one, I am certain
the hardy sorts of the olive which are raised in the
Crimea may be advantageously cultivated in this
warm soil. You will smile, I day say, (for I have
not forgotten our old topic of castle-building,) but
when I succeed in supplying the market with
Western olive oil, you may perhaps change your
note. I must be speedy however, for I am told the
oil expressed from sun-flower seeds is likely to
prove a formidable competitor.
I lack nothing but the ring of Solomon, with its
power of summoning attendant genii. When I
get this, or a substitute for it in the shape of half
a dozen stout fellows with heads on their shoulders,
you shall not laugh at my dreams, for they will
then become realities.
Meanwhile forget not the vulgar household goods
you are to procure for us. We wait anxiously the
intelligence of their departure for the West. This
letter is absolutely a congeries of atoms; but you
insisted upon my being minute, and declared that
nothing in the experience of a settler could be
uninteresting to youso blame me not. I have
jotted down every thing that occurred to me
without an attempt at form or order. All due
salutations from Florella and,
Yours truly,
T. Sibthorpe.
8*
LETTER V.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
My Dearest Catharine,
I studied
your last in the cool morning
hour which I often devote to a ramble over the
wooded hills which rise near our little cottage. I
seated myself on a fallen tree, in a spot where I might
have mused all day without seeing a human face,
or hearing any sound more suggestive of
civilization
than the pretty tinkling of the numerous bells
which help to find our wandering cattle. What a
place in which to read a letter that seemed as if it
might have been written after a stupid party, or in
the agonies which attend a spent ball. (Vide T.
Hood.) Those are not your real sentiments, my
dear Kate; you do not believe life to be the scene
of ennui, suffering, or mere endurance, which you
persuaded yourself to think it just then. If I
thought you did, I should desire nothing so much
as to have your hand in mine for just such a
ramble
and just such a lounge as gave me the
opportunity
for reflecting on your letter; I am sure I could
make you own that life has its hours of calm and
unexciting, but high enjoyment. With your
capabilities
,
think whether there must not be
something
amiss in a plan or habit of being that
subjects
you to these seasons of depression and
disgust
.
Is that tone of chilling, I might say killing
ridicule, which prevails in certain circles, towards
every thing which does not approach a
particular
arbitrary standard, a wholesome one for our
mental condition? I believe not; for I have never
known one who adopted it fully, who had not at
times a most uneasy consciousness that
no one
could
possibly be entirely secure from its stings. Then
there is a restless emulation, felt in a greater or less
degree by all who have thrown themselves on the
arena of fashionable life, which is, in my sober
view, the enemy of repose. I am not now
attempting
to assign a cause for that particular fit of
the blues which gave such a dark coloring to the
beginning of your letter. I am only like the
physician
who recalls to his patient's mind the
atmospheric
influence that may have had an unfavorable
effect upon his symptoms. You will conclude I
must have determined to retort upon you in some
degree the scorn which you cannot help feeling for
the stupidity of a country life, by taking the first
opportunity to hint that there are some evils from
which the dweller in the wilds is exempt. On the
other hand, I admit that in solitude we are apt to
become mere theorists, or dreamers, if you will.
Ideal excellence is very cheap; theory and
sentiment
may be wrought up to great accuracy and
perfection
;
and it is an easy error to content ourselves
with these, without seeking to ascertain whether we
are capable of the action and sacrifice which must
prove that we are in earnest. You are right,
certainly
,
in thinking that in society we have occasion
for more strenuous and energetic virtues; but yet,
even here, there is no day which does not offer its
opportunities for effort and self-denial, and in a very
humble and unenticing form too. But we shall
never settle this question, for the simple reason that
virtue is at home every where alike; so I will
spare you further lecture.
Do not give yourself the least uneasiness lest I
should become a mere book-woman. I have no
idea of making myself so tiresome, as I will soon
convince you when you come and shine upon our
shades, or when I crawl forth timidly into your
lamplight at some future day. There is an
excellent
hint in a comic song I picked up
somewhere
,founded
on fact, I doubt not,
There was
ink
on her thumb when I kissed her hand.
I would forswear the pen and all its concomitants
rather than subject myself to such an imputation.
But even you allow that a lady may be literary, if
she can keep the fact profoundly secret, so I suppose
I may occasionally venture upon the Black Sea if I
put on gloves. You remember Mr., who
always
wrote in gloves, lest he should write too fair
a hand for a gentleman. We thought he could
not have been particularly solicitous on that point;
but I have my suspicions that he was more afraid
of the pollution of a chance ink-spot upon his
lily-white
fingers. How he used to sit admiring them!
You say my pleasures are ideal;my dearest dear,
are your own less so? Take away from your
happiness
all that touches upon the imaginative, and
you leave a duller sound than that which you
suppose to be our fate in the woods. Imagination
heightens every pleasure, and we give way to its
illusions with more completeness in the country.
The uniformity which you represent to yourself as
so tiresome, is conducive to an equality of mental
temperament which certainly is one of the materials
of happiness. If calmness of mind preserve beauty,
you will find me any thing but faded, as you
prophesy
.
Take care of late hours and wasplike waists,
and artificial modes of life in all respects! If I find
your
bloom decayed prematurely, I shall have a
powerful argument against you.
I do own to a feeling of envy at your description
of Madame's concert. The lack of fine
music
is a real evil, and an irremediable one here. It
is one of the pleasures which is to be sought far
from home. But I hear a concert every morning
from my favorite seat on the other side of the hill,
where I look down upon a circular hollow, so shut
in by hills on every side, and so shaded by great
oaks, that it seems always twilight there, except at
noon. I do not speak now of the concert of
innumerable
birds, which you would, I know, condemn as
commonplace. This is so universal at this season
that one almost forgets its sweetness. But in
addition
to this endless variety of soaring trebles, I have
from my rustic throne a bass of such peculiar
character and force, that I doubt whether any thing
but a trombone could match it for depth, while it
would require a dozen other instruments to
imitate
its other characteristics. It proceeds from the
centre of the hollow where the brilliant green and
rich luxuriance of the long grass betray the presence
of water, though it is only here and there that a
small glassy streak, throws back the sunbeams.
This cool retreat seems to be the home of all the
frogs that were banished from Ireland, and they
have at times the air of berating the cruel
expatriation
in no measured terms. The prevailing tone is
the rich bass I have mentioned; another resembles
the creaking of a grindstone, and still others the
ceaseless rattling of cog wheels in a cotton
manufactory
;
the water vibrating all the while, I suppose
by the action of indefatigable throats. At times it
is so like a scolding match that I cannot forbear
laughing aloud, solitary as I am; and you can't
think how startling one's own laugh is, when alone
in the presence of nature.
You wish to know how domestic affairs are
going on in this land of equality. Easily enough
in one sense, you may be sure, while I am
nominally
at the head. I rather think that certain
cherished
observances drop away one by one, almost
unmissed; but I see nothing very essential in these
changes. Rose groans over the deficiencies in the
kitchen, as well as over the hokkerd ways of a
damsel who is now under her training hand; but
she is learning to require fewer conveniences, and
still manages to keep us very comfortable; and as
to the poor girl, I think she has the worst of it. If
you could overhear, as I do occasionally, the
ceaseless
clatter of Rose's exaggerated English, you
would pity, I am sure, the unaccustomed ears of
the woodland lassie. The poor child has been
brought up in a log-house of the smallest size,
whose single room serves for all purposes of cooking,
eating, and sleeping, and whose cupboard contains
all that she supposes necessary for the comfort of
any body's household. It is but small matter of
surprise then that she should be disposed to take
always the article that comes to her hand first,
whatever be the occasion she requires it for, and
each and every instance of this very pardonable
blunder
comes over poor Rose with all the surprise of
novelty, and calls down upon staring Polly a clatter
which makes her look as she might if she had
incautiously
touched the string of a shower-bath. I
think she will fly before a great while. I am sure
I should, let the maternal nest be what it might.
But I am a poor hand to attempt to give the
minute account of these matters which you seem
to desire. You always suspect me when I give
you the sunny side, and I see very little of any
other. If you would know the particulars of the
business part of forest life, I shall appoint Mr.
Sibthorpe secretary for the home department. He
has unwearied patience for these details, and I
believe
feels authorized to bestow all their tediousness
upon your good husband.
I must tell you, however, of a quilting which I
did not share with Mr. Sibthorpe, though I wished
for him many times during the afternoon. It was
held at the house of a very tidy neighbor, a Mrs.
Boardman, the neatness of whose dwelling and its
outworks I have often admired in passing. She
invited all the neighbors, and of course included my
unworthy self, although I had never had any other
acquaintance than that which may be supposed to
result from John and Sophy's having boarded with
her for some time. The walking being damp, an
oxcart
was sent round for such of the guests as had
no team of their own, which is our case as yet.
This equipage was packed with hay, over which
was disposed, by way of
musnud,
a blue and white
coverlet; and by this arrangement half a dozen
goodly dames including myself found reclining
room, and were carried at a stately pace to Mrs.
Boardman's. Here we found a collection of
women
busily occupied in preparing the quilt, which
you may be sure was a curiosity to me. They
had stretched the lining on a frame, and were
now laying fleecy cotton on it with much care;
and I understood from several aside remarks which
were not intended for the ear of our hostess, that
a due regard for etiquette required that this
laying
of the cotton should have been performed
before
the arrival of the company, in order to give
them a better chance for finishing the quilt before
tea, which is considered a point of honor.
However, with so many able hands at work,
the preparations were soon accomplished. The
batts were smoothly disposed, and now
consenting
hands, on either side,
Induced a splendid cover, green and blue,
Yellow and red
wherein stars and garters, squares and triangles,
figured in every possible relation to each other,
and produced, on the whole, a very pretty
mathematical
piece of work, on which the eyes of Mrs.
Boardman rested with no small amount of womanly
pride.
Now needles were in requisition, and every
available
space round the frame was filled by a busy
dame. Several of the company being left-handed,
or rather ambidexter, (no unusual circumstance
here,) this peculiarity was made serviceable at the
corners, where common seamstresses could only sew
in one direction, while these favored individuals
could turn their double power to double account.
This beginning of the solid labor was a serious time.
Scarcely a word was spoken beyond an occasional
request for the thread, or an exclamation at the
snapping
of a needle. This last seemed of no
infrequent
VOL. II. 9
occurrence, as you may well suppose,
when you think of the thickness of the materials
and the necessity for making at least tolerably
short stitches. I must own that the most I could
accomplish for the first hour was the breaking of
needles, and the pricking of my fingers, in the vain
attempt to do as I was bid, and take my stitches
clear through.
By and by, it was announced that it was time
to rolland all was bustle and anxiety. The
frame had to be taken apart at the corners, and two
of the sides rolled several times with much care,
and at this diminished surface we began again with
renewed spirit. Now all tongues seemed loosened.
The evidence of progress had raised every body's
spirits, and the strife seemed to be who should talk
fastest without slackening the industry of her
fingers
.
Some held
tte  tte
communications with
a crony in an under tone; others discussed matters
of general interest more openly; and some made
observations at nobody in particular, but with a
view to the amusement of all. Mrs. Vining told
the symptoms of each of her five children through
an attack of the measles; Mrs. Keteltas gave her
opinion as to the party most worthy of blame in a
late separation in the village; and Miss Polly Mittles
said she hoped the quilt would not be scant of
stitches, like a bachelder's shirt.
Tea-time came before the work was completed,
and some of the more generous declared they would
rather finish it before tea. These offers fell rather
coldly, however, for a real tea-drinker does not feel
very good-humored just before tea. So Mr.
Boardman
drove four stout nails in the rafters over head,
corresponding in distance to the corners of the quilt,
and the frame was raised and fastened to these, so
as to be undisturbed and yet out of the way during
the important ceremony that was to succeed. Is it
not well said that necessity is the mother of
invention
?
A long table was now spread, eked out by boards
laid upon carpenters' horsesand this was
covered with a variety of table-cloths, all shining
clean however, and carefully disposed. The whole
table array was equally various, the contributions, I
presume, of several neighboring log-houses. The
feast spread upon it included every variety that
ever was put upon a tea-table; from cake and
preserves to pickles and raw cabbage cut up in
vinegar. Pies there were, and custards, and sliced
ham, and cheese, and three or four kinds of bread.
I could do little besides look, and try to guess out
the dishes. However, every thing was very good,
and our hostess must have felt complimented by
the attention paid to her various delicacies. The
cabbage, I think, was rather the favorite; vinegar
being one of the rarities of a settler's cabin.
I was amused to see the loads of cake and pie
that accumulated upon the plates of the guests.
When all had finished, most of the plates seemed
full. But I was told afterwards that it was not
considered civil to decline any one kind of food,
though your hostess may have provided a dozen.
You are expected at least to try each variety. But
this leads to something which I cannot think very
agreeable.
After all had left the table, our hostess began to
clear it away, that the quilt might be restored to its
place; and as a preliminary, she went all round to
the different plates, selecting such pieces of cake as
were but little
bitten,
and paring off the half
demolished
edges with a knife, in order to replace
them in their original circular position in the dishes.
When this was accomplished, she assiduously scraped
from the edges of the plates the scraps of butter
that had escaped demolition, and wiped them back
on the remains of the pat. This was doubtless a
season of delectation to the economical soul of
Mrs. Boardman; you may imagine its effects upon
the nerves of your friend. Such is the influence
of habit! The good woman doubtless thought she
was performing praiseworthy action, and one in
no wise at variance with her usual neat habits;
and if she could have peeped into my heart, and
there have read the resolutions I was tacitly
making
against breaking bread again under the same
auspices, she would have pitied or despised such a
lamentable degree of pride and extravagance. So
goes this strange world.
The quilt was replaced, and several good
housewives
seated themselves at it, determined to see it
out. I was reluctantly compelled to excuse
myself
,
my inexperienced fingers being pricked to
absolute rawness. But I have since ascertained
that the quilt was finished that evening, and placed
on Mrs. Boardman's best bed immediately; where
indeed I see it every time I pass the door, as it is
not our custom to keep our handsome things in the
background. There were some long stitches in it,
I know, but they do not show as far as the road;
so the quilt is a very great treasure, and will
probably
be kept as an heir-loom.
I have some thoughts of an attempt in the
patchwork line myself. One of the company
at Mrs. Boardman's remarked that the skirt of the
French cambric dress I wore would make a
splendid quilt. It is a temptation certainly.
Mr. Sibthorpe's vexations and trials with his
workmen are neither few nor small, but I shall
leave the description for his pen. We never
enjoyed
better health, for which I fear we are not as
thankful as we ought to be for so great a blessing.
Kind love to all, from
Yours, ever,
F. S.
9*
LETTER VI.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
August
20.
Next
to seeing yourself, my dear Williamson,
I can scarcely think of any thing that would have
afforded me more pleasure than the sight of a friend
of yours bearing credentials under your hand and
seal. And over and above this title to my esteem,
Mr. Ellis brings with him an open letter of
recommendation
in that very handsome and pleasing
countenance of his, and a frank and hearty manner
which put us quite at ease with him directly,
notwithstanding
a certain awkward consciousness of
the narrowness of our present accommodations,
which might have made a visit from any other
stranger rather embarrassing. His willingness to be
pleased, his relish for the amusing points of the
half-savage state, and the good-humor with which
he laughed off sundry rather vexatious
contre-temps
really endeared him to us all. Half a dozen
men of his turn of mind for neighbors, with wives
of kindred strain, would create a paradise in
these woods, if there could be one on earth.
He chose the early morning hour to drive over
from, in a light, open carriage, and reached
here soon after our lazy breakfast, in raptures with
the fine natural road, the soft beauty of the scenery,
and the delicious temperature of the lone and
solemn
old woods through which he passed. He is
an enthusiast in scenery, and as soon as we
discovered
this, we felt easy as to the homely aspect of
things within doors. While we have such grand
avenues and cloistered promenades for the
entertainment
of our city guests, we may consent
without
scruple to receive their visits, sure that they
can never surpass us in points of architectural
grandeur, luxurious divans, or mossy carpets.
By the wayI attempted to analyze, for
curiosity's
sake, the slight feeling of embarrassment
which beset me at first sight of Mr. Ellis. It could
of course have no reference to our real standing in
his estimation; for I knew he must be well
acquainted
with all that is to be known of us both as
to character and condition, and that the mere
outward
aspect of a temporary residence could have
no influence upon his opinion. So that it could
not be the vulgar dread of not appearing genteel
to a stranger. I was obliged to refer my sensations
to a jealousy for the honor of rural life. I was
unwilling
that a man of Mr. Ellis's stamp should be
led to think we had already become coarse, or
rather accustomed and reconciled to coarseness, by
a residence in this rough new country. This was,
as nearly as I could guess, the true ground of my
sudden consciousness of the rough appearance of
things about us. Before Mr. Ellis came, I thought
we were getting on very well, but the sight of an
elegant stranger brought to mind a thousand
deficiencies
that we had forgotten. I was saying,
before I turned aside to give you this glimpse of
my inward thoughts, that we relied on out-door
attractions in entertaining Mr. Ellis. As to other
matters we cannot boastas
par exemple
.
We were seated with your pleasant friend at an
early dinner, when word was brought that a man
without had a nest of young bears that he wished
to dispose of. We had not the least desire for such
pets, characteristic as they would be at present;
but we all wished to have a peep at them; and so,
without ceremony, every body quitted the table,
and ran to the back-yard, where the bear-merchant
waited very impatiently. There were no less than
four of those charming creatures, packed in a coarse
basket, to the sides of which they were chained; so
that when the owner set the basket on the grass,
and poked up its occupants a little, they all pulled
in different directions, or dragged each other about,
and then fell to biting and scratching in revenge
for their frequent tumbles. This was amusing
enough for a few moments, but did not detain us
long, for the dinner was only begun; and we had
a long drive in contemplation for the afternoon.
We returned to the parlor to behold the strangest
sight! We had forgotten the intrusive habits of
the chickens, and so had left the table unguarded
and the doors and windows open; and there were
at least a dozen of these creatures in full possession
of the table, helping themselves from our plates
with a nervous haste that betokened an evil
conscience
.
Nothing escaped their ravenous appetites.
The very
dbris
of their brothers and cousins were
not sacred from their cannibalish propensities. A
plate of butter, upon which Rose had exhausted
her decorative powers, was pecked into the
similitude
of an iceberg; and potatoes were scattered on
every side, like shot after a battle. Some of the
intruders, not having been able to make good a
footing on the table, had condescended to the floor;
carrying every one a slice of bread or a bit of meat
with him. Such a mess you can never picture to
yourself, until you have lived in the woods, and
been subject to the irruptions of the fowls.
Where is your poultry-yard? methinks I hear
you say. Alas! Echo might answer, Where! if
Echo were not tired of replying to such questions.
It is at least six weeks since I engaged the proper
materials at the saw-mill, but the poor miller's dam
was carried away by a freshet, and by
over-exerting
himself in attempting to repair it, he took the
agueso what could I do but wait?
But what did you do for dinner? Mrs.
Williamson
says. This query is more easily answered.
Our drive was all planned, and it was voted
impossible
to await the result of another cooking
process. The side-table having fortunately eluded
the horny noses of our invaders, from its being
covered with a napkin, we made a very delicate
repast on West India preserves with cream and
biscuits
.
But after the said drive had been
accomplished
,
and the fresh air and the exhilarating
exercise
had revived the sacred rage, we called that
light meal lunch, and had a substantial dinner at a
fashionable hour, and probably (for I did not
inquire
)
at the expense of some of our ravenous foes.
And to have seen the good-humored facility with
which Mr. Ellis helped to laugh off our
perplexities
,
and the awkwardness which one cannot but
feel, spite of philosophy, in such cases, one might
have supposed him one who had never breathed
the air of courts, but who had been all his days
accustomed to the shifts and expedients of an
emigrant's
life.
We insisted on his remaining for the night, if
only for the sake of saying that he had slept in a
box; namely, the one which once served to
envelop
a parcel of chairs, and which now fills the
office of a spare bedstead. Mr. Ellis declares that
he never slept more soundly, and I can well believe
it, for he had earned a good night's rest by his
exertions
in threading the farm and the country round
it, during the whole day.
* * * * * *
As we sat at breakfast in the morning, an old
man, one of our good neighbors, came in with a
long-handled dipper, and asked if we kept lightning
in the house.
No indeed! said Mrs. Sibthorpe, looking of
course somewhat puzzled.
Why, do tell! said the old man. But
may be you don't know what it is,if you don't,
I'll bet you a cookie you can't guess.
We all tried. Florella's guess was gunpowder,
Mr. Ellis's, oil,mine, candles.
The old man laughed.
No, no, said he, you haven't come within
rifle distance! Why, it's emptins! My woman
wants to set some griddles, and she took a notion
she must have risin' to put in 'em.
How is the good lady? asked Mrs. Sibthorpe.
She! you couldn't kill her with a meat-axe!
She's real savage upon vittles since this last turn
of agur. I'd sooner board an Irishman! There's
no whoa to her, when once she gits a goin' upon
pork!
And our friend took up his lightning and
departed
,
without the ceremony of good morning.
* * * * * *
As I was showing Mr. Ellis the piece of land
which I intend planting with
morus multicaulis,
he called my attention to a fragment of fine
bituminous
coal which he had turned up with his foot.
The land hereabout is not what is usually
considered
as a coal formation, but I should not be at all
surprised to discover a stray stratum. The state is
known to abound in coal. I think I shall make
some small examination either this autumn or early
next spring. At present, laborers are too precious
to be spared for any new plan. I begin to fear we
shall not be ready to plaster before the frosts set
in. We met with an accident the other day,
which, though of no great consequence in pecuniary
amount, will necessarily delay us somewhat. I had
purchased a quantity of green lumber, which was to
be kiln-dried before it was fit for use. But, by some
unaccountable accident, the whole took fire and was
consumed while the workmen were gone to dinner.
So I have either to send a great distance for
seasoned
materials, or to wait the repairing of the
milldam
,
and then the chance of another attempt at
kiln-drying. I think I shall prefer the former mode,
although it is much more expensive; since time is
just now of more consequence than money. The
conflagration cost me about two hundred dollars.
A smaller disaster was the loss of a quantity of
lime which was on its way from a place about
fifteen miles off. The teamster was benighted,
and obliged to stop for the night at a log-tavern,
owing to the extreme darkness caused by an
approaching
storm. The wagon, with its load of lime,
was placed under a shed, and my man went quietly
to sleep, lulled doubtless all the sooner by the
pleasant pattering of the shower. About midnight
all were awakened by a sudden blaze of light, and
it was found that the lime, not having been
protected
from the wet by the leaky shed, had set all
on fire, and it was only by great exertion that the
house was saved. So I was obliged, not only to
put up with the loss of the lime, but to satisfy the
teamster for the damage done to his wagon, as
well as the tavern-keeper for the loss of his shed.
One learns something by these things, though at a
rather costly rate.
You have gathered doubtless from my sketches
of affairs in general, that I, who came here for
boundless leisure, am the busiest of men. It is even
so, but I find much to interest me. I read no
books, it is true, but I am continually turning some
new leaf in the book of life, and the study of
human
nature. Mrs. Sibthorpe is not very well, but
she is in fine spirits; and Charlotte is as brown and
as happy as a gypsy, and with the same reason;
health, unbounded freedom, and a life in the open
air. A little companion or two would leave her
nothing to desire; but even this deficiency she
scarcely feels; for her mother is of that cheerful
facility of temper which makes her good company
for any body.
We are all embrowned beyond belief. I am
always, you know, something of a bonze in figure;
now I am a bronze in complexion. Conceive the
attractions of a bronze bonze!
Under any color however,
Ever truly yours,
T. Sibthorpe
.
VOL. II. 10
LETTER VII.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
September
1
st
.
A letter
is certainly your due, my dear
Catharine
;
but yours of some fortnight since,all kind,
and lively, and sympathizing, and
conceding,
as it
is,deserves a better reply than this dripping sky
will help me to indite. Why is it that I, who ever
loved so dearly a rainy day in town, find it
suggestive
ofnot melancholyfor melancholy and
I are strangersbut of stupid things, in the
country
?
To account for the difference drives me into
the region of small philosophies. In the one case
there is the quiet that bustle has made precious,
the leisure which in visiting weather one is apt to
see slip from one's grasp unimproved; a contrast
like that which we feel on turning from the dusty
pathway into the cool shadea protected shade,
as of a garden, where one locks the gate and looks
up with satisfaction at high walls, impassable by
foot unprivileged. In the otherthe contrary
casewe have leisure in sunshine as well as
leisure
in the rain; we have abundance of quiet at all
seasons, and no company at any, so that when the
rain comes it can but deprive us of our accustomed
liberty of foot. The pattering sound so famed for
its lulling powers is but too effectual when it falls
on roofs not much above our heads; and the
disconsolate
looking cattle, the poor shivering fowls
huddled together under every sheltering covert, and
the continuous snore of cat and dog as they doze
on the matsall tend towards our infectious
drowsiness, that is much more apt to hint the
dreamy sweetness of a canto or two of the Faery
Queene, than the duteous and spirited exercise of
the pen, even in such service as yours. Yet I have
broken the spell of
Sluggish Idleness, the nurse of sin.
by the magic aid of a third reading of your letter.
And now I defy even the
Ever drizling raine upon the lofte,
Mixt with a murmuring winde.
I have forsaken the sofa, and put up the pretty
mignon
volume of Spenser, your own gift, and now
I set out resolutely to say nothing at all, in
sufficient
expansion to cover this fair sheet.
To begin with the beginning of our cottage
affairs look more promising. We have had our
raising, and within a week the building has
assumed a hopeful distinctness of outline. Two
new carpenters have been procured from, a
great way off; and two masons with their
assistants
;
and some lime to replace that which chose
to burn itself up a few weeks since. Oh, we are
certainly getting on finely! The raising was quite
a sight, I assure you, and the rustic feast with
which it concluded had much of interest for us. I
watched every step of the former, and felt some
desire to preside at the latter; but Mrs. Boardman,
at whose house it was held, understood the matter
much better, and gave, I am told, entire satisfaction,
which, I dare say, I could hardly have done. At
least, so whispers my indolence. The corner of
our garden, which John found time to plant, has
yielded us many valuable things for the table, and
just now, the first fruits of a fine bed of melons.
The specimen that he brought in this morning in
triumph quite perfumes the room, and from present
appearances we may expect a hundred such. I
never saw so luxurious a growth, and the fruit is of
such a variety of delicious kinds, that I fancy we
shall scarcely regret your peaches.
I have, as you may recollect, become thoroughly
American in my predilections for the tomato, and
I insisted upon abundant provision of it, much to
John's dissatisfaction. Since the weather has
become so sultry, I make this vegetable almost my
only food, and fancy it to be the most wholesome
in the world. Mr. Sibthorpe takes to himself
great credit for his fortitude in seeing me eat what
is to him an abomination, but I am firm in the
faith that I shall yet make a convert of him. I
fancy he learned to detest tomatoes while he was
in Italy. He has a truly English horror of the
indescribable messes which are found on Italian
tables. I am told by some Western people that a
free use of tomatoes is one of the best preventions
against ague.
You will have perceived before this that these
quiet and prosperous times afford but little of the
stuff that letters are made of. I write principally
to tell you that we are going on so smoothly that
there is nothing to tell. But you
will
have letters
at all events, and I dare not refuse. If they tire
you, you will be able to console yourself with the
proverb Heureux le peuple dont l'histoire
ennuie
.
Yet I have laughed this morning, and that
heartily
,
but I fear I shall scarce be able to amuse you
at second hand with what depends altogether
on certain
un-writable
turns of countenance and
manner. The hero of the occasion was an old
pedler who came jogging along in his hearse-shaped
cart, soon after breakfast, and before this dripping
humor beset the weather. He stopped his cart,
on seeing several men at work, and it was not long
before the laughter of the men, who usually pursue
their business in solemn silence, drew my attention.
The aspect of the pedler secured it, for he was a
personification of Momus. His face was very red,
and of a most grotesque turn, and his nut-cracker
nose and chin were like nobody but Punch. His
gray eyes twinkled through a pair of mock
spectacles
made of a strip of tin twisted into the requisite
10*
form, and placed far down his nose, so that he was
obliged to throw his head back in order to look
through them. When I went to the window, he
was enumerating the contents of his covered cart
with a bewildering rapidity, but as soon as he
observed
me, he stopped short, pulled off the remains
of an old straw hat, and made a very low bow in
the style of Sir Pertinax, who thought the world
was to be won by booing.
My dear beautiful lady, said he, could I
sell you any thing this morning? I sell things for
nothing, and I've got most every thing you ever
heard tell on. Here's fashionable calicoes,
holding
up a piece of bright scarlet,splendid French
work collars and capes,and here he displayed
some hideous things, the flowers on which were
distinctly traceable from where I stood,elegant
milk-pans, and Harrison skimmers, and
ne plus ultry
dippers! patent pillscure any thing you like
ague bittersShaker yarbsessences,
wintergreen
,
peppermint, lobelytapes, pins, needles,
hooks and eyesbroaches and brasslets
smelling-bottles
castor
ilecorn-plastermustard
garding seedssilver spoonspocket-combs
tea-potsgreen teasaleratustracts,
song-books
thimblesbaby's
whistlescopy-books,
slates, playin' cardspuddin' sticks
butter-prints
basketswooden
bowls
Any wooden nutmegs, daddy? said one of
the men.
No, but as I come past I see your father a
turnin' some out o' that piece o' lignum vit
you got him last week, so you can get some o'
him, said the pedler quietly; then turning again
to the windowCan I suit you to-day, ma'am?
I've all sorts o' notionspowder and shot, (but I
'spose you do all your shootin' at home,) but may
be your old man goes a gunnin'I sha'n't offer
you lucifers, for ladies with sich eyes never buys
matches,but you can't ask me for any thing I
haven't got, I guess.
While I was considering my wants, one of the
men must try a fall with this professed wit.
Any goose-yokes, mister? said he.
I'm afraid I've sold the last, sir; there is so
many wanted in this section of the country. But
I'll take your measure, and fetch you a supply next
time I come along. This of course produced a
laugh.
Well! I want a pair o' boots, any how, said
the prostrate hero, rallying, to show that he was not
discomfited. These here old ones o' mine lets in
gravel, but won't let it out again. If you've got any
to fit me, I'll look at 'em. And thus saying he
stretched out a leg of curious wire-drawn
appearance
.
Any to fit, old boss?
Fit you like a whistle, sir, said the pedler,
fumbling among his wares, and at length drawing
forth a pair of
candle moulds,
much to the
amusement
of the bystanders.
The rain which had begun to fall now cut short
our conference. I bought a few trifles, and the
pedler received his pay with a bow which was
almost
a salaam. Mounting his blue hearse, he drove
off in triumph, not minding the rain, from which
he was completely sheltered by a screen of boughs
fitted in the sides of his wagon, and meeting over
his head,a protection against sun and rain which
I much admired.
This is the first specimen of Autolycus that I
have seen. There are scores of pedlers travelling
the country, but they are generally grave,
business-like
personages, standing much upon their dignity,
or rude and saucy, and disposed to attempt bullying
one into buying. One of the former kind told me
that he was about retiring from this section of
the country, and had it in contemplation to go
to the south.
So much for my laugh, which I could have
justified
more fully if I had been industrious enough to
write out more of my recollections. But indeed,
spite of good resolutions, there
is
something wilting
in this gentle, uniform, soft-dropping rain. It
takes the energies out of my
morale
as it does the
starch out of my collars, leaving all alike limpsy
to use a favorite term of Mrs. Boardman. I
must yield me to the drowsy influencesnot
however without having fulfilled my intention of
covering this goodly sheet with an infinite deal
of nothing.
Mr. Sibthorpe, who pretends to be busied in
arranging a multitude of accounts and such like
rainy-day improvements, while he is in reality
catching a very consoling nap now and then, is
just now awake enough to beg his duteous
remembrances
to your ladyship, with like friendly
greeting to Mr. Williamson and to Mr. Ellis, who
lives in our memories as
a most engaging wight,
Of social glee, and wit humane, though keen.
Charlotte's little love too, and a larger share
From yours,
F.S.
LETTER VIII.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
September 22d
.
* * *
Ought
a letter to be a transcript of
one's better mind, or only of one's present and
temporary humor? If the former, I must throw
away the pen, I fear, for some time to come. If
the latter, I have only to scrawl the single word
AGUE a thousand times on the face of my paper,
or write it once in letters which would cover the
whole surface. I have no other thought, I can
no longer say,
My mind my kingdom is.
I am deposed, and this vile blue-visaged fiend
has usurped the throne. There he sits with his
yellow eyes and his quivering chin, making hideous
faces at me, and calling up dreams, which might
terrify one far stouter-hearted than I. I see my
wife, pale and ghastly, with filmy eyes, imploring
help, which I cannot give her. My daughter, stiff
cold deadthe life pressed out of her little
heart by the chill monster. Waves of sorrow,
heavy, tangible, rise to overwhelm me; no friend
remains to cheer my dying pillow. Stretched on
the damp ground I see all around me graves
yawning
,
and wild shapes impatiently waiting for my
last breath. The clouds teem with lurid fires;
the very light is burning flame, while I shiver with
cold. Horror pursues menever again, O my
friend, shall this friendly handjust here came
the sweet voice of my little darling.
Dear papa, she said, laying her cool hand on
my forehead, dear papa, why
will
you write
when you are so ill? you promised mamma to lie
still on the sofa, if she would go away and get
some rest; and very soon you started up and said
you
must
write; and ever since, I could hear your
pen, scratchscratchso wildlyI am
frightened
,
papa! shall I call mamma? she always
persuades
you to be
so
quiet
It is even as you see, my dear Williamson, and
I shall send this very awful scratchscratch,
that frightened poor little Charlotte, that you may
have some idea of the condition in which one
comes out of an ague fit. I had begun to feel
relieved, and thought my fever had subsided, as it
probably would have done, if I had remained quiet.
But the slightest intellectual effort, and particularly
the least indulgence of the imagination, recalls and
redoubles the departing horrors.
I could with difficulty be persuaded by my little
trembler; but after she had enticed me to the sofa
I soon fell asleep, and so remained for two or three
hours, when I awoke quite relieved. And this has
been the course for a fortnight past. However, I
believe I am now quite cured, and I shall endeavor
to provide against a recurrence of the evil by all
sorts of precautions.
The most intelligent people here advocate a
depletory
course, and think it safe to use tonics only to
break the habit of the diseasenot to prevent
it. I would willingly have submitted to be let
blood in the cold stage, (a practice much approved,)
but that, with my constitution, I fear the effects
of a habit of bleeding.
Poor Rose will have nothing effectual done for
the obstinate ague. She has been persuaded by
some of the neighbors that it is dangerous to be
bled, and equally so to take quinine; so she shakes
and burns every other day, and cries and bewails
her hard fate most piteously while the fit is on,
and the moment it is off, feels entirely sure she
never shall have another, and goes to her work
with delighted alacrity. But the poor thing loses
strength perceptibly, and we have now two maids
who attempt to fill her place, poorly enough. John
and his wife both have aguefortunately on
alternate
days, so that they can nurse each other.
But Mrs. Sibthorpe is the nurse of all, besides
doing much to supply the deficiencies in the
clumsy service of the new maids. These treat her
as a sister of the craft, and seem disposed to put
upon her a regular and very liberal share of the
household duties. One of them proposed to her
the other day to assist in the washing, and upon her
replying that she did not know how to wash, held
up her hands and eyes in a paroxysm of virtuous
astonishment.
Not know how to wash! Well! I should think
it was high time you did! every woman that
is
a
woman had orter know how to wash.
Florella, who was highly amused, led the damsel
on by saying that she had not lived where such
things were customary.
Why! I s'pose
somebody
washed, didn't they?
I should ha' thought you'd have wanted to help!
Now, the woman I lived with afore I came here was
as pretty a woman to live with as ever I'd wish to
see. Me and her used to work together all the
forenoon
,
and then after dinner we'd set down and take
comfort, or go and drink tea with some of the
neighbors. That's my notion! There wa'n't no
pride about Mrs. Mucklewain.
That lady's disinterested admirer, however, has
so much of this same troublesome quality, that I
have written to Detroit to procure some domestics
of a different cast. Florella puts up with this sort
of impertinence with immovable patience and
good-humor
,
and even declares that the exercise which
she is obliged to take in order to keep things
tolerably
comfortable is decidedly beneficial to her health
and spirits. But it is easy to perceive that there
must be an end to this view of the case. This
accumulation of petty cares steals away one's whole
time, and it is too uncongenial not in a little while
to affect the spirits also. But we do not despair.
VOL. II. 11
It can hardly be that this lack of good household
service should prove an insurmountable evil.
It is a standing marvel to me that people, who
are such worshippers of common sense and
practical
utility as the Americans, should have made so
prodigious a blunder as to this matter. They will
embrace the most odious, filthy, and debasing
callings
for the sake of making money; yet the mere
name of a difference in rank is sufficient to drive
them from one that is comparatively easy, and in all
civilized countries respectable, according to the real
worth of those who exercise in it; while the
remuneration
is, or might be large, in comparison with
any thing which the parties could earn in any other
way. In England, though service is no
inheritance
,
according to the proverb, yet it is a very
excellent business; and its rules are as well defined,
and its claims as willingly acknowledged, as those
of any other useful art. The relation between
employer
and employed is so well understood, that one
party is as little liable to encroachments as the
other, and there is perhaps no position in which
real worth of character is more certain of securing
due respect than that of a domestic in families of
the middle ranks. Wheneverif everthis shall
be the case in America, English people of the better
classes will flock to our shores. This is all that is
needed to render the United States a very desirable
residence to those who are crowded out of the
struggling mass in the old world.
In spite of sundry agues and other hindrances
among the workmen, our cottage is nearly finished.
We shall be obliged to wait some little time for the
plastering to dry thoroughly, since I am not
disposed
to adopt the theory of some of my neighbors,
who insist that the dampness of new mortar can
never hurt any body. We have begun the
unpacking
of the furniture however, and find things in
good order, spite of their long sojourn in an open
shed. The piano-forte is of course untuned, sadly
every note set up for itself, like the jangling
bells of a Spanish city, and some even divided
within themselves. Florella has fortunately been
taught to tune, as every lady should be who brings
an instrument into the wilds.
October
5.
A most uncomfortable state of confusion has
prevailed since I had proceeded thus far in this
medley. My ague had not done with me, as I
had fondly hoped; but was only waiting to take
fresh breath for a more furious onslaught. I
consented
at length to be blooded in the cold stage,
and have not had a fit sincebut will refrain from
further prognostics as to recurrence. Besides this,
the free and easy damsel, whose wise sayings you
find reported above, was attacked with fever, and
lay very ill for eight or ten days, during which
time, what with constant attention and night
watches, we were all quite worn out. Some of
the neighbors were ill, and others were afraid the
fever was ketchin'  and as I was myself ill nearly
all the time, the burden of affairs came, as usual,
upon Florella. She is quite well, however, and
made very happy by the recovery of the girl, whose
situation was at one time rendered extremely
alarming
.
We should have sent her home as a matter
of course, but the weather was unfavorable, her
home was a very wretched one, and her attack very
suddenso that it was scarcely possible without
great inhumanity.
We have now the most charming weather, and
we are enjoying it to the uttermost. I fancy that
sunset in the region of these great lakes is more
miraculously splendid than elsewhere, and certainly
the sun sets nowhere on such woods as those of an
American October. You have seen them, I think;
if not, one day's drive would repay you for a
journey to Michigan. You have a painter's eye, I
know, and a poet's heart; and fate ought to have
endowed you with unbounded leisure, so that you
might fly a thousand miles to gaze on a glorious
sunset without incurring the imputation of having
shot madly from your sphere on a fool's errand. I
cannot but believe that there are other worlds in
which we shall yet be permitted to enjoy the many
innocent delights for which time and opportunity
are denied us in this. Meanwhile
we
are making
use of the present, and it does my heart good to see
the light that dances in Florella's eyes, and the
deepening bloom on the cheeks of my little
Charlotte
,
while we thread every alley green and
bosky
dell in these boundless glades. Roads are not
of the slightest consequence. We can go as we like
on foot, in the carriage, or on horseback;the
elastic sward is like a scarce moistened sponge,
and diversified every where with streaks of velvet
moss; and if one did not find here and there a
fallen
tree or a huge branch broken off by the wind
and left to decay as it fell, you might easily fancy
yourself in one of our own sylvan parks, the proud
boast of English wealth. Vert and venison are
here in abundance; and we can dispense with
enclosure
,
since fences of any sort would be sadly in
the way of such insatiable rangers.
My plans and projects of all sorts are of course at
a dead stand for the present; I mean the execution
of them, for as to the projects themselves, a certain
degree of fever only warms them into more
luxuriant
life. I have never woven such splendid webs
as during the fever which follows what is called a
slight
ague. At such times imagination is often
exalted and memory excited to a surprising degree,
while reason still remains lord of the ascendant,
and makes grave remarks and draws sober
inferences
,
as the wild pageants flit by. At some such
moment I had a distinct recollection of having seen,
years ago, some mention of the manufacture of
indigo
from oak saw-dust,somewhere in France, I
think,but further I cannot go. Will you, who
have access to references of all sorts, find out for
11*
me what it is I am thinking of? the piles of that
humble material which now meet my eye every
where, make me feel not a little curious on the
subject.
You may thank or blame the ague for this
ladylike
letter. Such moonlight as this would have
been irresistible, but that with moonlight comes
dew, and with dew dampness, and with dampness
certain associations no wise pleasant to one who
has been for weeks either trembling on the verge of
ague, or popping in
Like your friend,
T.
Sibthorpe.
LETTER IX.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
My dear Williamson,
November
15.
Didn't
I say something, in one of my late
letters, about an October landscape? I had not yet
seen a November one in the forest. Since the
splendid
coloring of those days has been toned down by
some hard frosts, and all lights and shades blended
into heavenly harmony by the hazy atmosphere of
the delicious period here called Indian summer,
Florella and I have done little else but wander
about, gazing in rapture, and wishing we could
share our pleasure with somebody as silly as
ourselves
.
If the Indians named this season, it must
have been from a conviction that such a sky and
such an atmosphere must be granted as an
encouraging
sample of the far-away Isles of Heaven,
where they expect to chase the deer forever
unmolested
.
If you can imagine a view in which the
magnificent coloring of Tintoretto has been
softened
to the taste of Titian or Giorgione, and this
seen through a transparent veil of dim silver, you
may form some notion of our November landscape.
It may have been the effect of this Arcadian
scenery, which seems made for painters and poets,
and which ought to purify the thoughts and exalt
the imagination of every thing endowed with soul,
it may have been this, more than the simple
reality that gave so touching a character to a
funeral
service that I have just witnessed in our
neighborhood. I have seen, as you know, much of
this world's splendid pageantry, never more lavishly
bestowed than in doing honor to the senseless
dust;I have gazed and listened while royalty
was inurned amid the thundering of cannon, and
the spirit-quelling tones of music, like the voice of
the everlasting grave warning the sons of men of
their inevitable destiny; but no splendid rites ever
possessed the solemnity which seemed to preside
over that hushed assembly of plain men and
women
gathered from far and near, at the call of
sympathy
alonesympathy in the fate of a man who
had no claim to their especial regard beyond that
of having needed their assistance while he lived.
He was a man not remarkable in any way;
an easy commonplace insignificant sort of
person
,
whose lot had been like that of many such
charactersa series of misfortunes unaverted by
any vigorous effort of his own, and gradually
breaking down his spirit, and leaving him at last to
be provided forfirst by the kindness of
individuals
,
and latterly by the publicso that at the
time of his death, he was neither more nor less
than a town pauper. He had been long ill, and
had left a large family utterly destitute, and now
the concourse assembled at his funeral exceeded all
customary gatherings, and the sympathy was deep
and general. It was not regret, for his condition in
life was fixed beyond hope, and he was supposed
to be quite prepared for a change of worlds. Death
had come not in the hideous skeleton form with
which he is endowed by vulgar superstition, but as
a merciful and soft-voiced angel, sent to bear the
soul from pain, and care, and humiliation, to
happiness
and repose.
It was pure human sympathynot hollow
shownot venal paradebut a touching
recognition
of a common nature and interesta
spontaneous
vibration of the public heart-strings at the
thought that a mana brotherGod's image
shrined in clay,one who had acquired
respectability
by misfortune, and awakened affection by
needing kindnesswas at last gathered to his
rest. I despair of giving you an idea of what
seemed to me to be the all-pervading expression of
the scene,but I may confess that even I, though
but little given to shedding unaccountable tears,
found myself betrayed into a softness somewhat in
unison with the many sobs which attested the pity
of the crowd.
The discourse which was delivered over the
body was solemn and earnest, and I found much
that was appropriate and likely to be useful, but to
me the effect, as a whole, was marred by the
attempt
to frighten people into piety, by means of
the mere bodily terrors of the last hour; an
attempt
which implies a departure from the simple
truth, since it is not to be pretended that religious
people dread death less than others. It is however
a common instrument of exhortation, and every
exaggeration of fancy, and even the destructive
agency of superstition, is sometimes resorted to, to
heighten its effect; as if the bondage through
fear of death, were not heavy enough already;
or as if lifelife temporal and life eternaldid
not furnish a thousand inducements to holiness,
where the death-bed can offer one.
This style of preaching is in use elsewhere, but
I think it is more particularly in vogue in these
newly-settled regions; perhaps because it is
supposed
that rough people need more urgency, or
that they will be more easily aroused by what is
addressed to the imaginationan opinion from
which I dissent entirely. Earnestness and
simplicity
,the
simplicity of immutable truth, are
the great and only requisites in addressing the
uneducated
;
and every attempt at mere effect is
rejected
at once, by people whose distinctive trait is
plain common sense.
As we rode slowly to the distant burial-place, the
long train of humble vehicles, the delicious
atmosphere
,
and the soft-toned lightthe aspect of the
dying woods and the peculiar nature of the
occasion
combined
to excite the imagination to the
utmost; and I found my reveries leading me to the
primal time when the veiled Isis was believed to
welcome the return of her offspring to her
mysterious
bosom;when simple and passionate
tragedy
was the outpouring of this same
ever-welling
fountain of human sensibilities; and majestic
sculpture gave form and substance to the lofty
creations of the soulthe fruit of vague longings
after immortality. The very simplicity and
humbleness
of all the outward circumstances gave a
solemn dignity to the scene; and I never felt such
an overwhelming sense of the equal value of all
souls in the sight of God, as while I watched the
lowering of that rude coffin into the earth.
I returned home in a softened mood, which I
willingly prolong by attempting this sketch of
my feelings, and I claim your indulgence for what
may seem extravagant, on the score of your
reiterated
request that I would give you an impartial
transcript of the impressions made on me by the
ordinary course of things in this new world.
The feeling of literal and unmodified equality
which is evinced by such scenes as the one I have
attempted to describe, however beautiful and
touching
when applied to the claims of suffering
humanity
,
takes, it must be confessed, a different shape
when it is brought to bear upon matters of
business
,
with which it has, it seems to me, no rational
connection. I love the one manifestation, but I
cannot help detesting the other. When my
fellow-creatures
through pressure of misfortune require
my aid and sympathy, God forbid that I should
bring into account the difference which
circumstances
may have placed between us, as an apology
for neglect or unkindness; but in transactions
which are conducted on business principles, and in
which every particular is specifically bargained
and paid for, I must acknowledge, that continual
attempts at encroachments and imposition are very
annoying, and go near to provoke one into
condemning
the whole system, as subversive of good
faith and good order. If a friend promises me his
assistance on some particular occasion, and
afterwards
finds himself constrained to disappoint me,
I can readily accept his apology, since the promise
was only a favor; but if I agree with a workman
for a certain stipulated price to perform a specified
amount of labor at a fixed time, I can ill bear to
see my business neglected, and to be told in
extenuation
that home affairs required his attention, or
that another man's business was more pressing than
mine, or that there had been a previous
engagement
which was forgotten until now. Yet all this
has not unfrequently occurred during my
operations
here; while any delay on my part would
have been resented as an imposition, and probably
have brought the law upon me immediately, though
public opinion would have been decidedly adverse
to my attempting to obtain redress for these
incessantly
violated engagements. A very one-sided
equality, certainly! And the same views prevail
as to domestic service; a strict and punctual
compliance with the letter of the engagement is
exacted on one side, and an unlimited discretion
exercised on the other. A person on whom you
depend for the main business of your household
will quit you in the midst of illness or during the
stay of visitors, and that without a moment's
warning
;
feeling quite satisfied with saying in reply to
your remonstrances, Well! I thought I could stay
but you see, our folks wants me
to hum,
and so
I've got to go!
But I am falling into the scolding line, one in
which I do not often indulge, and which, indulged,
certainly unfits one for making the best of things
as they are. We have, just now, two very decent
maids, besides poor Rose, who, with all her
feebleness
,
is invaluable as a balance-wheel. John and
Sophy are pretty much self-absorbed; and have
imbibed so much of the spirit of the country, that
they seem ever on the watch lest I should
remember
that they called me master for five years, at
home. The English of that class do not bear very
meekly the change in their condition when they
become independent farmers in the new world.
Their children will take equality more moderately
and more rationally, for they will enjoy some
advantages
of education, which their parents never had.
Florella's love and my own to you and yours.
The new house and its arrangements suit us
extremely
VOL. II. 12
well, and with some society such as we
could
select, would leave us little to desire as a
residence. I trust you are thinking seriously of a
flight across the lakes for a summer at least.
Yours ever,
T. Sibthorpe
.
LETTER X.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
February
20.
I have
grown very lazy of late,so much so,
that even letter-writing has become quite a task.
Perhaps it is only that I so much prefer flying over
this fine, hard, smooth snow in a sleigh, that I feel a
chill of impatience at in-door employment. I make
a point of duty of Charlotte's daily lessons, but
beyond
that I am but idle just now. The weather
has been so excessively cold for some days that we
have had much ado to keep comfortably warm, even
with the aid of great stoves in the hall and kitchen,
and bountiful wood fires elsewhere. These wood
fires are the very image of abundance, and they are
so enlivening that I am becoming quite fond of
them, though they require much more attention than
coal, and will, occasionally, snap terribly, even to the
further side of the room, though the rug is generally
the sufferer. An infant of one of our neighbors was
badly burned, a day or two since, by a coal which
flew into the cradle at a great distance from the
fire. I marvel daily that destructive fires are not
more frequent, when I see beds surrounded with
light cotton curtains so near the immense fires
which are kept in log-houses. How much more
rational would be worsted hangings!
It is no uncommon thing to employ a horse to
bring in the back-log, and the fire is built in due
proportion to this foundation. I cannot describe to
you my astonishment, when I was sitting by a
sick woman, at seeing her husband coolly drive his
horse into the room; and I was scarcely less
surprised
when I saw the prodigious log which
followed
at no great distance, fastened in a great chain.
The animal seemed to understand his business
very well, and after he had backed the log into
a convenient position on the hearth, and felt
himself
free from it, he walked quietly out of the
back-door, which had been set open for his egress.
This sharp frost, though rather inconvenient at
home, makes fine sleighing. The sun shines
brightly, but seems to have no effect upon the
crackling snow. The runners whistle as they
skim over the smooth track, and the horses are as
much inspirited as we by the keen air and the
exciting rapidity of motion, so that they go like
winged creatures, their feet seeming scarcely to
touch the dazzling sheen. Of all the delightful
modes of conquering space, this is surely the most
delightful, and to me it has almost the charm of
novelty, for city sleighing, with its thousand
hinderances
and dangers, is but a poor attempt at such
a bewitching flight. Dancing has been called the
poetry of motion, but I think sleighing, in the true,
free, forest style, deserves that praise still better.
You should see one of our fine, tall, elastic young
woodsmen, in his close cap and trim costume, a
gay sash streaming behind him, standing in his
sleigh, and skimming along the path, holding the
reins with a careless natural grace, and seeming
scarce conscious that his fiery steeds are at full
speed, though the air is full of the sparkling
fragments
thrown up by their dashing hoofs. You
would find in the picture no inelegant
representation
of the car of Apollo with Phaeton for a
charioteer at the very least, though this last is all
too poor a comparison, since our youthful aspirants
might be trusted with the day-god's own team.
Oh! sleighing for me, beyond all the
exhilarating
devices that have ever yet sprung from man's
teeming brain. Railroad speed is so nullified by
the mechanical means necessary for its
production
,
that it is mere rambling dulness compared
with sleighing. And then the splendor of the
landscapeevery branch loaded with piled silver
every twig sheathed in crystaland earth's
broad bosom, covered with a mantle of immaculate
purity, inlaid throughout with diamond sparks that
dazzle the eye, which is yet fascinated by their
twinkling brilliancy.
Once lately we had a mingling of something
!else with the usual pleasurable excitement of a
sleigh-ride. We were going twenty miles or so to
dine with our friends the Cs, and for variety's
12*
sake tried a newly-opened road through the woods.
The sunlight was splendid, the way had been
well-enough
tracked, and we found the sleighing
excellent
,
and the shifting shadows of the overhanging
trees a very charming feature of the new route.
We had made perhaps half the distance, when
we met a prodigious saw-log,that is, the huge
trunk of a tree, drawn by oxen, on its way to the
mill. This great body enjoys royal privileges on
the highway, for it could not turn out without a
certainty of turning over;so, the track being but
single, ours was the task of finding a way through
the deep snow at the side of the road. To effect
this, our man and the other were obliged to plunge
in and make a path for the horses by buffeting and
trampling the snow as well as they could, a matter
of no small difficulty, as it was nearly breast-high
in some hollow places. Then the horses were led
forward through this devious track, plunging and
snorting, and showing no little reluctance to such
cold swimming; and at last landing us safely on
the road again, at the expense of a dip which nearly
overturned the sleigh. We were scarcely calmed
down after this excitement, when we met another
log, and had all the plunging, and tacking, and
dipping
,
over again, but still regained our track in
safety. I was beginning to confess that I was not
at all sorry that we had passed the saw-logs, when
another came in sight, and I begged to be allowed
to alight and make the passage afoot.
To this there were a thousand objections;I
should get very coldperhaps freeze my feet, and
certainly encounter a great deal of unnecessary
fatigue. I saw that Mr. Sibthorpe was very much
annoyed by my alarm, and our driver confidently
asserted that we were perfectly safe; so I thought
of my reputation, and crouching down in the very
bottom of the sleigh, submitted to my fate with
the best face I could command. Another log
passed, and yet another, and at length I ventured
to ask one of the men how many were behind, as
they seemed all of one party.
Why! I guess there an't more than a dozen
or so, said he. I would fain have turned back;
but in that case, we must either have repassed all
that had gone on, or have travelled at their snail's
pace; so I said nothing, but cried a little behind
my veil. By and by, we absolutely saw the last
one, and this being once ascertained, I took my
proper seat, and set about behaving like a lady
once more, though my nerves were more in a
flutter
than is becoming in a backwoodswoman. I
tried to laugh off the whole affair, and declared
that it would be pleasant to look back upon, as a
novelty in our woodland experience.
But what saith the sensible proverb, about not
exulting till you get out of the wood? I forget,
but I commend its practical bearing none the less.
We had scarcely a mile yet to go when we
encountered
an apparition yet more appalling than a
saw-logan immense herd of unruly cattle driven
by two or three men on horseback. No sooner
did I become sensible of the approach of this
tremendous
looking
cortge,
the drivers cracking their
whips and shouting wildly to preserve command
of their riotous charge, than my newly-built fabric
of fortitude crumbled into very dust, and I shrieked
and cried like a naughty baby. We had none the
less to go through the whole drove, and as they
went stumbling and plunging by, their feet were
often on a level with the top of our sleigh, as they
trod on the crusts of the high banks at the side of
the road; and although Mr. Sibthorpe and our
Phaeton stood up and kept them from absolutely
trampling on us, yet their too close neighborhood
and their fierce threatening aspect finished the
disgrace
of your poor friend. I remember nothing
more until I found myself stretched on the floor in
Mrs. C.'s parlor, with half the household engaged in
recalling my scattered wits. Tell it not, after all
my boasting; but make all the charitable
allowance
you can. * * *
We returned by the common road, you may be
sure. My high aspirings were completely
humbled
,
yet I did not the less enjoy the exquisite
moonlight by which we came home; but in spite
of past terrors, sang and laughed, and could, but for
very shame, have screamed like a child, in ecstasy
at the heavenly splendor of the scene.
Do not imagine I set Charlotte such a bad
example
as that of these riotous spirits that I describe
to you. She, dear child! was enjoying the ride in
her own way; lying fast asleep in her father's lap
all the way home.
Write oftener. I thirst for letters. If you had
ever spent a winter in the country, with frozen
lakes lying between you and the busy world, you
would need no urging, I am sure.
Yours in all affection,
F. S.
LETTER XI.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
April
22.
Once
more, with pen in hand, dearest
Catharine
;
and oh, how glad and how thankful to find
myself so well and so happy! I could have
written
you a week ago, but Mr. Sibthorpe, who is
indeed
a sad fidget, as I tell him every day, locked
up pen, ink, and paper, most despotically, leaving
me to grumble like Baron Trenck or any other
important prisoner. To-day the interdict is taken
off, and I must spur up my lagging thoughts, or I
shall not have said forth half my say before I shall
be reduced to my dormouse condition again.
I dare not begin with any other subject than the
boy, lest the writing materials should be locked up
for another month; but I shall leave all particulars
to your imagination, or to Mr. Sibthorpe's
indefatigable
pen.
I
see in the new comer only a very
hungry citizen, who bids fair to be robust enough
not to discredit his birthplace, and who already
claims the rule of the houserather prematurely,
as I think. He is well cared for, by a stout dame,
who has had abundant experience; and I interfere
very little with her management, being rather
occupied
in stealing lessons against the time when I may
very likely be obliged to take the sole care of him.
The spring has opened charmingly. The early
bulbs are all fully blown, and a beautiful perennial,
here called the Ohio bluebell, a far larger plant
than the one we know by that name;and the
flowering currant, a climbing shrub, already strung
with golden, clove-scented wreaths, looking at a
little distance like miniature laburnum. Some of
our neighbors have fruit-trees in blossom, and
currants
already formed, in distinct clusters. We must
wait a year or two for ours. The wheat has
already
taken the hue of the richest emeraldthe
most beautiful green indeed that it is possible to
conceive; and the grass is beginning to emulate it,
in spots where that has been improved by
cultivation
.
Wild grass does not spring so early, except
in moist situations. The cows have been picking
a little on the marshes, for a week or two past, but
the pastures near us are still rather brown.
The trees do not yet begin to wear the least
tinge of green, which rather disappoints me, as I
had always supposed they kept pace with the grass.
The fallows are silvered over with strawberry
blossoms
,
rich promise for June. The asparagus beds
of an old settler in the neighborhood have been in
cutting order for ten days or more.
So much for the country chronicle for April,
which I dare say will find you in deep deliberation
upon spring ribbons or the last light mantilla. My
preparations for enjoying spring have been a pair
of very stout shoes, water proof; and a great
bonnet
braided of oat-straw by a good lady of my
neighbors. These, with a pair of indescribable
gloves, will furnish me forth for public appearance
for some time to come.
I wish you could have been here this morning,
when I had a visit from an old woman who is my
adviser in perilous emergencies, such as the
contumacious
refusal of a turkey hen to sit still on
her eggs, or the obstinacy of a caldron of soap,
refusing
to come, and so justifying the opinion of
some ingenious philologist that the term
soap
is a
contraction of so hap, betokening the uncertainty
attending the manufacture. This good dame
dabbles
in half the circle of sciences, and when I ask
for information on any particular point, I always
get a vast deal of gratuitous information. This
morning the matter in hand was Charlotte's wrist,
which she scraped badly in falling out of her swing
a day or two ago. The place looked so angry this
morning that I sent for old Mrs. Lettsom in her
surgical capacity.
Land o' Goshen! said the good woman,
holding
up both her hands, when Charlotte, with doleful
eyes, unwrapped her arm, why, that does look
perfectly awful! I never see sich a one but once
since I was born, and that was Miss Taylor's, and
she came nigh hevin' to hev' her hand took off!
Charlotte looked at me, perfectly aghast, and
began to cry sadly.
Law me! said Mrs. Lettsom, don't you be
scar't!
I
can cure ye!
I've
cured worse things than
that. I cured Miss Taylor's, quick as wink! Jist
smash up everlastin'; and lay on a good mess of it,
and it'll get the information out on't like
witch-craft
!
This sounds like a stupendous operation, but a
little inquiry brought to light the true nature of
Mrs. Lettsom's everlastin', which is only a soft
cooling herb much cultivated in these regions.
This being disposed of, I had the usual
discursive
lecture.
That everlastin', said the good woman, is a
prime thing to wrap up the axe in, after you've
cut yourself a choppin'. As long as that keeps
moist, the wound'll keep cool and easy. The bees
knows the good of it, for when they've been a
fightin', you'll always see 'em a huntin' for
everlastin'
,
if there is any, and they go and get it for to
heal 'em up. But bees is dreadful knowin'
critters
!
They understand what you say jist as well
as any body. If there's any body dies in the house,
they'll all go away if you don't take no notice on
'em; but if you go and talk to 'em, and tell 'em
that sich a one is dead, (calling him by name,) and
hang a black cloth over the hive, and tell the bees
if they'll stay you'll do well by 'em, why, they'll
stay, and go to work peaceable. And if there's
dissension in a house, the hives ought to be set a
great way off, down in the garden, so that the bees
can't hear what is said. There was the Johnsons
VOL II. 13
down in Austerlitz; there was a division in their
family, and the bees began to grow dreadful uneasy,
and hardly made any honey; but by-'n-by, one
day, Johnson gin' his wife a whippin', and the bees
all flew away. And, any how, bees won't never
thrive well unless you talk with 'em; you must
take your knittin' work and go and sit by 'em, and
tell 'em things, and talk about the neighbors and
sich, or they'll get lonesome and discouraged, and
your honey'll be all bee-bread. Now, honey is
one o' the best things you can have in your family,
for it's good sweetnin' for any thingcake or
coffee, or any thing. You take a table-spoonful
of coffee to five quarts of water, and sweeten it well
with honey, and bile it about an hour, and it'll be
as good coffee as any body need to wish to drink.
To be sure it gives some folks the corry-mobbley,
but I know how to cure that, jist as easy! Take
and stew angle-worms, and spread a plaster on 'em,
and lay it on your stomick, and drink red-pepper
tea bilin' hot, and see how quick the pain'll leave
ye!
But here comes my master with a brow of
ominous
anxiety; so I must break off my gossip for
today
,
though I feel I shall forget before to-morrow
sundry recipes with which I meant to have enriched
your collection.
April
24.
* * * What do I hear, my dear Catharine?
are you really serious in your idea of going abroad?
Oh, how that will break in upon my pleasant
dreams! To say nothing of my hope of visiting
the city before a great while, the very landscape
looks distasteful to me when I think that you are
not to gaze upon it with me for these three years
at least! I know I ought not to complain, but I
must lament my sad disappointment. This world's
course is so full of uncertainty, that a three years'
separation is a serious matter, since it makes
reunion
hardly a thing to be depended upon. You
think it will benefit your children, and so it may,
doubtless, in many respects; but if they are to live
in America, would it not be better to bring them
up here? I think I have not observed among
those Americans who were sent abroad for their
early
education, very favorable results. But these
are selfish views perhaps. I am not a good judge
when the question under discussion involves a
separation
from you. * * * * Do you know, I
never sing our dear old song, Love not, without
such tender recollections that I have learned to
reserve it for the lonely hour when I can indulge
my reminiscences without witness? You remember
it, dearest Kate, do you not? or has the stream of
new music swept it away? Love not! love not!
the thing you love may change! We never
thought of the timid cautionand why should
we? Sing it for my sake, and keep it sacred, as I
do, till we meet again. Oh! must it be so
long? * * * *
CHAPTER XL.
Blessed with a kindly faculty, to blunt
The edge of adverse circumstance, and turn
Into their contraries the petty plagues
And hindrances with which they stand beset.
Wordsworth
.
Nothing
is made more apparent in the course of
these our desultory sketches, than that to people
circumstanced as we are, some modification of the
ordinary relations of society must be absolutely
necessary. Colonists must not expect to carry with
them the whole social fabric undisturbed, as houses
are transported in the citychimneys all
standing
,
partitions as stout as ever, and inmates pursuing
their usual avocations, scarce conscious of change.
No such mode of removal to the wilderness has yet
been discovered. Plaster will fall, and windows
be broken, and joints loosened, if nothing worse;
and it may be found impossible ever to bring the
edifice back to its original form, though it will
continue
to be a good substantial dwelling after all
a wholesome shade in the sunshine, and a cosy
bield against the storm. It will be the part of
wisdom
to accommodate our ideas and habits to its
present
condition, biding our time to amend it when
we can.
In circumstances where so many of the regular
and systematic and costly appliances of civilized
life are as yet unprovided, there will of course spring
up a thousand unconsidered wants, which, though
trivial singly, may yet make large deductions from
comfort and convenience. The first result of this
state of things is the awakening of ingenuitythe
invention of new modes of supplying these wants;
the substitution of one thing for another; the
application
of the same article to many different purposes,
all of which will perhaps be quite different from
the one for which it was originally designed.
Many a leathern hingemany a wooden latch
many a window-pane of oiled paper, bears witness
to the wit-quickening power of necessity. What
else would have suggested the substitution of a
griddle and smoothing iron, for a slab and muller
where with to grind paint? What else would have
taught the farmer's wife to make a coffee or a
spice-mill out of a piece of thick cloth and a
hammer
?
or to think that roasted corn did very well
instead of the coffee itself?
A more important result of the lack of the
advantages
which belong to a settled state of things, is a
certain feeling of mutual dependence;a sense of
natural equality;and a high appreciation of such
people as are emphatically termed among usgood
neighbors. The meaning which we apply to the
phrase is much more comprehensive than that
which can be found in the dictionary.
13*
In cities, every man is, or would be thought to
be, sufficient for himself, and he forgets as far as
possible his relationship to the great human family.
He seems to himself to draw the requisites for daily
life from some great indefinite masssome general
provision; and he scarcely remembers that this
mass is made up of individuals, on each of whom
he is in some degree dependent;that this
provision
for his need is the result of corresponding
necessities in his brother man. Competition has
rendered supply so easy and so certain that there is
little or no recognition of a mutual, personal
dependence
,
and there is consequently very little personal
interest beyond a very narrow circle. Rules are
strict, and lines are accurately drawn, and every
body is forced to observe them, however they may
contravene erratic propensities, aspiring wishes, or
rebellious sensibilities. Propinquity has nothing to
do with bringing people together. People who have
lived next door neighbors for seven years may be,
and often are, utter strangers; and though every
countenance in each family be perfectly familiar to
every member of the other, yet the two races may
be crammed into a close carriage, and dragged up
Cattskill Mountain on the hottest day in July,
without
a glance or a nod betokening that they have
ever met before.
To be sure, if one of the children should fall into
the water, and neighbor Nextdoor should pull it
out at the risk of his life, we may thank him,
unintroduced
,
without a breach of etiquette, and even
recognize him after our return to town, until he
invites us to a party, (not of our set,) or asks us to
endorse a note for himeither of which would
effectually build again the icy barrier between us.
It were vain, in such regions, to inquire, Who
is my neighbor? The relation is unknown.
In the country, and especially in the new country,
the case is far different. The code of morals, as
well as of manners, has a warmer, a more human
tinge. It is not enough that you avoid all
encroachments
upon the rights of others. It will not
do to wrap yourself in exclusivenessmeddling
with nobody, and claiming no aid but such as can
be bought with money
A nice oyster, shut up in a fine shell of pride.
You would be set down for a brute in a little
while, and, what would be much worse, you would
begin to fear that you deserved the character. Such
a position is odiously unnatural where men are few
and the means of life distributed with tolerable
equality. If harmony is desirableas where is it
not?there must be sympathy; and where there
is sympathy, there will be contact; and where there
is contact, we cannot but learn to appreciate people
according to their real merit, and not according to
their outward advantages, since their personal
character
is alone of any consequence to us.
This closeness of acquaintance leads to great
plainness and sinceritynot always pleasant
perhaps
,
but still, nearer right than its hollow-hearted
opposite. There is no glare thrown round any
body; no chance to pass for any thing but just
what you are; no opportunity to be grand, or
over-powering
,
or condescending; since the foundation
of such display must always be laid in the minds
and habits of those on whom it is to take effect.
You cannot be charitable at small cost, in the
country. It would not do to sit, richly dressed, on
a silken sofa, and plead poverty as an apology for
not helping to rebuild the cottage of a poor man
who has lost his all by fire. Inextinguished
laughter
would shake the country round. Nor can you
feed the destitute with what none of your own
family would eat. Such messes as I have seen
doled out from city areas would be sent back from
the most wretched hovel in the wide West, with a
feeling of deep and general contempt for the giver.
Reputation is not cheaply maintained here. Where
every thing is known and understood there can be
no illusion; and all is certain to be known where
every body feels perfectly at liberty to ask point
blank questions upon any and every subject. A
certain class in the gay world, who
act
falsehood
daily; whose whole life is afib, to say the least;
whose happiness and respectability (in their own
computation) depend upon their appearing what
they are not, and despising what they really are,
would soon find themselves routed out of their
skulking-places of deceit, and reduced to the
necessity
of walking uprightly, since no curtain of
ceremony would be of any avail in hiding what
should be behind the scene.
It is not to be supposed that, even to those who
have no desire to deceive, this extreme of freedom
can be always agreeable. It is, indeed, often far
otherwise; but those who think so are but a small
minoritya mere fraction of the body politic,
and not usually the busiest or the most earnest class,
so that their opinion goes for little. Seeing this to
be the case, they rather endeavor to conform to the
general view, since whatever price the community
sets upon its good-will, it is always cheap to pay it.
And perhaps the general improvement is not the
less probable for the cultivation of a spirit of
patient
humanity in those who claim to have made
some advances in the philosophy of life. The
most certain method of proving the truth of their
views and the value of their discoveries, both to
themselves and to others, is to show the practical
effects of their doctrines in the elevation of their
own characters. The mere
gloss
of civilization,
without this elevation, is worse than useless,
inas-much
as hypocrisy is worse than coarseness.
But, as we were saying, these primitive ways
of ours afford a field for a character unknown in
the more advanced stages of societythe good
neighbor. We could not get along without him.
He is the main stay of the community. We
have no True-neighbor-societies,they are not
suited to our condition. We have none so well off
as to be able to bestow a great amount of time or
means in aiding others, and few so poor as to need
any but
neighborly
aid. Good neighbors are all
we want.
It is not easy to describe this beneficent spirit.
It takes a thousand forms. It changes its aspect
like the clouds of a glowing sunset, but it wears
ever the rich golden tint of a true human sympathy.
Does disease invade your dwelling? The good
neighbor does not pass coldly by, and take it for
granted that you have all that is needed. He sends
his horse for a doctor or his wagon for a nurse; he
offers aid for the long night-watches, or perhaps
takes kindly away to his own home the little noisy
voices that might disturb the invalid. Does death,
in spite of all care and kindness, make good his
dreaded entrance? You cannot send for an
undertaker
,
but you have such aid as professional hands
never gave. The good neighbor relieves you of all
anxiety as to the details of the last sad parting,
watching your wishes with a delicacy which is
erroneously supposed by many to be foreign to
unpolished natures; and he leaves not the good
work until he has with his own hands laid the
loved remains in the earth, with all due rites and
pious care. Can this do less than bind your heart
to him forever, and secure to him as warm a friend
for a like hour of need?
Is a mother called from her helpless infant?
The new-born will not lack any thing that it
requires
,
if there be but one nursing mother within
many miles. Are children orphaned, or worse than
orphaned, by the death or misconduct of a parent?
They will soon be distributed, and each one
cared for as a sacred trust, with a feeling of
responsibility
of which those who have seen only
the little outcasts of city poor-houses can have but
a faint conception.
Besides these more active forms of well-doing,
the good neighbor has abundant occasion for the
exercise of passive virtuesoften the more difficult
of the two. This land of imperfect arrangements
and half-executed labors, abounds in petty
tres-passes
,
silent encroachments, and very impudent
impositions. These our good neighbor bears with
unblenching patience as long as they are bearable;
for he sees that ungoverned temper is the source of
most of the evils which retard the progress of our
forming society. A slight disputerough words
a quarrelan outragethese are the
gradations
;
the good neighbor prevents all by refraining
from the first step. If however he be surprised
into a harsh word, he will seek occasion to allow
himself to be obliged by the offended party. He
will ask a favor perhaps, and it will be a rare case
if this do not restore the good understanding that
previously existed. Revengeful tempers are not to
be reckoned among our Western sins. The fire
that blazes fiercely at night, will scarce live in its
smouldering ashes on the morrow. A kind word
will often solder what seemed a hopeless breach,
and nothing is more common than to see two men
who have pursued each other from court to court
with an angry lawsuit, make up at last in all
heartiness
,
and be good friends ever after.
The
very
good neighbor does not get his good
name for nothing. He must keep nothing
exclusively
for his own use. To have any thing too
good to go the rounds, is death to his fame. It
was for this reason that 'Squire Fellingwood, who
is a shrewd old pioneer, sold a handsome carriage
which was left him by a frienda gay, high-built
thing, with a bright yellow body and wheels
picked out with vermilionand a spirited
high-trotting
horse which had been accustomed to draw
it. It was for this reason he sold it, though he
said
he was afraid it would not stand our roads.
Our roads are smooth enough, but the 'squire did
well when he bought a great wagon with the
money.
That
will serve to carry whole families,
with their luggage, without racking or bruising;
and his stout farm team will not let any body
hurt them by overdriving.
What will the good neighbor do when unruly
cattle or ravenous pigs break into his enclosures
and damage his crop? Turn them out, mend his
fences, and say never a word unless it be to lament
his luck. If he is in the habit of keepingas
every farmer oughta book of profit and loss, the
entry on such occasion will be,
Luck . . . . . . . . . . . Dr.
To
dollars' damage by reason of A's oxen
.
Speaking of fields,we have a singular
custom
,
which he that would play good neighbor
must never think of violating. It is that of
permitting
people to cross your grounds, either on
foot or with cart or wagonat any time before
the grain is six inches high, in order to make a
short cut when convenient, instead of going round
by the road. If the fence is replaced three times
out of four, the good neighbor will be content, and
put it up the fourth time himself.
Even the good neighbor is shy of lending his
horse, but there are times when that must be
public property too. Should he be brought back
with marks of rather free usage, the good
neighbor
will observe, The weather is very warm; or,
The roads are heavy; or, My horse always did
tire easy; or still better, he will avoid looking at
the horse at all. Should saddle be torn or bridle
broken, 'Twas an old thing, the owner will
say; I didn't suppose it would have lasted so
long; and he will be very careful never to hint
that he should be much obliged if the borrower
saw fit to repair the injury.
B lent C a saddle for a two days' ride. When C
VOL. II. 14
returned, he was tired and it was quite dark, so he
laid the saddle down on the marsh where he turned
out his horse, and went away to bed, thinking to
attend to it in the morning. Meanwhile some half
a dozen frolicsome calves, that were feeding on the
marsh, found the saddle, which happened to be
stuffed with hay, and having once effected an
entrance
,
they made a perfect wreck of it before
morning came, or at least before B in Sunday trim
sought his saddle for a Sunday ride. Now B
thinks it very hard that C is not willing to pay for
the damage done to the saddle, and C cries out
upon B's
meanness
in requiring it. They talk of
a lawsuit, for they neither of them set up for the
character of good neighbors; but we hope
somebody
that does, may yet interfere to prevent that
mode of settling the point.
The reader may think we have hinted at some
rather costly sacrifices as the price of this same
character of ours, but indeed they are not greater
than the position is worth. Those who would be
the ministers of good on a larger scale, must make
themselves known first in humble efforts. True
benevolence will not disdain the humblest. We
have seen some rather ludicrous instances of the
petty trials which are inseparable from new country
life, but it is a serious and an interesting truth that
the spirit of the good Samaritan is nowhere found
in livelier exercise.
An instance of this occurs to me as worth
recording
.
At a time of distressing scarcityI think
the winter of '37'38Mr., whose crop
had been abundant, refused to sell his produce to
any one who had money to pay for it. Those, he
said, could buy any where. He parted with his
entire crop on credit, to the poor; and thereby
saved many families from the extreme of want.
The next harvest gave his debtors the means of
paying, without reducing themselves to distress.
Such a man may well be called a good neighbor.
CHAPTER XLI.
Thou art not for the fashion of these times.
Shakspere.
After
all that has been said and written to show
that the poor and the unlettered, the awkward, the
vulgar, and the rough of our race ought, in spite of
their disadvantages, and even because of them, to
awaken an interest in the hearts of their more
favored fellow-mortals, nothing is more difficult
than to call up any thing like true sympathy for
those whose outward appearance and circumstances
are divested of every thing that captivates the
imagination. I am disposed, after some experience,
to count it among the compensations of a country
life, that in the close contact into which the joint
tenants of the wilds must come,be their
discrepancies
what they may,we are brought sooner
and more certainly to a sense of the
dignity of
human nature
independent of all the accessories
on which so much stress is laid in society,than
we could ever be amid the forms and barriers of
more polished life.
There is very little disguise or reserve in the
intercourse of this new country. Every one's
affairs are talked over without stint or measure;
and if they are, or ought to be, private affairs, so
much the worse for the owner. Indeed it is, I
believe, part of the creed imported into these
shades by the Orientals, that nobody ought to have
any private affairs; and that if there be any, it is
the duty of the community to ferret them out.
This is a little unpleasant before one gets used to
it; but there is a comfort in thinking that such a
limitless unveiling of the springs and motives of
human action brings us acquainted occasionally
with varieties of character which would never have
come under our notice in the more ceremonious
world.
I have mentioned the dignity of human nature,
and I will here sketch an instance which occurs to
me as explanatory of what I mean by the term.
In a small house, on the outskirts of our village,
lives an old woman with whom the country in
general claims relationship; at least every body
calls her Aunty Parshalls. I had often noticed an
odd-looking figure hovering about that isolated
dwelling, sometimes seeming engaged in various
homely household labors, and more than once every
day toiling up a hill which rises back of the house,
loaded apparently with something too heavy for her
strength. I conjectured that she was some poor
widow, who led a lonely life, spending her whole
time in feeble efforts for the little that nature
required
,
but probably inured to hardship and
solitude
,
and too dull to desire companionship. I do
14*
not know how I could have imbibed so
uncharitable
an opinion, but I suppose it was the uncouth
outline of the figure, together with the spiritless,
packhorse air with which she pursued her daily
labors. The distance between us was too great to
allow of my making out more than an outline, but
I often followed her movements with listless eye,
and at last began to feel some curiosity to know
something of her.
It so happened that I had become the happy
possessor of the spare fleeces of two sheep that
spent their time looking into each other's silly eyes
in a little enclosure on our premises; and it was a
matter of no small moment to me to dispose of this
produce of the
farm
to the very best advantage. I
could readily have exchanged the wool for yarn, at
the store, or with one of the neighbors, or I could
have sold it for hard money, so great a treasure
is it as yet among the pioneers. But this would
not have been farmish; so I determined to have it
spun into stocking-yarn at once, that some of my
household at least might be clothed in some small
measure with home-manufacture. It lacked but
little and I should have proposed buying a where
and hiring an expert maiden to perform the work;
but a stray smile or two, when I touched upon this
plan, warned me that I was quitting the sublime
for something less pleasant, and I contented myself,
after all, with making inquiry where and by whom
I could get my four pounds of wool transformed into
stocking-yarn in the most unexceptionable style.
More than one good housewife recommended me to
Aunty Parshalls.
That leetle taunty house there, thereat the
bottom of the knobwith that queer stick
chimbly
and sich a poor fencethat's Mr. Parshalls-es.
Unwilling of course to intrust any one with so
important a negotiation, I posted at once to the
taunty house, pleased to find an excuse for
getting
a little nearer to the odd-looking tenant, and
quite surprised to discover that she was the owner
of a husband, having often seen her putting up
fences which were invariably down again the next
day, and driving out cattle that sometimes spent a
great part of the time in her cornfield. These being,
by country etiquette, mannish offices, I took it for
granted the husband must be helpless at least, since
he was not dead.
I found Aunty Parshalls out of doors as usual.
She had placed her wheel in the shady spot at the
west end of the house, and there she was spinning
with all the alacrity of a young girl; while in the
middle of the only room in the house, in a great
arm chair placed directly between two doors, so as
to catch every breath of air, sat a jolly-looking man
scarcely as old as herself,his feet propped up, a
long pipe in his mouth, and in his hand a
newspaper
which he seemed attentively studying.
I opened my business, received a favorable reply,
and feeling my mind relieved from the pressure of
this important affair, began in earnest to make a
new acquaintance. One single question answered
the purpose, and that was one which might be
stereotyped as the universal form of opening a
conversation
among us.
How long have you lived in the Western
country
?
This lifted the flood-gates. The old
woman
began on her own biography and that of her
husbandtold the county and town in Connecticut
where each was born, the county and town in York
state, in which each had lived before marriage; and
every particular point of topography relating to the
places where they had resided since; the day of
the month and year when they had first spoken of
coming to Michigan, and also the particular day on
which they came to a decision to that effect, with
the causes thereunto moving; the day of the week
and month on which they set out; ditto when they
arrived at Buffalo; the various chances which had
befallen their attempts at getting their things
on board a steamboat, and all that the captain said
touching a reduction of fare, the inconveniences of
two nights' lodgings on deck, when the cabin
passengers
objected to the deck passengers blocking
up every avenue, which the deck passengers thought
very tyrannical; the arrival at Detroit, and the
deposit
of the things on the wharf, where th' old
man staid by them while the good wife went
round and looked up a teamster, and brought him
to her husband to be bargained with; the hazards
and delays in crossing the Rouge, which was
swollen by a freshet, and had lost its poor old bridge,
the frail dependence of those times; then the
crossing
in a scow, and her fears lest the old man should
get tipped over, as he would not get out of the
wagon; and the arrival in the neighborhood of the
eighty, on which the backwoods life was to
commence. All this, though thus succinctly
indicated
here, took a good hour in the telling; and
the poor woman had removed her wheel and I my
seat several times to avoid the encroachments of
the sun, which now approached the noon-mark.
Why do you not spin in the house, Mrs.
Parshalls
?
I asked; it is much cooler there, I have no
doubt. Oh yes, to be sure and sartin it is; but
then you see the hum of the wheel disturbs my
old man so, he can't take no comfort a readin'. So
I spin out o'doors as long as it's shady, and then go
about my other work. But come in now, and I'll
show you the prettiest brood of young ducks you
ever saw in all your born days. So saying she
went into the house, and I followed, to see the
young ducks, but more curious to see th' old
man, who seemed a person of so much
importance
.
He looked up from his paper and vouchsafed me
a civil salutation, and then asked his wife rather
sharply whether dinner was ready.
Bless your dear soul! she exclaimed, why,
I ha'n't so much as thought about dinner! But I
can get some snaps in a minute, and stir up some
griddles, if that'll do. You don't care much about
dinner, such a hot day, do ye?
Snaps! said the fat man contemptuously,
keep your green victuals for your goslins; and as
for griddles, I a'n't a going to have a fire in here;
so whatever you do, you must do it out o' doors. I
must have some pork, any way. I sha'n't keep,
this weather, if I don't have some salt meat.
Poor Aunty Parshalls cast a doleful glance at the
blazing sunshine, and ventured a gentle
remonstrance
.
Why, deary now, them snaps is so tender, I
know you would like 'em with butter, and I could
cook 'em with a little blaze of chips, and bake the
griddles too. But then if you don't like it, she
concluded, seeing a frown gathering on his brow,
why, it a'n't no matter. I'll make a fire out o'
doors.
I admired the young ducks duly, and accorded
just commendation to the little tub of water sunk
in the ground near the back door for them to
paddle
in, and then took my leave. (I must tell my
reader what I did not always know myself, that
snaps are young green beans, and griddles
cakes baked on a griddle;favorite cates in these
parts.)
After I reached home again, and sat fanning
myself
by the window, I saw Mrs. Parshalls hazing
about her open fire, and I had a feeling sense of
what she must be suffering.
This business acquaintance ripened into real
interest before a great while. Mr. Parshalls was
always the very man he appeared at first sight,
selfish and exacting, and determinedly indolent. In
summer it was too hot for him to stir, in winter too
cold; and in the intermediate seasons it was either
wet or windy or chilly, neither of which conditions
of atmosphere agreed with him. The greatest
exertion he was ever known to make was to walk
over to the village in the morning, and sit smoking
on the tavern steps or in the store all day; laying
down the law on all disputed points for the
instruction
of the hordes of idlers who are always to be
found about those places. His wife, meanwhile,
led, as I have before hinted, a sort of shifting,
Robinson
Crusoe life, doing the best she could with
very small means, and performing the parts of man
and woman both.
She was the very opposite of her husband, in
exterior as well as in heart. As he was fat she was
lean, and even to a much greater degree. Her
long knobby limbs looked like mere frame-work,
while he wore the air of having been run into his
clothes, and pretty large clothes too. His face was
of a hue approaching that of a red cabbage; his
wife's brown and wrinkled with exposure and
fatigue. His walk was an habitual strut; she had,
at least while in his presence, an uneasy, watching
air, keeping her eye on him as much as possible, as
if she dreaded a blow, although I believe nobody
ever suspected Mr. Parshalls of
that
sort of brutality.
He ruled by a less unpopular species of tyranny,
and the humble and loving disposition of his wife
gave him unusual opportunities in this way. A
harsh word or an angry look had more terrors for
her than a blow would have for harder natures.
And she had so much of that charity which
hopeth all things that she persuaded herself
always that her husband was improving.
CHAPTER XLII.
For the true-hearted soul deemed a weather-stained face
And a toil-hardened hand were no marks of disgrace.
Mrs. Sigourney.
I had
been some little time acquainted with Mrs.
Parshalls before I knew that she had a sonone
only son, who had been married, and was now a
widower with a little boy of his own, an infant of
some three years old, or perhaps not so much. It
was in her longings after this darling grandchild
that she first mentioned her son to me, and from
what she said of her desire to have the child with
her, and of her son's refusal, I came to the conclusion
that Mr. Henry Parshalls was more like his father
than like herself, or he would have allowed the
child to cheer her loneliness at least a part of the
time.
At length Henry came for a visit, and with him
the sweet rosy-cheeked boy, and the poor old
mother was the happiest of the happy. She said
she took clear comfort, and no one could doubt
it who saw her with her little grandson in her
arms. To be sure, she rose earlier, and toiled still
harder than before, but the new spring at her heart
lightened all her labors. Little Alfred was always
with her. With the unerring instinct of childhood
VOL. II. 15
he preferred following her steps all day, to enjoying
any of the various temptations offered by his
grandfather
,
and by virtue of this exclusive preference,
added to his thousand little winning ways, he
became
part and parcel of poor Aunty Parshalls' being.
Henry, though he was but a cold son of such a
mother, could not but yield to her entreaties, and
leave the boy with her when he went away.
Soon after this we heard of his marriage. He
had chosen a girl of sixteen, thoughtless and
unformed
even more than is usual at that age. From
this time Mrs. Parshalls lived in constant fear lest
her darling would be required of her. But three
months passed away and no word came from Henry,
who lived at some distance, and was not a very
attentive
son. By and by a letter was received
announcing that he was about to remove into our
neighborhood, where he owned a piece of land.
The world had gone amiss with him, and he wrote
in poor spirits, scarcely mentioning his young wife,
and indeed saying nothing beyond what was
absolutely
necessary. Here was an increase of poor
Aunty's cares and anxieties! Henry had been very
prosperous; so much so that the order of nature
had become reversed in some degree, and his
parents looked up to himno unusual state of
things where filial reverence is held in small
account
.
Now the tide had turned, and Henry was
going to try hard work again, with the
encumbrance
of a young wife who was reputed to know
nothing whatever of any domestic employment.
They came, and for once rumor was found to
have fallen short of the truth. A more useless little
doll than our new neighbor Mrs. Henry Parshalls
never trod a ducal hall. She was of extreme
delicacy
of person,
petite
to a fault, with wild haught
black eyes, and the air of a woman of fortune.
Her father had been able to give her nothing
whatever
in support of these high pretensions, but he
wrote himself Attorney at Law in a village
somewhere further West, and, being a widower, had
boarded out with his only child, who had found,
consequently, little or nothing to do.
One ought to have seen Mr. Parshalls senior and
his house, and that good but very odd-looking wife
of his, to imagine any thing of the poor little
daughter-in-law's situation after she became an
inmate
of the paternal establishment. She sat on
one of the chests which garnished the sides of the
room, her white hands idly resting in her lap or
listlessly straying among her mazy curls, while she
watched with an aspect of real distress the labors
of poor Aunty. These were of the most primitive
kind; various enough indeed, but all performed
with scarcely more utensils than would have been
invented by our first mother if she had had
workmen
at command.
One article in particular which Mrs. Parshalls
called her dish-kettle, performed daily a round
of duties which would utterly have confounded
Papin's digester or the marmite perpetuelle. It
cooked the potatoes for breakfast, and was then put
on to heat water for washing the dishes. When
this same washing process was about to commence,
the dish-kettle was always hoisted to the table,
since where was the use of wearing out a pan
when the dish-kettle did just as well, and kept the
water hot longer too? By the time the dishes
were washed, it was time to feed the pigs, and
then poor Aunty, being sadly scanted in pails,
carried
this heavy iron vessel up the rising ground at
the top of which the pen was placed. Then the
kettle was scoured and put on for dinner. After
dinner came the whole dish-washing process over
again, and then the factotum was cleaned once
more, and put on to heat water for mopping the
floora daily ceremony. At this point of the
diurnal round I confess a discrepancy of opinion
between Aunty Parshalls and myself, since I could
never quite like to see the mop going in and out of
the dish-kettle. But as she said in reply to a very
sharp remonstrance of her lady daughter on this
head, Why! bless your dear soul! I sca-oured
it! I will answer for it she did, but we all
have our prejudices.
But the dish-kettle is not yet at rest for the
night. It has still, after another sca-ouring
process
,
to cook the supper, wash the dishes, carry the
pigs' mess up the hill, and come home to be
cleaned again in order that the beans may be put
to soak for to-morrow's porridge.
This is one of Mrs. Parshalls' peculiarities, and
it is one which I doubt not will cleave to her as
long as she lives, in spite of many snappish
remarks
from her husband, and the undisguised
horror of Mrs. Henry. She says she must do as
she has been used to, and as her mother did before
her, or she should get her work all out of kelter.
And whatever may be the judgment of others upon
this coarse estimate of comfort, I am sure neither
of the objectors just mentioned had any right to
say a word, since neither of them ever lifted a
finger to lighten the good woman's labors.
Mrs. Henry's only amusement, and indeed her
only occupation while her husband was building
his house, was playing with little Alfred, whose
heart she won very soon by her attentions, and
whom she seemed really to love. Her prejudice
against his grandmother was very evident. She
had not the sense to value good qualities under so
unattractive an exterior. She was at an age
when with most girls exterior is all, and she
seemed to have been utterly unprepared for finding
her husband's parents so different from himself.
Henry Parshalls had by nature a fine person and a
handsome face; and withal, an air which seems
to come to some people by nature tooa
gentlemanly
15*
ease of mannera repose which is often
labored
after in the fashionable world, where it is in
high repute as bespeaking, in the first place, a habit
of entire idleness, and in the next a most dignified
consciousness of one's own importance. A towering
development of self-esteem, and the contagious
example
of his worthy father, had done wonders for
Henry; and unexpected success in the world had still
further contributed to give him an exalted estimate of
his own claims. Now, after all that has been hinted
of the characteristics of these two young people, it
cannot be necessary to show how very largely they
drew upon poor Aunty's patience. And yet when
they removed to their new house, she felt that she
would have been willing to endure always this
extra
load of toil and vexation for the sake of retaining
the little Alfred. But he was taken home and
made a plaything of by his pretty young mamma,
grandmamma retaining only the privilege of taking
care of his clothes and providing for him in many
respects out of her own scanty supplies.
CHAPTER XLIII.
O! goodly golden chayne, wherewith yfere
The virtues linked are in lovely wize.
Spenser.
Time
wore on thusMr. Parshalls skimming
the cream of life, such as it was, and leaving only
a sky-blue remainder for his devoted wife, who
always excused all his exactions on the ground of
his being so fleshy; Henry Parshalls bearing
his enforced change of condition with little attempt
at cheerfulness, and his pretty Mary generally in
either extravagant spirits or equally extravagant
depression, but through all evincing a scarce
disguised
contempt for her mother-in-law, and
gradually
withdrawing little Alfred from her as much
as possible.
This was any thing but happiness, and the
careworn
countenance of Aunty Parshalls showed how
deeply she felt that heaviness which weighs at a
mother's heartand such a heart!when she
sees things going wrong among her dear ones.
There was a gleam of something like joy when
Mary gave birth to a little daughter, but this was soon
overclouded by the extreme illness of the mother
and the subsequent death of the child. When
Mrs. Henry Parshalls had recovered so far as to be
considered out of danger, things wore a still more
unhappy aspect, for her variableness and her angry
grief for the loss of her infant approached the tone
of insanity; and after some months had elapsed in
this way, her husband looked like a broken-down
man, and scarcely made an effort towards securing
the means of life. Here again the burden fell on
the much-enduring mother, who found time, even
from her husband's service, to labor for her son's
family, and who also found means, in spite of
penury
,
to contribute many a little comfort to that
gloomy and desolate household. Yet never did
these efforts and sacrifices succeed in winning, in
the smallest degree, the regard of the wayward
Mary. She evinced ever the same scorn and
hatred of her mother-in-law's coarse appearance
and rude habits, wilfully closing her eyes to traits
of character which could have derived no real
lustre
from any station on earth.
But there was yet a shade to be added to this
unhappy picture. Little Alfred, who before the
birth of the baby had been the darling of the young
wife, had for some time been observed to call forth
her irritable feelings more than any other object.
When she was in her seasons of wild and flighty
spirits she would sometimes play with him as
before
;
but when the tide turned, as it was sure to
do, the unnatural flashing of her dark eyes turned
first upon him, and the innocent creature, feeling
the malign influence, would hide himself from her,
and sometimes run away to his grandmother, and
whisper to her that mother was very naughty.
It is not to be supposed that these things passed
unnoticed by those most interested. Even the old
man was aroused to a suspicion that Mary was
going crazy, and his wife spent her days and
nights in the most painful anxiety lest some
dreadful
catastrophe should yet prove the correctness of the
idea; especially as Henry, with a pride which was
part of his very existence, treated his mother's
anguished hints and cautions with scorn and
derision
,
though in his secret heart he felt convinced
that some sad change had taken place in his
unhappy
wife. He even requested his mother not to
come to his house, telling her that it was only her
odd ways that irritated Mary!
If any thing was yet lacking to complete the
crushing of poor Aunty it was a stroke like
this. To know that her presence was tolerated
only because it was needed, had been killing enough
to a heart overflowing with affection; but to find
herself excluded as a thing to shudder at! And
that dear boy over whom her old heart yearned so
fondlywas he to be left to the mercy of a
mother who was all but a maniac, and who would
doubtless teach him to hate his grandmother, if
she taught him any thing! She could only go
away and pray that yet worse things might be
spared her.
It was with all this load at her heart, and the
bitter tears of wounded affection welling from her
old eyes, that Mrs. Parshalls, in the weary round
of her daily labors, ascended the hill of which
mention has been made; her steps tottering beneath
the weight of the dish-kettle, which she scarcely
used to think of while little Alfred trotted by her
side. Arrived at the top, her eye wandered
mechanically
around the various fields in the
neighborhood
the
watching of unruly or straying cattle
being, as we said before, a part of her imposed duty.
At this moment she saw Mary, holding little Alfred
by the hand, come out of her house and walk
hurriedly towards a wood which lay at some little
distance, west of the village. The mother's heart
died within her. She feltwho has not felt?
that dread presentiment of evil whose agony can
scarcely be exceeded by the occurrence of all we
fear. She hesitated but for a moment, and then,
with all the speed her trembling limbs could master,
hastened to the wood by another path.
Fears that had haunted her for months past led
her at once to a deep hollow at some distance from
the road, where was a small circular pond without
any apparent outletone of those deposits of
water called in this country, cat-holescompletely
imbedded in hills and shaded by great overhanging
trees.
Those fears, the result of perceptions rendered
acute by a mother's anxious love, had not deceived
her. Before she could reach the spot she heard the
piteous cries of her darling,Oh, mother!
mother
!
mother! and Mary's voice replying, You
shall not live, little wretch, when my own baby is
dead and buried! then struggles and blows, and
then a plunge into the still waters.
With a piercing shriek she sprang forward, and at
the sound the unhappy Mary, clasping her hands
above her head, threw herself into the pond, before
Mrs. Parshalls had gained the bank.
To rush down, to plunge into the slimy waters,
and to draw to land both the victims, was the work
of only as much time as would have served a
strong man to do the same. The little boy was
able to stand, at once, but poor Mary was entirely
insensible, and Mrs. Parshalls, knowing it would
be in vain to call for help from that remote recess,
bore her in her arms to the top of the bank, the
child following, and thence, often resting on her
weary way, succeeded in carrying her to the
road-side
,
where assistance was easily found.
Long did this death-like swoon hold the
unfortunate
creature; so long that almost all hope was
exhausted but Aunty's. She ceased not for a
moment
to chafe the helpless limbs, and to try all
her simple restoratives in succession, till at length
returning life rewarded her efforts, though the
stupor was still so heavy that it seemed as if no
ray of reason would ever be rekindled. The
physician
,
when questioned by the wretched husband,
declined giving a present opinion, but
recommended
rest and extreme quiet, and left the
sufferer
to Mrs. Parshalls.
It was midnight in that sad chamber, and the
dim light of a shaded candle scarcely reached the
bed, when Mary, after some uneasy sighs and
restless movements, suddenly started up, drew her
hands across her brow, and looked around her as
if bewildered.
Where am I? where is Alfred? Am I in this
weary world yet! then seeing her faithful
nurse at the bedside, she screamed, and covered
her eyes with her hands.
You
here! go away! go away! she exclaimed,
in extreme agitation; then seeming gradually to
recover her recollection, she asked again for Alfred.
He is in his little bed asleep, my darling,
said Mrs. Parshalls; lie down like a good girl
now, and you shall see him in the morning.
Asleep, is he? are you sure he is only asleep?
oh mother, I was so afraidbut I have been in a
dreamoh! is it
all
a dream? she asked
almost gasping.
You have been asleep a long time, said the
good woman with the utmost tenderness; but you
are ill, my dear Mary, and you must try to be very
quiet. Alfred is quite well.
Mary gazed intently at the old woman, as if in
deep thought, and then began searching in her
bosom as if for something lost.
I am undressedwho undressed me? you?
where is it? where is thethe box she
asked in the wildest tone.
Here, Mary, said Mrs. Parshalls, approaching
the bedside with a mournful airthis is the box,
and I took it from your bosom. You don't want
it again, dear?
Give it me! give it me! do you know
what
Hush, hush, my dear; do not be so violent.
But do you knowtell me! did you open it?
ah! you do! you know what is in it, and you
have told Henry! Say! tell me! you have told
him, haven't you? You went right to him and
told him what a poor creature his wife wasan
opium-eater.
Mary, my dear daughter, said the kind soul,
sobbing ready to break her heart, you don't know
your old mother! You see me a poor rough humly
old woman, and you think I'm all through alike.
I never told Henry, nor I never shall tell any living
soul. But oh! my darling, how
can
you
But she could not finish, for Mary, struck at once
with shame and remorse, burst into tears, and threw
her white arms round poor Aunty's bony neck, and
kissed again and again the withered bosom.
Oh mother! true mother! I see all now!
You have been my guardian angel! I remember
all that has happened! And you have not told
Henry? but I will tell him myself! He shall know
all my weakness, my wickedness;he little thinks
VOL. II. 16
that the six opium pills that Doctorleft for
me before my baby was born were the beginning
of all our misery! I never tasted it before, mother,
but the reliefthe delightwhich followed the
use of those fatal doses were my ruin! I have paid
dearly for all since! But nowafter this awful
dayyou will let me live with you, won't you,
mother? You will take care of me, you will
watch me, for feardear, dear mother, you shall
be always my guardian angel!
Mrs. Parshalls tried in vain to check the gush of
Mary's awakened sensibilities. She told her she
must look higher than to a poor woman of the dust
for guardianship. She tried by every love-taught
art to quiet the agitated spirits of her charge, and at
last had the satisfaction of seeing her fall into a
sweet sleep, holding to the very last one of those
poor, worn out, shapeless hands which she had often
looked on with such contempt and aversion.
Mary's new life dates from this awful crisis.
Every day has improved her, and though the
vehemence
of her gratitude to her husband's mother
faded with the unnatural excitement which attended
its birth, the sentiment remains in undiminished
force, and is exhibited in a thousand tender cares
and dutiful offices. And as such feelings are
happily
contagious, we need not marvel that Henry's
character seems to have undergone some
sympathetic
change, and to partake something of the
warmth which appears so lovely in his young wife.
As for father Parshalls, I fear he is too old to
learn. The last time I saw his old woman, she
was on the top of the hill again, and by way of
adding to her height, already passing that of women,
she had turned the dish-kettle upside down, and
was standing on it, a skeleton statue scantily
draperied
looking
round the landscape with a
searching glance.
I do wonder, she said, what has become of
that heifer critter! If my old man comes home
afore I find her, I shall get an awful talkin' to!
Talk of the Venus! The statue that enchants
the world is not half so respectable as Aunty
Parshalls
standing on her dish-kettle!
CHAPTER XLIV.
A creature not too bright or good
For human nature's daily food;
For transient sorrows, simple wiles,
Praise, blame, love, kisses, tears, and smiles.
Wordsworth.
The
love of dress is said by some to be the
ruling
passion of the female soul. This is a
slanderous
accusation, no doubt; and one which is to be
traced to the anxiety with which the stronger sex
would fain fasten upon the weaker the imputation
of a frivolity and feebleness of mind proportioned
to their deficiency in bodily energy; and this in
revenge for certain signal victories obtained by the
weakest of the one over the strongest of the other.
I, though no champion of woman's rights in a
technical sense, and even a firm and submissive
believer in the inferiority of the sisterhood in many
essential points, deny this particular imputation
entirely; and defy those who write us down
popinjays
to any thing like reasonable proof. So much
by way of general protest.
A single instance proves nothing; if it did, I
should not be disposed to mention, even in this
confidential way,to a few friends,the
heart-breaking
quarrel which divided pretty Candace
Beamer from her faithful swain; and which began,
as I must believe however reluctantly, in the
attractions
of a string of blue glass beads, and other
seductive appendages thereunto appertaining.
The parents of Candace are the plainest of
plain people. They are of the small number
small even hereof those who do not make the
slightest effort towards any thing beyond bare
utility
who
do not seem even to wish that the banks
of life's muddy stream should be cheered by a
single
flower. They toil on and on, with the single
object of acquiring an additional number of acres
on which their children may toil after them.
Candace never in her little life wore any thing
better than a shilling calico;but truly, if all
girls wore faces like hers, silks might go out of
fashion. Yet I doubt whether her father or mother
ever noticed the exceeding beauty of that rich
cheek, with its twilight shadows of brown hair; or
the grace of a person which though
petite,
and
unaided by the
plastic
art, asked nothing from
callisthenics
.
They would be more likely to lament
that such little hands could not accomplish half as
much work as Nabby Gilkin's, whose fingers are
long and hard and horny as the claws of an ostrich.
It is not to be supposed that Candace could be
quite as indifferent on the subject of her own
personal
appearance as were her parents. There are
some secrets that
will
not be kept, do what we will.
But she was a sweet-tempered and submissive
lassie
,
16*
who took it for granted that father and mother
must know best, being the oldest. And besides,
Lewis Arden, who knew a good deal, had never
hinted
to her that she did not look as pretty as she ought.
But light will occasionally penetrate even the
depths of the wilderness. A young lady came to
make a visit at Mrs. Flyaway's, whose aim it
seemed to be to atone for the parsimony of nature
towards her person, by loading herself with every
attainable gewgawgiving preference to those
which would be likely to strike at the greatest
distance
.
This could be none other than a
distinguished
guest, in our village where finery is a
sight for sair e'en.
Not that we have not some attempts at the
beautifying
art. Some of our fair damsels
will
line their
straw bonnets with coarse cotton flowers, which
appear
with enhanced meanness lying near such fresh,
rosebud complexions. And they are apt to be fond
of doleful caricatures of jewelry,whiting's eyes
for pearlsand copper brooches set with green
glass.
When I see these sad-looking affairs, I am
sometimes
tempted to ask, (being a little given to
moralizing
,)
wherein, after all, consists the essential
difference between mean and costly ornaments?
The one strikes us as palpably absurd;how
much less absurd is the other? Why is a necklace
that costs fifty cents more ridiculous than one at
fifty dollars? By what standard is finery
legitimated
?
Should it be proportioned to the means of
the wearer? Is every woman to get as much as
she can? If so, let no smile curl the lip of the
town-bred
dame as she casts her careless eye around the
humble village church. The rustic maiden only
follows her example, and she is not to blame for the
partiality of fortune. What does mere ornament do
for either? It may flush with pride a cheek
otherwise
wan and lifeless, but will it smooth a harsh
skin, blanch a brown throat, or give a soft,
womanly
tenderness to the light of a haughty eye?
It may not be disputed that the habit of wearing
counterfeits
is of unmixed evil meaning; but here
the country girl is clearly superior. She wears
every thing in good faith, and leaves the shame of
a false outside to those who despise her.
It would require no labored argument to prove
that the country girl's longing after finery has no
inherent
vulgarity that does not attach with equal
force to the more successful and costly efforts of the
city bellebut, as we were saying, or about to
say
Miss Henrietta Duncan had been a guest at Mrs.
Flyaway's for a full fortnight, and in that time she
had had time and opportunity to make a great
impression
by the elegance of her appearance. She
wore a pink bonnet with rainbow-tinted
chany-oysters
all over it; and, depending from its very
small front, a long white veil; under which her
nose made a kind of masked sortie, as a chicken's
elbow will sometimes do in the thin cover of a
pat
.
Her robe was a blue
mousseline,
splashed with
gorgeous
flowers, and this was set off by a sentimental
black scarf, and a muslin pocket kerchief, edged
with broad cotton lace, and much embroidered in
the corners. All these charms were heightened by
glistening ear-drops, four parti-colored bracelets on
one arm, a brooch large enough for a dressing-glass,
and a long string of blue glass beads;not to
mention collars, ribbons, and all the etcetera of the
feminine armory.
The lady herself was of a pale brunette
complexion
,
deepened not a little by masses of curls, black
and shining as if they had been japanned. Her eyes
were not very bright, but they were very scornful,
which did as well, and produced a greater sensation.
She generally wore to meeting a double-flounced
apron, into one pocket of which was thrust the
central part of the
mouchoir brod
before mentioned,
and into the other a scarlet hymn-book, by the aid of
which Miss Duncan performed a very high and
conspicuous
part in the music. But I need not dwell
on particulars. The
tout ensemble
was very dashing.
Mrs. Flyaway lived near Mr. Beamer's; and being
a very busy lady, with but little to do at home, she
had time to do a good deal for other people; and
she took some pains to encourage an intimacy
between
Candace and Miss Duncan, hoping, we may
suppose, that high breeding would prove contagious.
After a while, Miss Duncan, whose visit seemed
of an elastic quality, was transferred, chest and all,
to Mr. Beamer's, and so had an opportunity for
much private tuition of the guileless Candace.
We must always think the best we can; so we
will not suspect for a moment that Mrs. Flyaway
had become tired of her gay guest. It is certain
however that it was she who proposed the flitting to
Mr. Beamer's; and it is at least whispered that Mrs.
Flyaway had mentioned confidentially to several
of her neighbors that she had picked up Miss
Duncan
by chance, while visiting in a neighboring
district
where that young lady was teaching school.
Candace had imbibed a profound respect for Miss
Duncan's finery when she first beheld it at a
distance
.
Some vague notions of power and dignity,
as connected with such splendor of costume, had
then dawned upon her for the first time; and when
we consider how much this sort of impression is
counted upon in the greater world, we must make
allowance for our little rustic. And when this
bright, particular star became an acquaintancean
inmate,and seemed disposed, too, to treat the
humble country maiden with such marked
consideration
,to
patronize her, in fact,(for things
may be done on all scales)her gratitude and
her deference knew no bounds. She listened to
every suggestion for the improvement of her own
appearance with a feeling of new self-importance,
and congratulated herself upon each successful
attempt to imitate the elegant airs of Miss Duncan.
Well! said the model, if
my
hair was all
wavy like yours, and
would
curl every how, I
should dip my head into a pail of water twice't a
day, and see if I couldn't make it a little slicker!
You never can make it curl in the fashion!
That would only make it worse, said Candace
despondingly; when I wet it, or when the
weather is damp, it curls all over my head, so that
I can't do any thing with it. Grandfather used to
call me his almanac, because he could always tell
when it was going to rain, by my curls.
It is dreadful, I declare! said Miss Duncan;
don't you think if you should have it all shaved
off it would grow straight? I could sell it for you,
and buy you some elegant long ringlets with the
money!
* * * * * *
Next to amending Candace's appearance, Miss
Duncan's favorite object was to induce her to break
with Lewis Arden, who did not like the gay lady,
and had treated her somewhat cavalierly, especially
after he observed her efforts to acquire an influence
over Candace. We cannot say how far the guest
was conscious of a spiteful feeling towards a
handsome
young man who had shown something
beyond
a decided indifference to her charms; but she
lost no occasion of depreciating him in the esteem
of his fair mistress, and for this she thought she
had sure ground. With all his manliness, his fine
eyes, noble forehead, and frank address, Lewis
Arden had one immense, undeniable, unpardonable
fault.
His father, a plain, hard-working farmer, had
toiled all his life for little more than a living for his
family. He was one of those farmers who look
neither to the right hand nor to the leftnotice
nobody's plans but their owneschew every thing
like experimentobserve no necessity for
improvement
in implements or modes of tillagefeel
too poor to take an agricultural paper, and too busy
to read oneand so go on, from year to year,
plodding in circuitous paths, when a little inquiry
would have shown them short cuts equally safe;
and groaning under the unprofitableness of farming,
without a single effort to discover why this necessary
and fundamental branch of business should not be
influenced by causes identical with those which
influence all the other modes of earning a share of
this world's goods. Mr. Arden had made up his
mind that hard work was all; and most faithfully
had he acted upon this idea.
But there was another reason why his affairs had
prospered no better. Some years before the time
of which we have been speaking, he had, in a
moment
of angry dispute with a friend and neighbor
an uncle of Candace, by the waybecome engaged
in a lawsuit; which, being carried from court to
court with characteristic obstinacy, had silently
devoured all the profits of the farm; and resulted
in a heavy encumbrance on the land itself, in the
shape of a mortgage given to the lawyer; who,
far from doing it on spec, would not go on with
the suit unless his pay was secured beforehand.
And this brings us back to that great,
overshadowing
fault which was the only one to be charged
against that fine, high-spirited youth, his son.
Lewis Arden was poor.
CHAPTER XLV.
How rarely reason guides the stubborn choice,
Rules the bold hand, or prompts the suppliant voice!
Johnson
.
Various
as are the characteristics of mankind,
there are yet some traits in which all agree; and
one of the most striking of these is a propensity to
be ungrateful to our best friends. We are not
entirely
incapable of gratitude. There are some
occasions
that call forth warm emotions which must
be referred to this virtue. But this fact weakens
not our position. It is not to our
best
friends that
we are grateful. It is to those who humor our
whims or gratify our passions, not to those who
give us unpalatable advice, who remind us of our
besetting sin, or endeavor to rectify our estimate of
our own abilities.
For instancewho loves poverty? who courts
poverty? who sings the praises of this great teacher?
Who tells of the cures it has performedthe eyes
it has opened? Who calls upon his friends to
rejoice with him when his merchandise is
shipwrecked
,
or his house burned? Who gives a ball
to celebrate his removal from a marble mansion in
Carroll Place to a two-story tenement in
Twenty-fifth
VOL. II. 17
Street? Who carries his head the higher for a
patched coat or a bad hat?
Is it necessary to prove that poverty is a friend?
Let us consider for a moment. What is the most
desirable kind of knowledge? Self-knowledge of
course. This is emphatically the boon of poverty.
Who tells the rich man of his faults? He struts
through the world wrapped as it were in a golden
mantle, which the darts of wholesome truth can
never penetrate. He may have a thousand faults
and failings that every body sees but himself; yet
in the wretchedness of his prosperity no voice is
found to whisper in his ear the startling words that
should arouse him to self-examinationto
repentance
to
amendmentto restitution.
Let the poor man rejoice in the contrast. Has
he
any glaring sin unrebuked? Nayhas he one
single foible, however unobtrusive, which is not
ferreted out for him by the faithful scent of
friendship
?
Can he plead unconsciousness as an apology
for anyeven the leastfault? If he but
stumble
,
does he not find five hundred friends, each
capable of the noblest self-sacrifice for the sake of
enlightening his mind as to the nature and
consequences
of his error? If he grow not perfect he
will have himself to blame.
This finding out one's friends is no small
incidental
advantage of a low estate. Much has
been said of fair weather friendsbut I fancy
the expression is generally misapplied. It refers,
undoubtedly, to those who smile when they ought
to frownwho try to cheer us under misfortune,
instead of aiding us by their hints and suggestions
in drawing lessons from it. Such friends should
be shunned, certainly even though it cost some
struggles of our weaker nature. They interpose
between the scholar and the teacher.
Economy, that first of virtues, should be the
precious lesson of poverty. Instead of this, the
rich are generally the most eminent professors of
the artor science, which is it? With such
striking examples before his eyes, how is it that
the poor man will allow himself to spend his means
with so little attention to their just distribution and
sure increase? It is not for want of good advice,
certainly, for that pours upon him from every
quarter; neither can he be in any doubt as to the
comfort bestowed by the mere sense of possession;
for if he has himself never tried it, he may see its
outward signs every day in the very walk of his
rich neighbor. He will tell you, perhaps, that the
little he has is barely sufficient for the purchase of
ordinary comforts. Comforts! here we come at the
ground of the error. A poor man has no business
with comforts. He should take advantage of his
position to study self-denial, and leave comforts to
those who have nothing better.
Humility toobut this is too obvious to be
dwelt upon for a single moment. A poor man
unhumbled
would be an anomaly indeed. Yet there
be some who slight their opportunities even in this
respect; who cling to their own opinions, maintain
their right to think for themselves, and decline
walking by the light of other people's wisdom.
Poor men sometimes build houses, and little shabby
inconvenient places they make of them. But will
they thank an opulent friend for his kind
suggestion
of improvements which might have been made
in the plan or its execution? Far from it! on the
contrary, nothing is more common than the reply
impatiently enough given too, sometimes,I
could not afford any thing so expensiveor,
This suits better with the circumstances of my
familyand this too in the very face of the
assurance that such a sum is a mere trifle when
one is building! Blind perversity!
How much is the world of art indebted to
poverty
benign! How many things had been left
undone if all the world had been rich! While we
are stupidly basking in the sunshine of prosperity,
nobody ever breathes a syllable to remind us that
we are wasting ourselvesthat we have dormant
abilitiesburied talentswhich ought to be
thrown into the public treasury. Even as weeping
skies, we are told, are requisite, in order to bring
the full spirit of fragrancy out of the flower, so
do the storms of adversity alone discover to
admiring
friendship the power (to help ourselves)
which might have lain unsuspected and unpraised
forever, if we had needed no aid. What
monuments
of genius had been lost to the world if the
rich and powerful had cruelly placed their
originators
above want, instead of keeping them as near
starvation as possible, for the benevolent purpose of
bringing out their powers! Do we not put out
the eyes of singing-birds?
There is not a more baleful passion, among those
which man encourages to torment him, than envy.
To feel that their condition may sometimes awaken
this cruel serpent in the bosoms of their
fellow-creatures
must be among the constant trials of the
wealthy. We have shown that pity would be the
more rational feeling, since the poor are the true
objects of envyyet, if there be an earthly ill
from which the gracious presence of poverty
secures
us entirely, it is this. The most sublime
virtues may be brought into action by adversity
without attracting a moment's notice. A poet may
fast and freeze in his garret, until his disencumbered
brain become the theatre of visions more unearthly
than Dante's, yet he runs no risk of being besieged
by rich men, clamorous to purchase his privilege.
The honest debtor may step lightly as he reflects
that long years of self-sacrificing effort are about
to be rewarded by the consciousness of a complete
satisfaction of all claims, but nobody will long for
his threadbare coat, even with the accompaniment
of the proud heart beating beneath it. Envy
follows
not the poor.
What a labor is that of the care of a great
estate
!
17*
How piteously rich men groan under their
burdens, and how they will sometimes be heard
to wish they had not a dollar in the world! This
shows their wisdom; and it must be confessed too
that they usually exhibit the influence of the most
exalted benevolence in not even attempting to
throw any part of the weight upon others. They
might often relieve themselves in this way, if it
were not for fear of increasing the cares of their
neighbors.
How very convenient it is to need neither locks
nor bolts! to lie down in peace, undisturbed by
fear of the midnight robber! to walk the streets
without the least solicitude about pockets! to be
able to take out one's purse without danger of
exciting
any body's cupidity!
The rich philosophize in words; the poor must
do it in deeds, which is more dignified. The
millionaire
sighs when he tells you that it is long
since wealth has been competent to purchase him a
single pleasure. The poor man congratulates
himself
as he finds his tastes and habits becoming more
and more suited to his circumstances. It might be
possible for the rich man to buy pleasure by trying,
on a small scale, the game of equalization;but
it may be feared that this would spoil the poor
man's philosophyso it must be better as it is.
But I must own this discussion to be somewhat
erratic; and I can only hope to be excused on the
ground of the increased interest felt in the subject
matter of our digression since the change in the
times. The philosophy of poverty is the study of
the day.
As for Lewis Arden's poverty, it was not only
inconvenient on the ordinary accounts, just as
other men's poverty is inconvenient, but it took a
shape of aggravated cruelty in his eyes, (Lewis
was no philosopherleast of all a Stoic,) from the
fact that it arose in great part from the indulgence
of unhappy temper, and thus helped to make
broader the chilling line of separation between
himself and the object of his affections;his
father's adversary being an inmate at Mr. Beamer's,
and a person of much influence in the family.
Not that all intercourse between the Ardens and
the Beamers was suspended by this unhappy course
of litigation. Such a thing was never heard of in
these parts. But this had been productive of too
much angry feeling, and Lewis Arden was too
decidedly on the
poor
side to allow of his urging
his suitat least so whispered a not dishonorable
pride. William Beamer was a bachelor, and had
saved an amount of property rather unusual in the
country; and this, he had declared, was to be
divided
among the children of his brother. So
Candace
was an heiressevery where an object of a
certain degree of importance, shilling calico to the
contrary notwithstanding.
Miss Duncan's efforts to estrange Candace from
her lover may have been instigated directly or
indirectly by William Beamer. He
may
have
whispered something of the obligation under which
the whole family would be laid by such a result, or
she may have whispered to herself that a bold
bachelor like William was a very proper person for
a damsel of five and twenty to oblige. The cause
may be doubtfulthe efforts were obvious enough.
Though Miss Duncan had spoken so
disparagingly
of the rich brown curls, she lost no
opportunity
of instilling into the willing ears of Candace
the idea that nothing but dress was wanting to
maker her a real beautyhandsome enough for
a clock-picter!
If your folk's people would only give you sich
things as you'd oughter have, there a'n't a girl in
this deestrict that could hold a candle to you!
Those girls that's took for clocks wouldn't be
nothing wonderful if it warn't for their bein' fixed
up so! I declare it is a shame that you shouldn't
have things suitable! your nose is kept to the
grindstone, and so! that's all about it!
So vehement was Miss Duncan's metaphorical
style that Candace put her hand to her nose
instinctively
.
But the young lady, not noticing this,
went on in the same strain, dwelling much upon
the view that where one is kept down to the
ground, one is obliged to keep company with low
people.
I don't keep company with any body, said
poor Candace, turning very red.
Well! I declare! look o' there now! how
people
does talk! Every body says you used to keep
company with that there Arden boy! I said I
knew you'd be above
that!
Them Ardens is as
poor as drownded rats, and as proud as Lucifer!
And Lewis Arden has said that you was too cheap
for him! I wouldn't bear that, any how!
Candace was thunderstruck. With all the
newly-raised
flutter of vanity in her little heart, there had
not yet been a serious thought of breaking with
poor Lewisbut what element of woman's nature
does not rise against this especial form of
disparagement
?
The simple maiden was transformed in
a moment. She said not a word, but her eyes
flashed, her cheek burned with natural indignation,
and the tempter saw her work as good as done.
You won't tell any one, will you? she said;
you'll get me into trouble if you do. I only
mentioned it out of friendship to you.
There was no need to extort a promise.
Candace
could as soon have died as mention the odious
subject. Her mind was a whirl of wounded pride,
new-born vanity, and a desire to act with the spirit
which she saw that her adviser expected, and withal,
a deep-rooted confidence in her lover's truth, which
could scarcely be shaken even by such testimony.
She had promptly denied the imputation of
keeping company with Lewis, and with truth;
for be it known that the term has with us a sort of
technical sense, which it would be difficult for me
to explain. Suffice it to say that it implies a
regular Sunday evening visit from the gentleman;
and that it is considered only part of the etiquette
of keeping company if the sitting is prolonged
far into the small hours, or even until daylight.
This mode of courtship has the parental sanction,
and is doubtless kept up in all modesty and good
faith; yet some of us have been inclined to think
that such a relic of the dark ages ought hardly to
maintain a place under the light of the nineteenth
century.
CHAPTER XLVI.
But now I'm as waefu' as waefu' can be;
Come summer, come winter, 'tis a' ane to me!
A feast
of quilts which was held in the
neighborhood
about this time afforded a convenient
opportunity to convince Lewis Arden that he was
not so happy as he thought himself. All the young
people were to be there, and Miss Duncan told
Candace that she never would forgive her if she
did not show some spunk. By way of security,
she administered a double dose of flattery, and
expended besides all her gayest taste in decorating
the simple girl with finery like her own. She
tortured the wilful curls into as fashionable a shape
as possible; laced to thread-paper size the graceful
and well-proportioned waist; and when she had
made Candace look as unlike her own sweet natural
self as possible, she hung round her neck that very
necklace of blue beads which made her own sallow
complexion look so muddy, but which set off the
pure white and red of the young beauty to a
dazzling
splendor, and matched the color of her eyes
better than any thing but living sapphires could
have done.
Now you look something like! exclaimed
the fashionable, when the great work was finished.
Them beads makes your neck look as white as a
curd! I've a great mind to make you a present
of 'em! What'll you give me if I do?
Candace had nothing, and therefore could make
no offer for the
present,
but Miss Duncan declared
that should make no difference.
You will find something, I dare say, said she
with an air of magnanimity, or may be your
mother will be a mind to give me one o' them nice
cheeses of hers
Candace was overpowered by such generosity,
and she could not help blushing with pleasure as
she gave a glance at her altered appearance, a bit
at a time, in a triangular fragment of looking-glass
which had been the only voucher for her beauty
before Miss Duncan came.
You
do
look like a picter, and no mistake!
exclaimed that lady, who was contemplating her
work with much self-gratulation; I hope you'll
treat that Arden boy with some sperrit! I should
let him know I wasn't too cheap for his betters!
A fellow that hasn't got a cent to be so uppish!
Strange! how soon this principle of estimation
finds its way to the woods!
It never entered the wise head of our little
Candace
to question the truth of Miss Duncan's report;
so there was a fine show of contempt at the
quilting
.
Lewis Arden's attentions were rejected in
every way, and although it was hard to make him
understand, yet at last the meaning of things seemed,
as Miss Duncan said, to get through his hair. He
said nothing however, but in spite of his efforts at
self-command, his brow grew redder and redder, till
the veins stood out like whip-cord, and his eyes
looked as if they would be consumed in their own
smothered fire. He took care to retort scorn for scorn
with ample interest, whispered to the prettiest girls
round the quilt, and at the romping scene of the
shaking and folding, and during the dance which
followed, any one who did not know Lewis Arden
would have set him down as the gayest of the gay.
Yet when the time for parting arrived, old habits
resumed something of their wonted power. In the
bustle of seeking bonnets and shawls he found a
moment to speak to Candace out of hearing of
Miss Duncan.
Candace! he whispered, are you in earnest!
We were not there, and nobody ever told us
but we can answer for it that the poor little heart
of Candace, angry as she tried to be, thrilled to its
core at these few words. But womanly pride came
to her rescue, and she gave a brief reply in the
newly-adopted tone of disregard.
Then I am not to go home with you to-night?
persisted Lewis, half choked with emotion.
No, I thank you, said Candace, running away
to hide the tears that would gush in spite of her,
and hurrying to join her new friend, who was
looking for her.
VOL. II. 18
It will be seen that our little country-girl was
an apt scholar; but such lore is soon learned. She
slept but little that night, however; and she would
have slept still less if she had known that Lewis
roamed till daylight through the leafless woods, in
a state of mind little short of madness. He was a
young man of strong feelings, and attached to
Candace with a passionate energy of which her
gentler nature could form but faint conception.
His character had been developed by difficulty and
hardship to a manly tone, which befits the
back-woodsman
well; but the sense of grinding poverty
rendered his feelings only the more keenly
watchful
against the very shadow of contempt.
Matters between Lewis and Candace having
come thus to an open rupture, every day served to
widen the breach; and the usual course of irritation
and misconstruction by which such people
ingeniously
help on their own misery rendered it very
unlikely that the broken cords would ever be
reunited. But turn we aside now, in order to say
something of the lawsuit, which had been
sufficient
to imbitter the feelings of the two families,
even without the malicious aid of Miss Duncan.
The main point in dispute was a certain
sugar-bush
,
the title to which had become doubtful by
means of some legal quiddities of which I can give
no account. Mr. Arden had been for several years
in quiet possession, and he looked upon the attempt
of William Beamer, a rich bachelor, (rich means
only that he might have been laid by with the
ague for six months or a year without coming to
the end of his means,)he looked upon such an
attempt to prove property, as an act of oppression;
not precisely one of those acts which prove the
rich to be the natural enemies of the poor,for
William Beamer, not being an
educated
man, did
not come quite within the category,but as an
unneighborly thing, against a poor man with a
large family;in shortan excuse for that
ruinous remedy, an angry lawsuit.
Perhaps my reader may require enlightening as
to how and why men should fight and hate each
other for years, and spend a great deal of money,
in order to establish property in a bush.
A sugar-bush, to some ears doubtless, brings no
idea more important than that of the Christmas tree
on whose stiff branches are hung the treasures of
Santa Claus;great coils of candy and horns of
sugar-plums and kisses; not to mention oranges,
raisins, figs, and many a pretty ticketed gift besides.
That would do for a city meaning of the term.
But where little boys and girls are obliged to make
tamarack-gum serve instead of sugar-candy, a
sugar-bush
means from two hundred to a thousand
maple-trees
,
grouped here and there within the circuit of
a mile or so; their luxuriant crowns making a cool
twilight under the hottest summer sun, and their
straight and polished shafts giving, in the glittering
winter moonlight, no faint idea of those remaining
columns of the fanes of old, so fraught with
associations
of grace and elegance to the mind of the
classic traveller.
We
say little about their beauty,
although it is probable that even here, that is not
without a degree of its own benign influence; but
happy he whose far-reaching eighties enclose a
sugar-bush!
A thousand miles from the ocean, even brown
Havanas cost money; and I believe it may be
asserted that all the world like sugar. A late
traveller tells us that his wild kervasha being to
whom one might have supposed a Cossack girdle
of raw pork would have been the more acceptable
daintywould bury his fingers in a plate of sugar,
and devour it by the handful; and we have
ourselves
known a grave philosopher from whom his
lady declared she should be obliged to lock up her
sugar-barrel. In these Western shades, to which
sugars from abroad come burdened with many a
profit, the taste is quite as conspicuous; and the
primitive resources of wild honey and maple sugar
are much sought after. Honey, though very
valuable
,
is not so universally adapted to the taste, and
therefore takes only the second place. The sap of
the soft-maple is used for a variety of household
purposes besides making sugar, so that what is
called the sugar seasonsomewhere about the
month of Marchis looked upon as a time of
domestic hilarity; and if the season prove favorable,
no pains are spared to secure all its advantages.
This implies no small effort, for no one makes a
business of sugar-making, important as it is. It is
an affair of expedients and special provision, year
after year;managed just in that disadvantageous
jack-of-all-trades sort of way with many other
operations
in a thinly-peopled region, where every
body engages in every thing.
The Indians used almost to monopolize the trade
in maple sugar. The mococks, or bark panniers in
which they brought the sugar to market, were
pretty objects at least, and the sugar itself brought
them something towards their wretched living.
The manufacture just suited them;a week's
labor to a month's rest is quite enough for an
Indian
.
But rumors got afloat that the red men
boiled their foodmusk-rats for instancein the
kettle of sap, during the sugar-making process;
and some said too that they used their blankets for
strainersall which contributed to bring the sugar
into bad odor(an unavoidable pun, reader!)so
there was one means of whisky-buying the less for
the poor wretches, before they left us.
Their first successor in the woods, the pioneer,
without sympathy for them personally, seems yet
to have imbibed, perhaps from the forest air,
somewhat
of their love of roving, their desire of freedom
from restraint, their dislike of continuous labor, and
their preference for such as promises a speedy
return
,
however small. Going into the sugar-bush
has something of the excitement which the forester
18*
loves so well to mingle, whenever and wherever he
can, with all his work. A dash of uncertainty
a chance of failurerelieves the tedium of mere
labor. An enterprise in the success of which
luck
is to have its share, is always undertaken with
more zest, as the hunter would lose half the
pleasure
of the chase if he were sure of bagging the
game.
But what can
luck
have to do with sugar-making?
The trees cannot run awaythe axe will cut
the gouge will piercethe troughs will hold
fire will burnsap will boil. True; but the sun
is fitful and will not always shine just enough and
not too much, nor the frost come always at night
and stay away by day. It may be too warm to
freeze, or too cold to thaw. It is this regular
alternation that brings delight to the sugar-boiler;
for it is only in the freezing process that the sap is
accumulated, and in the thawing that it is given
out. Nor is this all for which we look to
luck
.
The sap is sometimes not so nectareous as it should
be, and so yields less than its forty-eighth of the
delicious sweet which the man of kettles claims as
his due; and for an inferior yield luck gets always
the blame.
But when he lots of a good season, he reaps
a rich reward for his labor. The breaking up of
winter, when the frozen earth and frozen trees
begin to feel the sun's genial influence, is the
propitious
period. Winters of abundant snow are
more particularly favorable, as more frequent changes
of temperature usually attend its departure. In this
case, the sugar-maker sets forth with lively hopes,
and works indefatigably in preparing his troughs,
in which labor his only aid is his faithful axe,
with which he will scoop out two dozen a day.
This done, he selects the fairest treeshacks them
after a peculiar fashion, (opinions conflict on this
important
point,) and then places a bark conductor, or
something better if he can get it, so that no drop
of the precious liquid may escape the rough-cut
troughs arranged below. A huge lug-pole,
supported
on crotches, receives the kettles; which in
size and number are the best which can be found,
and these are usually each slung by the aid of an
ox-chain. With such primitive contrivances many
thousands of pounds of maple sugar are made every
year. No expensive apparatus, no attempt at
refining
if
we except a great tub of lime-water in
which to rinse every trough and bucket frequently
during the whole process of collecting the sap
and this is cared for only by the carefula small
minority.
But I am before my story a little. Sugar-making
is undertaken, as before hinted, by every body
indiscriminately
,
who can command a bush, and
this includes many whose disposable means could
not compass the purchase of
one
great caldron,
much less of half a dozen. This occasions a
racing and chasing after kettles;scouring the
country in all directions to borrow or hire those
indispensable articles. I have known them sought
at a distance of twenty miles, with a promise of
the payment of one half the value of the kettles, in
sugar. With a favorite object ahead, we are apt
to promise largely, and with the best intentions
too; and what an object is it to get plenty of sugar
for wife and children, without paying the grocer,
nay, with something to exchange with him for
tea for the good woman! If the season be
favorable
,
and the sap run well, and the bush be not too
far off, the aid of the wife is not unfrequently called
in, to tend fires and do the lighter part of the work.
I have seen the pony saddled, and wife and baby
mounted on it, and led into the woods, looking
like the picture of Joseph and Mary going down
into Egypt. What a primitive, pastoral air runs
through all the arrangements of this backwoods
life! It startles one sometimes to see things that
bring back the oldest scenes on record.
The process called sugaring-offrather an
abstruse affairis, I believe, not considered likely
to be quite perfect without the aid of female hands,
and the making of a sort of candy, pulled from
hand to hand scientifically, is to be done by the
young folks, of course. This is a frolic, or the
excuse for one; and the candy is beautiful and
most delicious. It is a part which I confess a
weakness for myself; and it is not without
sufficient
precedent; for many a gay
demoiselle
has
made her fingers sticky with
la tire
. But lest the
reader should imagine I have got fast among the
sugar-kettles, like a fly in a honey-pot, return we
to our lambslovers, I mean; only premising that
I expect thanks for this digression upon
sugar-making
,
as I take it for granted my reader is among
those who are about emigrating to these fruitful
wilds.
CHAPTER XLVII.
If from what her hand would do,
Her voice would utter, there ensue
Aught untoward or unfit,
She, in benign affections pure,
Sheds, round the transient harm or vague mischance,
A light unknown to tutored elegance.
Wordsworth.
The
season for sugar-making had arrived. The
sun was oppressively hot during the greater part of
the day, and yet the frost at night was as certain,
if not as severe, as in January. The usual anxious
race after kettles was in full cry, and all the world
had but one object of interest. At this crisis
William
Beamer gave due notice to Mr. Arden that he
should prosecute in case of any attempt to use the
contested tract, and Arden on his part made his
usual preparations, and proceeded to the boring of
the trees, as if his claim had been confirmed by the
majesty of the law. I dare say he was wrong;
but
our
principal concern in the matter lies with
our friend Lewis, who was sent on by his father to
maintain possession at all hazards. About five
hundred trees were bored,kettles set, and a
shanty built; and here Lewis, with a bed of
hemlock
branches, was to pass day and night, during
the whole sugaring season.
A wrathful man was William Beamer when he
was apprized of the cool determination of his
opponent
.
He cursed the slow process of law,he
revolved many a scheme of desperate vengeance,
and concluded by declaring that the Ardens should
never make a grain of sugar on that land, if he had
to burn every tree to eject them.
Miss Duncan, who thought she had made
considerable
progress in his good graces, and who now
began to talk of taking a school in the
neighborhood
,
took care that no whisper of village gossip
should escape his earno innuendo of want of
spunk,
no fear that he would be wronged out
of his property after all! She was one of those
spirits of unrest whose atmosphere is a storm,
however
petty. She made mischief, partly for the love
of it, partly because she fancied it increased her
consequence with the world in general, partly
hoping to gain an interest in the mind of William
Beamer, by feeding his angry humor. She felt as
if he'd oughter know what folks said! She could
not bear to see him imposed upon! Any body so
high-sperrited hadn't oughter be cheated out of their
own! Amiable creature!
Lewis had been two or three days at the
sugar-bush
,
assisted during the day by several men, but
passing his nights alone in the shanty. Brooding
over the treatment he had received, where he had
garnered up his heart, his reflections were of any
but a soothing character; and he had more than
once received William Beamer and his angry
remonstrances with an air of reckless defiance
which exasperated that worthy to the last degree.
On one of these occasions William came home
foaming with rage, and declared within hearing of
the trembling Candace, whose heart was sore with
sad misgivings since she had begun to see through
Miss Duncan a little, that he would bear it no
longer, but take the law into his own hands, and
settle up with the Ardens, short metre.
There's no chance at that rascal in the
day-time
,
with three or four stout fellows to back him,
said he; but I'll go this night, after he's left
alone, and I'll have it out with him, if it costs me
all I'm worth.
Well! I should think you'd put up with their
impidence long enough! said the amiable
Henrietta
;
you've had more patience with 'em than
I
should have had, I'm sure! I should have thought
you'd have given them their deservin's long ago!
I'll do it all up at one job, said William, as
he sat peeling a great hickory club in the corner.
The father's too old, or I'd give it to
him;
but
the young chap'll do! He's just such another!
clear grit, both of 'em! I used to like Lewis Arden,
there was something so manly about him; but he's
very much altered of late.
Candace seemed to have acquired a new sense of
hearing, so acute that every word her uncle uttered
fell on her quickened ear like a thrill of pain. Mrs.
Beamer tried to soften her brother-in-law's ire,
saying
that she knew
her
old man would not let him
get himself into trouble if he was at home, which
he did not happen to be just then.
Don't be so wrathy, brother, said she; them
that goes out head foremost is very apt to come
home feet foremost. Lewis Arden isn't the boy to
let any body walk through him. If you undertake
to dress him out, you'll like enough get hatchell'd
yourself. Lewis Arden could hug a bear.
Yes, but I'm an alligator, said William, on
whom Mrs. Beamer's eloquence was quite lost.
Call me at nine o'clock, will you, sister? he
continued, as he stretched himself out on two
chests at the back of the room, with a bag of corn
for a pillow, and the club laid on the floor close at
his side.
Indeed, I shall do no such thing! said Mrs.
Beamer, angrily. If you're bent upon such
unlawful
doings, you may wake when you can. I
will have nothing to do with it!
The good woman was aroused to an unusual
display of spirit by the warlike preparations of the
bachelor; and she bade Candace go to bed, and
showed a determination to prevent any of her
family from having any concern in the matter.
Never mind!
I'll
call you! whispered Miss
Duncan; and even as she spoke she took from her
work-pocket a guard-chain on which she had
been working so long that it had acquired quite a
VOL. II. 19
dusky hue, so that even the beads which composed
the touching motto
While this you vew
To me be trew
had lost their primeval lustreand seated herself
by the candle, with the air of one who has business
on hand, thus to await the destined hour.
Candace said not a word during this scene. Her
thoughts were in a whirl, and the only
distinguishable
point was danger to Lewis. All that had
estranged her was forgotten; she no longer gave a
thought to the offence against herself. Indeed, her
disgust at Miss Duncan's manuvres had already
gone far towards neutralizing the malicious efforts
of the school-ma'am, and all she now thought of
was how to warn Lewis of the meditated attack.
I'm glad enough, said William Beamer, just
before he dropped asleep, that Candace has given
that young scamp the mitten! She never should
have touched a cent of mine if she hadn't!
That was my doin's, warn't it, Candace?
said Miss Duncan with some exultation;
I
put
you up to that, didn't I?
But Candace was gone, so Miss Henrietta
Duncan
went on figuring her guard-chain, and William
Beamer, the alligator, snored like a hippopotamus.
All Candace's ingenuity could suggest but one
way of putting Lewis upon his guardto be
herself
the messenger. The sugar-bush was nearly
two miles off, and the ground was covered with a
thawing snow, which made walking peculiarly
difficult, but this did not give her a moment's
thought. The only hesitation she felt arose from
a natural reluctance to present herself before Lewis
under such circumstances; but the moments were
too precious to allow much deliberation upon this
point or any other. She had no doubt Miss
Duncan
would awaken William very punctually, and
the time was already short.
Fortunately for her undertaking, our ceilings
are not fashionably high, so that, stepping from her
window to a shed just beneath it, she was able to
spring to the snowy ground, with very little risk.
Then wrapping her cloak closely round her, she
sped forward like a true daughter of the forest, and
soon found herself in the midst of the newly-cleared
tract which lay between her father's and the
sugar-bush
.
The snow lay in huge drifts, with spaces
of half-frozen ground between; the night was
piercingly cold, and the stars looked as if they
were shivering in the pale, chilly sky. The
half-burnt
trees and stumps stood ghastly and
threatening
enough around her on every side, and there
are few sights more exciting to the unpractised
imagination than this; but Candace, who had
lived among them from her infancy, saw not the
horrid forms which they have often figured to
eyes that I know of, but merely simple and very
commonplace stumps, not burnt quite as thoroughly
as they should have been. Once indeed she did
fancy for a moment that she saw a squaw with her
pappoose on her back, but she soon remembered
that the red race had been driven far from our
borders, and her heart resumed its wonted beating,
and she turned all her attention to the devious
path, scarcely perceptible on the fading snow.
Ere long even this faint trace disappeared, and
the thickly-laced branches through which the way
led, scarcely admitted the faint starlight; so that
Candace wandered far and wide in blind
uncertainty
until she caught sight of a light which
she knew must proceed from the fires in the
sugar-bush
.
Towards this she now sped with renewed
courage, and it was not long before she could hear
the welcome sound of the crackling flames.
But the worst difficulty was yet to come, and
she leaned against a bending ash to recover her
breath and recall her waning courage. A dry
branch snapped, and Lewis Arden sprang from the
shanty.
Who goes there? he shouted.
Candace's quivering lips refused to frame a word.
Who is it? cried Lewis again, advancing
towards
her. A woman! ha! borrowed feathers!
and he grasped the cloak rudely and dragged her
forward, evidently suspecting some disguise which
the uncertain light did not allow him to penetrate.
Lewis! said Candaceand the young man
fell back as if he had received a blow.
You
here, Candace! he said; what is the
matter? what
can
have happened? are you in
trouble?
No, no,but, O Lewis!my uncleuncle
Williamand Candace could get no further.
What of your uncle? said Lewis, with much
less eagerness; has he sent you to persuade me
to give up my father's rights? nonsense! why did
you come on such a silly errand? There
was
a
timewhen
you,
Candace, could have wound me
round your fingerbut that time is past and gone
now.
Lewis, again began Candace, calling up her
prouder self, I only came to give you warning that
my uncle is coming here to-night, with such threats
such hard thoughtssuch angry wordsthat
I thoughtI feltI was afraid
Let him come! said the young man bitterly;
I am past caring for him or any body else. I am
sent here to maintain possession of this land, and I
shall certainly keep it, and it will be all the worse
for any body that shall try to drive me off. While
you were true-hearted, Candace, I never would have
raised a finger against your uncle or any one
belonging
to you; but since you have been bought
offor coaxed offor scared offno matter
whichall men are alike to meso you had
better go home again, and tell your uncle that you
have had no success.
No wonder that Candace was angry! no wonder
19*
that she needed no Miss Duncan to urge her to be
spunky!
Lewis! she said, as she prepared to return
homeward, I have been very silly, and I deserve
to be punished. If I made myself
cheap
before, I
have made myself cheaper now, and I shall take
very good care not to do it a third time. Good
night!
The emphasis on the unfortunate word was such
that Lewis threw himself in her path, insisting
upon an explanation.
Keep off! she cried, let me go! and so
angrily, that Lewis started back.
If ash-trees bore pumpkins weighing two
hundred
pounds apiece, our young folks might have
supposed
it a specimen of that kind of fruit which now
plumped heavily on the path between them. But
pumpkins (even Yankee ones) are mute, and this
huge object began at once to utter stranger sounds.
Oh dear! how sick we are! how bad we
do
feel! drawled the voice of William Beamer, drawn
out into a whine of the most exquisite mockery.
And he looked first at one and then at the other,
and burst into a laugh that made the woods ring
again. Well! I'd no more idee, he continued,
of catching a pair of turkle-doves to-night, than I
had of shootin' a painter! I came along a while ago,
and, thinks I, I'll climb up into this here tree, and
watch that chap a little, and see that he don't carry
pistols; and by and by who should I see a creepin'
along but Miss Candace Beamer, a comin' to visit a
young feller in a shanty! Hey, Candace! that'll
be a good story to tell, won't it?
Oh uncle! said Candace, crying with vexation
and terror, how
can
you! I only came because
you know mother thought it was very wrong
and I was afraidafraid you'd get hurt!
Oh! poor girl! yes! and the drawl came
again; you was afraid your poor dear uncle would
get hurt! But it forgot to say so at home, to uncle,
and it made itself dreadful cheap by comin' here to
tell Lewis about hurtin' uncle! But come, come,
never mind! continued he, relenting, uncle a'n't
half so bad as you thought he wasand it's ten to
one that Lewis a'n't half so bad as uncle thought
he was;and perhaps now, if all was known,
Lewis didn't say any thing naughty about
Candace
and
then how foolish we should all look,
eh!
Lewis did not lack words, and words do not
lack power when one's feelings are thoroughly
roused; so that Candace after a while was brought
to believe Miss Duncan might have been
misinformed
,
to take the mildest view of the case.
Uncle William waited with wonderful patience
through the explanation, but cut short Lewis's
superfluous protestations by tucking Candace under
his arm, and trudging home again through the
trackless wood.
The next morning, Lewis Arden came to Mr.
Beamer's to breakfast.
Pretty quick upon the trigger! muttered
uncle William; and Miss Duncan stared, to the
great hazard of her eye-strings. Mrs. Beamer,
however, announced that Candace was not well,
and could not come down to breakfast, which Miss
Duncan ascribed to
spunk
.
Well, I couldn't think where Candace was,
last night, said the fashionable; I reckoned she
was sick, and had gone to sleep with you.
Nobody
spoke. Miss Duncan perceived a dawning
coolness, but she had too much at stake to afford
to notice it. You all seem to be rather
dumbfoundered
,
this morning, she said.
Just at this moment a wagon stopped at the
gate, and one of the boys went out to see who it
might be.
Good day! shouted a loud hearty voice.
This is Jeems Beamer's, a'n't it?
The boy said, Yes.
Well! is my darter Keery here? said the
voice, and now Miss Duncan could not remark
upon other people's looks. The boy said, No.
Not here! why, Miss Flyaway said she was!
and thus saying, a stout old farmer walked in,
taking off his bowl-crowned wool hat, and
smoothing
down his hair with a great knotty hand.
Not here! he exclaimed again: why, you're
cracked, I guess! a'n't she a settin' there with your
folks, hey? How are you, Keery? How do you
stan' it?
To judge by Miss Duncan's countenance she
found it very hard to stand it at all.
The boy laughed. Why, that's Miss
Duncan
!
said he.
Miss Duncan, is it, hey! said the farmer;
then she must have got married since I heer'd
from her last. Her name
was
Kerenhappuch Ann
Dunks, when she left hum; and the Reverend
Believe Bissell of the town of Bean Creek, in the
State o' Maine, gin her that name, or the first part
on't, twenty-seven year ago the fust day of last
April. You a'n't married, be you, Keery?
Nor likely to be, thought William Beamer to
himself, but he said nothing.
The damsel, deeply mortified, said, No.
What did you change your name for, then,
Keery? said her father. Wa'n't your old
father's name good enough? it is an honest name,
and it seems to me you might have waited till you
got another of your own. But I s'pose you a'n't
to blame for bein' born on the fust of April, and I
s'pose too that that's the reason why you're so
fond o' readin' these here
nawvels,
as they call
'em. They make the gals greater fools than they
need be. But howsomdever, you're wanted to
hum now. Your poor old mother's sick, and
wants to see you. I've took the team off the
plough, and I've had a real chase after you.
Gather
yourself together as quick as you can.
Poor Keery needed no urging, but made ready
and departed, terribly crestfallen.
Well now, said William Beamer, rather
relieved
,
that job's settled up. I'll just fix off
another, since there's no knowin' how great a
fool a man
may
be. And without any delay he
made over to Candace Beamer all his right and
title in the contested land; which proved a very
satisfactory mode of putting a stop to the legal
quarrel between the Ardens and the Beamers,
since Lewis found but little difficulty in
concluding
a negotiation with the new claimant. The
sequel showed that William had judged well of
probabilities. The tough fibres of his heart had
been so much softened by the power of Miss
Dunks's charms, that the very next attack found
him unequal to any resistance; and he was
married
to a tidy damsel of the neighborhood, on the
very day which gave Candace and her sweet
heritage
to Lewis Arden.
CHAPTER XLVIII.
Wings have we,and as far as we can go
We may find pleasure: wilderness and wood,
Blank ocean and mere sky, support that mood
Which with the lofty sanctifies the low.
Dreams, books, are each a world; and books, we know,
Are a substantial world, both pure and good;
Round these, with tendrils strong as flesh and blood,
Our pastime and our happiness will grow.
Wordsworth
.
It
can hardly be necessary for me to confess
that it is not among our privileges to dip daily in
the ever-welling stream of current literature, and so
brighten our dusty notions. New books seldom
find their way into these shades. It must have
required no great penetration to discover that our
round is very limited; and for my own part I am
rather disposed to boast of this as one of our
advantages
.
We claim to be
deeper
read than our
neighbors. We have time to get the very marrow
out of one book before we are tempted with
another
.
We do not practise skimming, or finger
reading. We begin at the title-page and end at
finis, omitting not a word between; and then
begin at finis and go back again; and then begin
in the middle and read both ways. At least such
is my own practice, though I sometimes reverse
the mere order of the process, for which I quote no
less authority than that of Dr. Johnson himself.
If the man of one book is to be shunned as an
antagonist, I hope the woman of one or two books
may come in for at least a woman's share of the
respect due to intense concentration of ideas.
Some two or three years ago, a kind friend of
those left behind in the world sent us Lockhart's
Life of Scott, then newly out; a particularly
delightful
book both as to quality and quantity; a
literary
pice de resistance,
truly a cut and
come again. Upon this reservoir of good things
did I fasten with all the eagerness of famine, and
before I felt at all satisfied I found I had read it till
not a page in the whole seven volumes but was
perfectly familiar to me. It is a melancholy book
most melancholy;Moore's Life of Byron
scarcely more so;but it is so rich, so vivid, so
touching; so filled to overflowing with the deep
and boundless human sympathies of the world's
favorite, that it had for me a fascination perfectly
irresistible, and I took it for granted that every
body's head and heart were as full of it as my own.
When we took that pleasant peep at the outer
life to which reference was made somewhere in
these skipping pages, I felt much solicitude to
obtain a preparatory hint or two as to costume,
knowing how soon one's most respectable gear
may be left behind by the fleeting fashions; but I
never thought of a similar anxiety as to mental
array. What then was my surprise when
awakened
to the knowledge that in the whirling race
of mindit is no longer a march
my
book had
become one of the antiquated;that people had
forgotten it entirely! Here was a mortification!
to find one's only readingone's mental costume,
obsolete! I tried to hide my mistake, but it would
not do. I could not, for my life, remember not to
refer to my treasury, and to save people the trouble
of hunting up my allusions to musty literature I
was compelled to become a concordancea
walking
commentary upon the Life and Letters of the
Author of Waverley. If I should ever venture
forth again I mean to get the latest advices and read
up for the occasion.
But how I pitied such infatuation, and how I
exclaimed against the intellectual dissipation which
had allowed a multitude of skimmed books to cast
into the shade a treasure so far richer than all their
tribe! I only got laughed at for my pains. This
was counted among my Rip-Van-Winkle-isms.
But although I deferred habitually to such
opinions while I was myself within the influence
of the same whirl, I could not but return to my
own after some consideration of the matter in the
quiet atmosphere of my rustic home.
Circumstances
have much to do with our estimates of
every thing. Here in this little cell,this den
this nestthis crannywhere a
partie quarre
who should stand in the corners and make a
simultaneous
bow would be in danger of knocking their
VOL. II. 20
heads together,in this secret recess, whose
silence
and privacy are guarded by double doors, so
that no sound profane can ever penetrate its
twilight
precincts,here and here only, with none
but spiders' eyes to intimidate me, I dare avow
that I think the true delight and sweetness of
reading
lies in the dwelling upon the good and pleasant
thoughts of others until we incorporate them with
the texture of our own minds.
The thing may be carried to extremes, to be
sure. One of our compatriots, being solicited to
purchase one of those almanacs put out by the
benevolent, the reading matter of which has an
especial bearing upon one point of morals to the
exclusion of most other subjects, was heard to
reply
No! I don't like to have
all
my reading of one
kind!
This is further than I should care to extend my
notion of the concentration of ideas. But I cannot
help thinking that we of the country get more of
the true pleasure of reading than those whose
attention
is distracted by incessant novelty. And as
to the
utility
of reading, that must be proportioned
to the degree to which we are able to make the
thoughts of others our own, so that when we ply
the mental distaff we draw forth a newly-colored
threadtinctured with a hue formed we know not
howdistinct from that of our own ordinary
thoughts, yet not exactly resembling the color of
the thoughts of others;as red and blue, well
combined, form that richer and softer color, purple.
It is by some such tricks of fancy that we of the
wilds console ourselves for the want of the many
good things which have not yet found their way
so far. We exercise our ingenuity in discovering
our advantages. We praise peace and security (as
well we may, when we read of the bold advance
of crime!) and independence and industry. We
speak of the pleasure of seeing every thing about us
in a state of continual improvement, as contrasted
with the downward tendency of the over-wrought
world. We please ourselves with the idea that we
are preparing materials for the most enlightened
civilization, for those who are to succeed us, if not
for ourselves. We pity those whose ears are
doomed to an incessant roar of carts and
omnibuses
;
who cannot hope for a night's rest
unbroken
by terrific cries of fire and the sound of
melancholy bells.
If people who have been born and bred in the
country find it difficult to form an idea of the
splendor and importance of the great marts, those
who have lived nowhere but in that vortex of
excitement
can as little appreciate the calm,
contemplative
quiet of a country life. The contrast can
be imagined only by those who have tried both,
and to them it is marvellous indeed. It seems like
a glimpse of two separate worlds; or, to speak
more moderately, the difference may be compared
to that which marks the course of the Niagara;
in one place rapids and cataracts agitating the
mighty flood till the air is filled with a brilliant
spray, and earth trembles to the deep-voiced roar
of waters; and again, after only a single bend in
the river, a glassy, waveless expanse, whose
onward
movement is scarcely perceptible. Over the
one may now and then be discerned a glorious
rainbow, but the other reflects always the green
and peaceful shores, and the bright and steady
lamps of heaven. Yet I suppose one must be like
the fish, cold-blooded, to prefer the still water.
A comparison between the advantages and
disadvantages
of city and country life, though in the
estimation of some not deserving of even a
question
,
is yet to a certain class of thinking people no
uninteresting subject. The lot of the great
majority
of mankind is determined more by
circumstances
than by choice; but there are yet a few
who deliberate and decide upon this momentous
point, feeling within themselves the power to
govern circumstances, if not completely, yet to a
degree of which more timid spirits know nothing.
Providence regulates our condition not so much by
the bestowal of fortune as by the gift of a greater
or less amount of energy and ability; and daily
observation shows that none are so often the mere
puppets of circumstance as those who are born to
the possession of wealth such as might seem to
promise a command over the world's most enviable
positions.
There are some who, though dissatisfied with
their condition, and without the materials of
ordinary
content, yet make no effort towards a better
lot; but this is a class scarcely worth considering,
in our country at least.
The number of those among us who feel the
disadvantages of a wrong position or an
overcrowded
arena, and who are full of determination
to remedy the evil, and only deliberating upon the
best mode of accomplishing this, is an immense
onelarger probably at the present moment than
ever before in the history of our nation. To this
fact is to be ascribed the interest with which all
works touching upon the condition of this great,
growing Western countrythis peculiar field for
the energetic and the enterprisinghave been
regarded, for some years past.
It was not without an especial reference to this
state of things that these simple and unpretending
sketches were undertaken. Their form was
scarcely
a matter of choice. Politics and statistics are
work for wiser heads, and abler hands, and more
extensive information. But views of society have
been thought to come legitimately within the
feminine province, and for this purpose the
humblest
form has been adopted;that which
ventures
only upon a general outline of truth, with a
saving veil of acknowledged fiction.
When I began this second attempt to note some
of the peculiarities of the Western settler's life, it
was my intention to have dwelt rather more upon
such portions of our experience as related
principally
to our own simple selves. But before I had
proceeded far I made the discovery that the day
had gone by for such plain personal
reminiscences
as filled the pages of A New Home. A
stranger, feeling as a stranger, equally indifferent
to all, writes with a freedom which a friend and
neighbor of several years' standing must renounce
entirely. It is impossible to describe minutely our
own personal experience without giving in some
degree the experience of others; and this is a
matter
requiring careful handling, to say the least.
We may say of ourselves what we must not say
of others. We may describe our own log-house,
but woe betide us if we should make it appear
that any body else lived in one! We may tell of
our own blunders, but we must beware how we
touch upon the blunders of others.
So that upon the whole I thought I should
better succeed in my object of giving a fair and
truthful picture of our present condition, if I
allowed
general inferences to be deduced by the
reader from such recollections of real life as I
might without offence lay before him. That my
views are drawn from real life need not be doubted,
when it is considered that a very monotonous
course of daily cares, such as falls to the lot of
most housekeepers in this region, is not likely to
brighten the inventive faculties, or to give wings
to the fancy.
If it should be thought that such a state of things
as I have pictured is not very enticing to the
educated
and refined, I can only say that the
emigration
of a few such persons as the objectors
themselves
would soon add all that is desirable. Every
natural advantage is already ours, and the
foundation
for the best and most substantial state of
society is laid in an unusually orderly and moral
population. I wished to be fair. If I had written
as a partisan, the addition of a few shades of
dashing
color would have made a more glowing picture,
but it would have been at the expense of truth.
I now take my leave for the present, only
remarking
that the want of continuity observable in
these sketches is to be ascribed, in part at least, to
their having been written at long intervals, and
under every variety of hinderance.
Leaving to the last what might more properly
have been said at first, I entreat the reader not to
puzzle himself by endeavoring to draw the line
between the true and the imaginary; but to
surrender
himself to the writer, and go with her in
good faith; looking only for such amusement or
instruction as may be found in what professes not
to be a narrative of facts, but only the
Picture of
an Idea
.
END.LETTER I.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
Is it possible, my dear Williamson, that after your
experience of the world's utter hollownessits
laborious pleasures and its heart-wringing
disappointments
you
can still be surprised at my preference
of a country life? you, who have sounded to its
core the heart of fashionable society in the old
world and the new, tested the value of its
friendship
,
and found it less than nothing; sifted its
pretensions of every kind, and expressed a thousand
times your disgust at their falsenessyou think it
absurd in me to venture upon so desperate a plan
as retirement? You consider me as a man who has
taken his last, worst step; and who will soon
deserve
to be set aside by his friends as an
irreclaimable
enthusiast. Perhaps you are right as to the
folly
of the thing, but that remains to be proved; and
I shall at least take care that my error, if it be one,
shall not be irrevocable.
It is true I left England in what you think a
temporary disgust; but the circumstances of
difficulty and vexation which suggested the removal
to America were of any thing but a momentary or
accidental character. It is true that I had been
tolerably successful, but it is also to be recollected
that in pursuance of my favorite plan I retired
earlier
then was warranted by prudence. This step
once taken was irretrievable. I had made choice
of a residence in the vicinity of D, and there,
in the society of a few intimate friends, I hoped to
pass the afternoon of life in the repose which
belongs
to unambitious thoughts, and a sincere though
humble love of letters. And I still think the dream
might have been realized, but that it pleased
the Almighty to take from me the wife of my
bosom; the being to whose companionship the
whole scheme owed its charm, and without whose
society and sympathy I could no longer hope for
happiness. My Charlotte once gone, the whole
aspect
of life was changed. My quiet home, before so
charming, wore an air of gloom which I could not
endure. The very sight of the infant which
remained
to me, gave me almost as much pain as
pleasure. I felt as one might who should see the
last plank slip from his grasp, leaving him to
struggle
unaided on the boundless ocean.
As the bitterness of grief began to soften under
the blessed influence of Time the consoler, I
felt a desire to mingle again with my fellow-men;
to seek in company the solace which my own
fireside
now denied me. I found my friends kindly
anxious to aid my return to cheerfulness and hope,
but a new difficulty soon presented itself. My
fortune
,
though sufficient for the simple and
unambitious
style which had fully satisfied my Charlotte's
wishes and my own, was far inferior to that of my
own family connections. These all lived in a
handsome and hospitable way, and when I began
to mingle with them in the frequent interchange of
visits, I was struck with the difference which
existed
between their establishments and my own.
While Charlotte lived I had never given it a
thought, but now, I was more dependent upon
circumstances, and these things made me
uncomfortable
.
It was a poor grief for a philosopher, I
own; but who has not felt the obstinate force of
petty vexations? I resolved against such unworthy
emulation, and at the same time detected myself in
contriving plans by which this unlucky inferiority
might be rendered less apparent. I felt my
difficulty
to be contemptible, yet it did not the less
disturb the enjoyment that I had hoped to find in
society.
Add to all this that Lord, on whose estate I
lived, and whose propensity to every variety of
ingenious
insolence is as well known to you as to
myself, thought proper to desire my conversion
to his own political views. From the moment
that he found I scorned his insidious bribes, he
became my bitter enemy; and unfortunately he
discovered, in my natural irritability of temper, now
not a little increased, all that he could wish for the
exercise of his petty malice. My life from this
time became intolerable. The consciousness that
I had thrown away the means of placing myself
6*
on a level with my friends, and in a good degree
beyond the reach of my overbearing neighbor,
vexed me to the soul, and at this very juncture,
and while I was boiling under a new insult from
Lord, I met with a considerable lossa loss
which diminished my income materially. My
dear Williamson, can you blame me for coming to
America, where my small means would still enable
me to live comfortably, if not handsomely; and
where I could hope to be always secure from the
insolence of the little great?
I have not thus far been disappointed in the
expectations I had formed of this land of true
liberty and equality. If I have at times wished
for a little more deference in the manners of the
lower classes, I have found even more worth and
dignity in the higher walks of life than I had
anticipated. The difficulty of which many of our
friends have complained as counterbalancing in a
great degree the advantages of a residence in
America,that, I mean, which arises from the want
of good servants,I obviated by bringing with
me from England several faithful domestics, who
serve me with no diminished zeal in the new world.
And on this side the water I have found, as you
well know, a successor to my Charlotte, a successor
worthy to be such; a mother to my daughter, a
friend inestimable to myself; a countrywoman of
my own too, and one whose views of life coincide
in all particulars with mine.
You will perhaps inquire, why, with these
advantages
,
I could not content myself in the city?
Simply because I longed for the freedom and
independence
of the woods. I cannot feel that I have
come to Americadistant, young, wild, new
Americatill I have seen her in her own peculiar
form; till I have learned to know her by those
features which distinguish her so decidedly from
the old world. I feel that the mountain nymph,
sweet Liberty, must be loveliest in her own
national
and characteristic costume. A city life, or a
life made up of city habits, is the same in
essentials
every where. There is the same living for
others rather than one's self; the same emulation
in despicable trifles; the same unmeaning bustle;
the same
gne;
in London, in Paris, in
New-york
,on
a greater or a smaller scale as the case
may be. I am tired of these. I am willing to
give upI will not say forever, for who can
answer for himself?but for a time at least, the
very questionable advantages of a life of
hackneyed
movements and recurring fatigues, for one of
primitive simplicity, of hardy exercise, of
uninterrupted
intellectual culture.
My dear Florella, who has the
single-heartedness
of a child, joined with much originality and
independence of feeling, agrees with me entirely.
She is as anxious as myself for unbroken mornings,
promenades
en deshabille,
and long cheery evenings
ending at ten o'clock. We bring books, music,
and all the means of comfort and employment;
and with these and the cherished correspondence
of a few dear friends (yourself among the number
we count on) we can never be dull even in the
woods which you represent as so ineffably dismal.
I shall give you a token now and then that ennui
has not absolutely devoured us; and I promise to
be honest. I will give you the dark shades of the
picture as well as the sunshine. And you in return
must promise to reform your worldly opinions, and
dress your estimate of comfort after our model in
any degree you shall see fit. Honor bright!
Yours,
T. Sibthorpe
.LETTER II.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
* * *
Since
my last we have taken up our
abode in the wilderness in good earnest,not in
sober sadness, as you think the phrase ought to
be shaped. There is, to be sure, an insignificant
village within two or three miles of us, but our
house is the only dwelling on our little clearing
the immense trunks of trees, seemingly as old as
the creation, walling us in on every side. There
is an indescribable charm in this sort of solitary
possession. In Alexander Selkirk's case, I grant
that the idea of being monarch of all I survey,
with an impassable ocean around my narrow
empire
,
might suggest some inconvenient ideas. The
knowledge that the breathing and sentient world
is within a few minutes' walk, forms, it must be
owned, no unpleasant difference between our lot
and his. But
with
this knowledge, snugly in the
background, not obtrusive, but ready for use,
comparative
solitude has charms, believe me. The
constant sighing of the wind through the forest
leaves; the wild and various noises of which we
have not yet learned to distinguish one from the
otherdistinct yet softly mingledclearly
audible
,
yet only loud enough to make us remark
more frequently the silence which they seem
scarcely
to disturb, such masses of deep shade that even
in the sunny spots the light seems tinged with
greenthese things fill the mind with images of
repose, of leisure, of freedom, of tranquil happiness,
untrammelled by pride and ceremony;of
unbounded
opportunity for reflection, with the richest
materials for the cultivation of our better nature.
Nothing can be more delicious than the weather
at this season, in this Western country. Italian
skies may be
set
off, perhaps, by relics of ancient
power and splendor, and still more by the
associations
connected with those relics; but I am certain
that even you, scornful skeptic as you are on all
points touching what you are pleased to call rural
fury, could not deny that the deep, transparent
blue which roofs this natural Coliseum, gives out
the outline of yonder towering elm with an
accuracy
a
delicacywhich no Calabrian azure ever
surpassed. The very sun-glints that flash from the
white wings of the eagle which, even as I write,
soars majestically across the sky, are distinctly
visible
,
though the distance is so great as to make the
bird of heaven seem scarce larger than a dove.
But I am forgetting that all this will cost you
numberless
Fudges,
and I will quit the poetical
for the practical at once. Know then, O
common-place
mortal! that the fates have not denied to
your mad friends a tolerably comfortable house;
or rather, (I make the acknowledgment lest you
should be tempted by my descriptions to visit us
before we make our additions, and so accuse me
of delusion or exaggeration,) I confess that the
present house is, more properly, the beginning or
nucleus of a house, than a structure deserving that
title as serving for a gentleman's residence. Yet
here, where no allowance or provision is to be made
for pride, and where there is no necessity for
spending
money to buy the good graces of people who
are nobody to you, and who care as little about
you in return, the house answers our temporary
need tolerably well, having a (so called) parlor; a
kitchen; a bedchamber, of modest dimensions it
is true; a closet for our little Charlotte, and a loft
for Chadwell and the faithful Rose, who is willing
to put up with any thing but the
hodd
ways of
the people. John and Sophy, who, as you know,
have, by the aid of a neighboring justice of the
peace, lately become one, are obliged at present to
find lodging at the house of a neighbor who lives
somewhere within a mile of us, in the depths of the
wood.
On our first arrival, John proposed making an
extempore lodging-room in the barn, on which
occasion
we discovered that this essential addition to
a country house had been quite forgotten in my
survey of Mr. Doolittle's flattering bargain. You
may laugh, but who can think of every thing? and
really, the weather is so fine, that one is almost
independent of roofs and walls. A bivouac
beneath
such skies, would be rather attractive than
appalling.
Some difficulties have attended the transportation
of our movables, and I find too that my estimate
of the must-haves was rather limited. Florella,
who is, you know, of a meditative and abstract turn
of mind, would have thought a still shorter list
might comprise all that was necessary. But she, as
well as myself, will be glad of your friendly aid in
procuring for us certain articles which you will find
enumerated at the close of my letter, and which you
will be so good as to see securely packed, and
forwarded
to the care of Messrs., Detroit. The
piano-forte has not yet arrived, and I confess
myself
at a loss how to bestow it when it does come.
It had not occurred to me, that in a very small
parlor
,
embellished with no less than six doors and
four windows, to say nothing of a staircase and an
immense fireplace, there would be but little space
for large articles of furniture. And the sofa on
which I promised myself many a sweet siesta
during
the hot months, is taking its own rest
undisturbed
in its box, under a shed at some distance
from the house. But we shall soon build, and then
these little inconveniences will be obviated.
Besides
,
are there not sofas of turf? I find them a
more than tolerable substitute when they do not
smell of rheumatism.
In one respect I find myself disappointed. The
wheat lands, which I bought at a large additional
cost in consideration of their being broken up and
planted, wear at present an appearance very little
promising as to the approaching harvest. Wide
strips of unbroken soil intervene between the
scattered
lines of the plough; and if any seed was
sown on these, the solid sward has sent up no
return. The broad field that I survey just now
from the window, bears at least as much
resemblance
to a great green gridiron as the Escurial
does to a stone one. But it is something to feel
one's self a proprietor of the soil, and I anticipate
much pleasure in sending my own wheat to the
mill, be it little or much. I think however I can
now perceive why my friend Mr. Doolittle
complimented
me so highly on the extent of my
agricultural
knowledge, and declared his sentiments on
the subject of farming to agree precisely with my
own.
My letter is already femininely long, yet I must
give you an instance of rustic simplicity which
occurred this morninga verification indeed of
your repeated prediction. A stout youth of twenty
years or so applied for work, stating that he had
hearn tell how the 'squire wanted a hand. I
was glad to obtain an addition to our effective
force, and the bargain was nearly concluded when
our swain broke in with,
I say, uncle! does your hands eat with you?
Conceive of the question if you can, and you will
readily imagine the answer: but you can never
VOL. II. 7
paint to yourself the air with which this untamed
son of the forest turned on his heel, saying with
the utmost coolness,
If I a'n't good enough to eat with ye, I a'n't
good enough to work for ye, that's all!
Think of such companionship for Florella, who,
though a democrat in principle on all important
points, is, in personal habits, quite as fastidious as
one could wish. To me these things would be
matters of indifference, especially where the
contact
was only for a limited period. Mere accidents
in social condition are nothing in themselves; and
I have too high an idea of the dignity of labor to
despise the practical agriculturist, though I may
not relish his manners. But with ladies the case
is different, and I shall never attempt to conform,
in this particular, to the customs of the country,
When John and Sophy get their log-house finished,
they will relieve us from the disagreeable necessity
of boarding hands.
Do not fear such unreasonably long letters in
future
.
I expect to be much occupied with building
and other improvements, and shall hardly have
time to weary you with my favorite topics.
Ever yours,
T.
Sibthorpe
.LETTER III.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
My dearest Catharine,
Why
have I not written you a dozen letters
before this time? I can give you no decent or
rational apology. Perhaps, because I have had
too much leisureperhaps too many things to
say. Something of this sort it certainly must be,
for I have none of the ordinary excuses to offer
for neglect of my dear correspondent. Think
any thing but that I love you less. This is the
very place in which to cherish loving memories.
But as to writing, this wild seclusion has so many
charms for me, this delicious summer weather so
many seductions, that my days glide away
imperceptibly
,
leaving scarcely a trace of any thing
accomplished
during their flight. I rise in the
morning
determined upon the most strenuous industry.
My broken credit with half a dozen
correspondents
whom I have treated as ill as yourself is to
be entirely redeemed before dinner. For this
purpose
I place my desk before a window that opens
towards the west, and which is consequently
shaded
during all the earlier part of the day. Here do
I seat myself with the resolute air of one who is not
to be tempted from duty. Nothing before me but
huge trees, between whose ancient mossy trunks
no ray of any but soft green light can reach the
moist sward below. The only sound is that of
the sighing wind that scarcely stirs the heavy
verdure
,
yet makes its presence known by a ceaseless
moan resembling almost precisely the soft rush of
summer waves upon a pebbly beach; magic music
any where, and fraught with dreams; but
particularly
so where we feel, as it were, alone in the
august presence of Nature, with nothing to limit
the flights of fancy, and with an unbounded leisure
which seems to promise time for every thing. Pen
in hand, eyes unconsciously exploring the
mysterious
arcades of the forest, behold your friend, her
heart full of affection, and her head of pleasant
musings, still hesitating for materials for an epistle,
which were never to seek while surrounded with
all that is supposed likely to occupy or to distract
the mind.
It may be that I have a lurking doubt of your
sympathy in the strange pleasure with which these
solitudes inspire me;or, possibly, a cowardly
fear of the ridicule that is always attached, by those
who live in the fashionable world, to any thing
which approaches the romantic, whether in
sentiment
or action. A true enthusiast, however, would
rather anticipate your speedy conversion, and, at
worst, why should I dread your kind smiles? You
could not, if you would, make me ashamed of my
happiness, and I am sure you would not if you
could.
* * * * * *
Our way of living just now is odd enough. John's
house is so nearly finished that he and Sophy live
in it and take our work-people as boarders. This
is quite convenient for us, since we could not
obtain laborers on any other terms. But I find
Sophy is sadly missed as the head of domestic
affairs, (I forget whether Mr. Sibthorpe has
mentioned
in any of his numerous and
lengthy
epistles,
that Chadwell has left us and returned to
New-york
,
because she couldn't a-bear the 'orrid beer
as they makes in Michiganthough this her
chosen comforter was manufactured by a
countryman
of her own, who is considered quite an adept
in the art.) Sophy's invention was all in all to Rose,
whose materials are so limited as to require all
Caleb Balderstone's ingenuity in order to set a table
which shall in any degree accord with her ideas of
propriety. Truth to say, I had a very unpractical
idea of what sort of things would be needed for
forest life. I forgot that our habits must be in
some degree the standard, whatever should be the
circumstances, and in planning for a simple country
life, I did not take into account the fact that we
had yet to learn to be country people. I find we
must simplify our habits exceedingly, to make out
at all with the moderate amount of household
conveniences
7*
we thought it necessary to bring with
us. But my good spouse is, as you know,
tant
soit peu
fidgetty about small matters, (he is
looking
over my shoulder even now,) and instead of
simplifying our habits, he is bent upon complicating
our accommodations, as I think very needlessly; for
we have already a list far greater than our
neighbors
,
who, most philosophically, make one thing
answer for a dozen different uses. Sophy has
already caught the spirit of the country, and is
beginning to keep house with a mere handful of
the simplest utensils.
Where we can possibly find places for all the
articles Mr. Sibthorpe has ordered, remains yet
to be discovered. Even after our new buildings
are completed, I fear there will be many very
excellent
and desirable things in the lamentable case
of the Primrose family picture.
We have been very civilly treated by our
neighbors
of the village; and we find several among
them whom we can visit with pleasure. These
seem delighted at having an addition to their little
circle, and we are not at all disposed to exclude the
cultivation of the social feelings from the
enjoyments
of country life. Here will, as I foresee, be
the grand difficulty after all. For want of
congenial
society one is in such danger of becoming
selfenclosed
and unsympathizinga most unlovely,
inhuman, and wicked form of pride, and one which
we must guard against if we would not forfeit our
share of that mercy, which is our only hope, and
which embraces alike the whole human family.
I can already perceive, that for want of this
companionship one may in time become too
bookish
,
too citatory and pedantic, through lack of that
fusion by conversation, which refines and
naturalizes
one's literary stores. One is apt to read too
much, and too miscellaneously. And as to writing,
it is so much more delightful to read other people's
reveries than to put one's own thoughts into words!
Doing nothing has so many charms, that even
writing looks like work, by contrast. The very
idea of an abundance of leisure makes us use our
leisure unprofitably. I have sketched out many
systems of regular employment; but never did
society, even in my gayest days, beguile me of my
resolutions of improvement like the enticing quiet
of the cool woods, with the certainty of long days
of delicious reading and reverie, undisturbed by
visitors and untrammelled by ceremony. I fear my
reformation must wait for rainy weather, since I
can never summon resolution to deny myself the
pleasure of rambling under such skies and such
moonlight as ours.
Dear little Charlotte feels all the delight of this
charming season. Her eyes seem always full of
gentle pleasure, and she often employs herself for
whole hours in weaving wreaths of wild flowers,
and dressing with them a great hollow tree in
which her large doll is seated, looking in its scarlet
frock like the lady in the lobster.
As for your friend my husband, it would require
the pen of De Foe himself to give a just idea of
his occupations, his plans, his expedients; his
ingenuity in contriving, his zeal in executing, the
various conveniences of our new dwelling. But
most surprising is the exemplary patience with
which he endures the many vexations attendant
upon employing workmen who are accustomed to
build according to their own very peculiar ideas,
and who require to be argued, if not persuaded,
into every deviation from the established method
of the neighborhood. For instanceit is difficult
to convince these primitive utilitarians that the
spacing of windows and doors is of any
consequence
;
or that to place the windows of two
stories exactly one over the other can make any
material difference in the appearance of a house. It
took a full hour to make our principal architect
acknowledge that water would run off a roof which
sloped at any less than quarter-pitch. In
passing
through the larger sort of villages in this
Western
world, you will notice comparatively few
proofs of this erratic taste; but the workmen who
content themselves in little isolated settlements are
often almost self-taught, and they frequently unite
farming with their other avocations, so that they
feel comparatively little interest in giving
satisfaction
or acquiring reputation in their several trades.
Nevertheless we feel that these are the people
whom we ought to employ while we live among
them, and we must, in common justice, bear
witness
to their good-humor and their obliging
dispositions
.
They argue, but they quarrel not, which
is something where opposition is so frequent. I
must confess that my indolence would have led me
to give up all the points that Mr. Sibthorpe has so
faithfully contested inch by inch. Indeed I often
run away to escape even the echo of one of these
interminable argumentations.
The result of all will be, I believe, a pretty
cottage
,
built without the violent contravention of any
of the ordinary rules, yet presenting an exterior of
rustic plainness, suited at once to its position in the
wild woods, and to the limited purse of the
proprietor
.
If we want pillars and arches, and corridors
and cloisters, we have them all close at hand, built
by mighty Nature, and ready to put to shame man's
puny efforts at imitation. This architecture never
tires. To me at least it is always new and
delightful
;
at once satisfying the eye, exciting the
imagination
,
and filling the soul with the most profound
sense of the presence of the divine Author.
Nature herself, it seems, would raise
A minster to her Maker's praise!
Nor for a meaner use ascend
Her columns, or her arches bend.
I am sure even your cloudless gaiety would feel
and own the sense of solemn awe which these
ancient shades are so well calculated to inspire.
But I must recollect, too, that you may very
possibly
weary of it as a theme, in my hands especially
so I spare you.
Write me soon and often, and pray write
yourself
out,
as I have done, or I shall learn to be
ashamed of my enthusiasm and may egotism.
Yours ever,
F.S.LETTER IV.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
My dear Williamson,
July 15th
.
I hoped
to have been before this time so
deeply engaged with studs and siding, casings and
cornice, that letter-writing would have been out of
the question. But my lumber is at the saw-mill, and
all the horses in the neighborhood are too busy to
be spared for my service. I must have, of course,
horses of my own, but it is necessary first to build
a stable, so that I am at present dependent on
hiring them when necessary. This, I begin to
perceive, will cause unpleasant delays, since each
man keeps no more horses than he needs for his
own purposes. Here is a difficulty which recurs
at every turn, in the country. There is nothing like
a division of labor or capital. Every body tills the
ground, and, consequently, each must provide a
complete equipment of whatever is necessary for
his business, or lose the seasons when business
may be done to best advantage. At this season,
in particular, this difficulty is increased, because
the most important business of the year is crowded
into the space of a few months. Those who hire
extra help at no other period, now employ as much
as they are able to pay, which increases much the
usual scarcity of laborers. It is the time of year,
too, when people in new countries are apt to be
attacked
by the train of ills arising from marsh
miasmata
,
and this again diminishes the supply of able
hands.
I confess that this view of the obstacles to a
comfortable
outset in rural life had not occurred to me,
though I recollect having been struck by an
observation
of Sir Walter Scott in a letter to a friend
who was looking towards a country life; that if
one wants a bowl of milk, in the country, it is
necessary to keep a cow; while in the city you
need not buy a pennyworth more than you require.
I have cause to feel the practical good sense of this
observation twenty times a day, since we are
discovering
a thousand wants which have always
heretofore been so regularly and so easily supplied,
that we did not remember that they were wants.
Florella, who has never taken much interest in
household matters, finds only amusement in these
various deficiencies and inconveniences, as well as
in poor Rose's ludicrous perplexities and solemn
disapprovals of every thing to which she has been
unaccustomed. Rose declares against the people
and their ways, which she pronounces the
oncivilizedest
in the world, quite unaware all the time
that she herself is utterly incapable of one sentence
of pure English. I wish you could have seen her
yesterday, when a little boy came to me, without
salutation of any sort, with,
I say! what do you guess about lending me
your axe for a spell? Do you reckon you can
spare it?
I think but little of these instances of rusticity,
but I must say that the example of entire want of
personal deference, which is customary here, has
already some influence upon the manners of my
own peoplealways excepting Rose, who is too
devoted a creature to be spoiled by any example. I
can perceive that John and Sophy, who are
beginning
,
since their marriage, to feel something of
a separate and selfish interest, are not quite so
respectful in manner as before, although in their
services I have nothing to complain of. This is to
be expected, I know, but it is not pleasant in proof.
Little Charlotte is the person most disturbed by
the delay in our building operations. Children are
always longing for something new, and can
appreciate
none of the obstacles which often thwart our
best-laid plans. She wonders why papa cannot
build a pretty log-house, like John's, which she is
never weary of extolling. In truth I, who am
obliged almost to rest on my oars, look at John's
rapid progress with a feeling akin to envy. He
has but borrowed a few days' work of his
neighbors
,
which he is to repay in kind when called
upon; and with this slight aid to his own good
arm, his neat little dwelling is almost finished,
while mine, simple as it is to be, must wait the
VOL. II. 8
convenience of others, whom I am ready to pay
well for their services.
It is really surprising, the advantage which a
capacity for manual labor bestows, in a state of
society
like this. Money is comparatively ineffectual,
where there is no competitionwhere your
laborers
are sure that if you discharge them you can get
no others, and that the pay must ultimately fall into
their hands; any trifle is permitted to stand in the
way of serving you. But it would not do thus to
disappoint a neighbor, whose assistance you may
require upon some occasion of great haste or
importance
so
that here, as in other cases, the
strong-handed
have the best of it.
It is often supremely vexatious to find that
people will exercise their judgment as to whether
your occasion for despatch is as pressing as their
own, or as that of some neighbor. Even after
making a positive engagement to help you (for
pay) it is no uncommon thing to find your
workman
turning his back on you and his promise for a
while, having made up his mind that you can wait
better than others. Thus one has the double care
of making a bargain and inducing the other party
to keep it when made. It is no uncommon thing
to make a bargain and then hire it to be kept. I
must acknowledge there is, from some cause, a
laxity of morals on this same point of
bargain-making
.
While more ready than the people of
older countries to give gratuitous aid to each other
in straits and difficultiesmore inclined to be
generousour backwoods neighbors are less
observant
of their engagementsjustice being a far
less attractive and popular quality. They like a
little show about their virtues, like the world on a
larger scale. You know I promised you the shades
of the picturebut to return to the pointwhat
was it? Oh! John's house.
Charlotte is especially charmed with John's
chimney
.
It is so like baby-house buildingslender
sticks crossing each other at right angles in such a
manner as to form a hollow squareand this
carried up entirely on the outside of the house; it
has quite a gimcrack air. What Charlotte's
opinion
will be when she sees the whole finished
within
and without by a thick plastering of mud, I
cannot say. Even the house whose neat rustic
appearance so charms her, has to be chinked and
mudded, i. e. have its interstices filled first with
slender strips of wood and then with wet clay,
bountifully bestowed, to keep out the wintry
blasts. The cottage, after all, will really be a
pretty object in our prospect; for John, with an
attempt at taste not very common except among
English settlers here, has continued his roof down
on both sides so as to form a narrow verandah,
which he intends to ornament with vines; and he
has also a small enclosure in front of the house,
where roses of all hues are to make it look as much
like home as possible. By the way, what think
you of intensifying the odor of the rose by
planting
onions (!) around its root? Who knows but
this may be, after all, the true source of the power
of the Persian attar? If this were proved, what an
elegant way of making one's fortune!
I had intended that my garden should have been
at least laid out and partly planted this summer, but
I fear the lack of suitable laborers will prevent this
entirely. I have a strong desire to make an
experiment
in the manufacture of sugar from the stalks of
Indian corn, which was tried in some parts of
Germany
,
but relinquished, being found unprofitable.
I think the sun of Germany has not the power
which we experience in this level peninsula during
the three summer months. And if the summers
are to be ordinarily as hot as this one, I am certain
the hardy sorts of the olive which are raised in the
Crimea may be advantageously cultivated in this
warm soil. You will smile, I day say, (for I have
not forgotten our old topic of castle-building,) but
when I succeed in supplying the market with
Western olive oil, you may perhaps change your
note. I must be speedy however, for I am told the
oil expressed from sun-flower seeds is likely to
prove a formidable competitor.
I lack nothing but the ring of Solomon, with its
power of summoning attendant genii. When I
get this, or a substitute for it in the shape of half
a dozen stout fellows with heads on their shoulders,
you shall not laugh at my dreams, for they will
then become realities.
Meanwhile forget not the vulgar household goods
you are to procure for us. We wait anxiously the
intelligence of their departure for the West. This
letter is absolutely a congeries of atoms; but you
insisted upon my being minute, and declared that
nothing in the experience of a settler could be
uninteresting to youso blame me not. I have
jotted down every thing that occurred to me
without an attempt at form or order. All due
salutations from Florella and,
Yours truly,
T. Sibthorpe.8*
LETTER V.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
My Dearest Catharine,
I studied
your last in the cool morning
hour which I often devote to a ramble over the
wooded hills which rise near our little cottage. I
seated myself on a fallen tree, in a spot where I might
have mused all day without seeing a human face,
or hearing any sound more suggestive of
civilization
than the pretty tinkling of the numerous bells
which help to find our wandering cattle. What a
place in which to read a letter that seemed as if it
might have been written after a stupid party, or in
the agonies which attend a spent ball. (Vide T.
Hood.) Those are not your real sentiments, my
dear Kate; you do not believe life to be the scene
of ennui, suffering, or mere endurance, which you
persuaded yourself to think it just then. If I
thought you did, I should desire nothing so much
as to have your hand in mine for just such a
ramble
and just such a lounge as gave me the
opportunity
for reflecting on your letter; I am sure I could
make you own that life has its hours of calm and
unexciting, but high enjoyment. With your
capabilities
,
think whether there must not be
something
amiss in a plan or habit of being that
subjects
you to these seasons of depression and
disgust
.
Is that tone of chilling, I might say killing
ridicule, which prevails in certain circles, towards
every thing which does not approach a
particular
arbitrary standard, a wholesome one for our
mental condition? I believe not; for I have never
known one who adopted it fully, who had not at
times a most uneasy consciousness that
no one
could
possibly be entirely secure from its stings. Then
there is a restless emulation, felt in a greater or less
degree by all who have thrown themselves on the
arena of fashionable life, which is, in my sober
view, the enemy of repose. I am not now
attempting
to assign a cause for that particular fit of
the blues which gave such a dark coloring to the
beginning of your letter. I am only like the
physician
who recalls to his patient's mind the
atmospheric
influence that may have had an unfavorable
effect upon his symptoms. You will conclude I
must have determined to retort upon you in some
degree the scorn which you cannot help feeling for
the stupidity of a country life, by taking the first
opportunity to hint that there are some evils from
which the dweller in the wilds is exempt. On the
other hand, I admit that in solitude we are apt to
become mere theorists, or dreamers, if you will.
Ideal excellence is very cheap; theory and
sentiment
may be wrought up to great accuracy and
perfection
;
and it is an easy error to content ourselves
with these, without seeking to ascertain whether we
are capable of the action and sacrifice which must
prove that we are in earnest. You are right,
certainly
,
in thinking that in society we have occasion
for more strenuous and energetic virtues; but yet,
even here, there is no day which does not offer its
opportunities for effort and self-denial, and in a very
humble and unenticing form too. But we shall
never settle this question, for the simple reason that
virtue is at home every where alike; so I will
spare you further lecture.
Do not give yourself the least uneasiness lest I
should become a mere book-woman. I have no
idea of making myself so tiresome, as I will soon
convince you when you come and shine upon our
shades, or when I crawl forth timidly into your
lamplight at some future day. There is an
excellent
hint in a comic song I picked up
somewhere
,founded
on fact, I doubt not,
There was
ink
on her thumb when I kissed her hand.
I would forswear the pen and all its concomitants
rather than subject myself to such an imputation.
But even you allow that a lady may be literary, if
she can keep the fact profoundly secret, so I suppose
I may occasionally venture upon the Black Sea if I
put on gloves. You remember Mr., who
always
wrote in gloves, lest he should write too fair
a hand for a gentleman. We thought he could
not have been particularly solicitous on that point;
but I have my suspicions that he was more afraid
of the pollution of a chance ink-spot upon his
lily-white
fingers. How he used to sit admiring them!
You say my pleasures are ideal;my dearest dear,
are your own less so? Take away from your
happiness
all that touches upon the imaginative, and
you leave a duller sound than that which you
suppose to be our fate in the woods. Imagination
heightens every pleasure, and we give way to its
illusions with more completeness in the country.
The uniformity which you represent to yourself as
so tiresome, is conducive to an equality of mental
temperament which certainly is one of the materials
of happiness. If calmness of mind preserve beauty,
you will find me any thing but faded, as you
prophesy
.
Take care of late hours and wasplike waists,
and artificial modes of life in all respects! If I find
your
bloom decayed prematurely, I shall have a
powerful argument against you.
I do own to a feeling of envy at your description
of Madame's concert. The lack of fine
music
is a real evil, and an irremediable one here. It
is one of the pleasures which is to be sought far
from home. But I hear a concert every morning
from my favorite seat on the other side of the hill,
where I look down upon a circular hollow, so shut
in by hills on every side, and so shaded by great
oaks, that it seems always twilight there, except at
noon. I do not speak now of the concert of
innumerable
birds, which you would, I know, condemn as
commonplace. This is so universal at this season
that one almost forgets its sweetness. But in
addition
to this endless variety of soaring trebles, I have
from my rustic throne a bass of such peculiar
character and force, that I doubt whether any thing
but a trombone could match it for depth, while it
would require a dozen other instruments to
imitate
its other characteristics. It proceeds from the
centre of the hollow where the brilliant green and
rich luxuriance of the long grass betray the presence
of water, though it is only here and there that a
small glassy streak, throws back the sunbeams.
This cool retreat seems to be the home of all the
frogs that were banished from Ireland, and they
have at times the air of berating the cruel
expatriation
in no measured terms. The prevailing tone is
the rich bass I have mentioned; another resembles
the creaking of a grindstone, and still others the
ceaseless rattling of cog wheels in a cotton
manufactory
;
the water vibrating all the while, I suppose
by the action of indefatigable throats. At times it
is so like a scolding match that I cannot forbear
laughing aloud, solitary as I am; and you can't
think how startling one's own laugh is, when alone
in the presence of nature.
You wish to know how domestic affairs are
going on in this land of equality. Easily enough
in one sense, you may be sure, while I am
nominally
at the head. I rather think that certain
cherished
observances drop away one by one, almost
unmissed; but I see nothing very essential in these
changes. Rose groans over the deficiencies in the
kitchen, as well as over the hokkerd ways of a
damsel who is now under her training hand; but
she is learning to require fewer conveniences, and
still manages to keep us very comfortable; and as
to the poor girl, I think she has the worst of it. If
you could overhear, as I do occasionally, the
ceaseless
clatter of Rose's exaggerated English, you
would pity, I am sure, the unaccustomed ears of
the woodland lassie. The poor child has been
brought up in a log-house of the smallest size,
whose single room serves for all purposes of cooking,
eating, and sleeping, and whose cupboard contains
all that she supposes necessary for the comfort of
any body's household. It is but small matter of
surprise then that she should be disposed to take
always the article that comes to her hand first,
whatever be the occasion she requires it for, and
each and every instance of this very pardonable
blunder
comes over poor Rose with all the surprise of
novelty, and calls down upon staring Polly a clatter
which makes her look as she might if she had
incautiously
touched the string of a shower-bath. I
think she will fly before a great while. I am sure
I should, let the maternal nest be what it might.
But I am a poor hand to attempt to give the
minute account of these matters which you seem
to desire. You always suspect me when I give
you the sunny side, and I see very little of any
other. If you would know the particulars of the
business part of forest life, I shall appoint Mr.
Sibthorpe secretary for the home department. He
has unwearied patience for these details, and I
believe
feels authorized to bestow all their tediousness
upon your good husband.
I must tell you, however, of a quilting which I
did not share with Mr. Sibthorpe, though I wished
for him many times during the afternoon. It was
held at the house of a very tidy neighbor, a Mrs.
Boardman, the neatness of whose dwelling and its
outworks I have often admired in passing. She
invited all the neighbors, and of course included my
unworthy self, although I had never had any other
acquaintance than that which may be supposed to
result from John and Sophy's having boarded with
her for some time. The walking being damp, an
oxcart
was sent round for such of the guests as had
no team of their own, which is our case as yet.
This equipage was packed with hay, over which
was disposed, by way of
musnud,
a blue and white
coverlet; and by this arrangement half a dozen
goodly dames including myself found reclining
room, and were carried at a stately pace to Mrs.
Boardman's. Here we found a collection of
women
busily occupied in preparing the quilt, which
you may be sure was a curiosity to me. They
had stretched the lining on a frame, and were
now laying fleecy cotton on it with much care;
and I understood from several aside remarks which
were not intended for the ear of our hostess, that
a due regard for etiquette required that this
laying
of the cotton should have been performed
before
the arrival of the company, in order to give
them a better chance for finishing the quilt before
tea, which is considered a point of honor.
However, with so many able hands at work,
the preparations were soon accomplished. The
batts were smoothly disposed, and now
consenting
hands, on either side,
Induced a splendid cover, green and blue,
Yellow and red
wherein stars and garters, squares and triangles,
figured in every possible relation to each other,
and produced, on the whole, a very pretty
mathematical
piece of work, on which the eyes of Mrs.
Boardman rested with no small amount of womanly
pride.
Now needles were in requisition, and every
available
space round the frame was filled by a busy
dame. Several of the company being left-handed,
or rather ambidexter, (no unusual circumstance
here,) this peculiarity was made serviceable at the
corners, where common seamstresses could only sew
in one direction, while these favored individuals
could turn their double power to double account.
This beginning of the solid labor was a serious time.
Scarcely a word was spoken beyond an occasional
request for the thread, or an exclamation at the
snapping
of a needle. This last seemed of no
infrequent
VOL. II. 9
occurrence, as you may well suppose,
when you think of the thickness of the materials
and the necessity for making at least tolerably
short stitches. I must own that the most I could
accomplish for the first hour was the breaking of
needles, and the pricking of my fingers, in the vain
attempt to do as I was bid, and take my stitches
clear through.
By and by, it was announced that it was time
to rolland all was bustle and anxiety. The
frame had to be taken apart at the corners, and two
of the sides rolled several times with much care,
and at this diminished surface we began again with
renewed spirit. Now all tongues seemed loosened.
The evidence of progress had raised every body's
spirits, and the strife seemed to be who should talk
fastest without slackening the industry of her
fingers
.
Some held
tte  tte
communications with
a crony in an under tone; others discussed matters
of general interest more openly; and some made
observations at nobody in particular, but with a
view to the amusement of all. Mrs. Vining told
the symptoms of each of her five children through
an attack of the measles; Mrs. Keteltas gave her
opinion as to the party most worthy of blame in a
late separation in the village; and Miss Polly Mittles
said she hoped the quilt would not be scant of
stitches, like a bachelder's shirt.
Tea-time came before the work was completed,
and some of the more generous declared they would
rather finish it before tea. These offers fell rather
coldly, however, for a real tea-drinker does not feel
very good-humored just before tea. So Mr.
Boardman
drove four stout nails in the rafters over head,
corresponding in distance to the corners of the quilt,
and the frame was raised and fastened to these, so
as to be undisturbed and yet out of the way during
the important ceremony that was to succeed. Is it
not well said that necessity is the mother of
invention
?
A long table was now spread, eked out by boards
laid upon carpenters' horsesand this was
covered with a variety of table-cloths, all shining
clean however, and carefully disposed. The whole
table array was equally various, the contributions, I
presume, of several neighboring log-houses. The
feast spread upon it included every variety that
ever was put upon a tea-table; from cake and
preserves to pickles and raw cabbage cut up in
vinegar. Pies there were, and custards, and sliced
ham, and cheese, and three or four kinds of bread.
I could do little besides look, and try to guess out
the dishes. However, every thing was very good,
and our hostess must have felt complimented by
the attention paid to her various delicacies. The
cabbage, I think, was rather the favorite; vinegar
being one of the rarities of a settler's cabin.
I was amused to see the loads of cake and pie
that accumulated upon the plates of the guests.
When all had finished, most of the plates seemed
full. But I was told afterwards that it was not
considered civil to decline any one kind of food,
though your hostess may have provided a dozen.
You are expected at least to try each variety. But
this leads to something which I cannot think very
agreeable.
After all had left the table, our hostess began to
clear it away, that the quilt might be restored to its
place; and as a preliminary, she went all round to
the different plates, selecting such pieces of cake as
were but little
bitten,
and paring off the half
demolished
edges with a knife, in order to replace
them in their original circular position in the dishes.
When this was accomplished, she assiduously scraped
from the edges of the plates the scraps of butter
that had escaped demolition, and wiped them back
on the remains of the pat. This was doubtless a
season of delectation to the economical soul of
Mrs. Boardman; you may imagine its effects upon
the nerves of your friend. Such is the influence
of habit! The good woman doubtless thought she
was performing praiseworthy action, and one in
no wise at variance with her usual neat habits;
and if she could have peeped into my heart, and
there have read the resolutions I was tacitly
making
against breaking bread again under the same
auspices, she would have pitied or despised such a
lamentable degree of pride and extravagance. So
goes this strange world.
The quilt was replaced, and several good
housewives
seated themselves at it, determined to see it
out. I was reluctantly compelled to excuse
myself
,
my inexperienced fingers being pricked to
absolute rawness. But I have since ascertained
that the quilt was finished that evening, and placed
on Mrs. Boardman's best bed immediately; where
indeed I see it every time I pass the door, as it is
not our custom to keep our handsome things in the
background. There were some long stitches in it,
I know, but they do not show as far as the road;
so the quilt is a very great treasure, and will
probably
be kept as an heir-loom.
I have some thoughts of an attempt in the
patchwork line myself. One of the company
at Mrs. Boardman's remarked that the skirt of the
French cambric dress I wore would make a
splendid quilt. It is a temptation certainly.
Mr. Sibthorpe's vexations and trials with his
workmen are neither few nor small, but I shall
leave the description for his pen. We never
enjoyed
better health, for which I fear we are not as
thankful as we ought to be for so great a blessing.
Kind love to all, from
Yours, ever,
F. S.9*
LETTER VI.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
August
20.
Next
to seeing yourself, my dear Williamson,
I can scarcely think of any thing that would have
afforded me more pleasure than the sight of a friend
of yours bearing credentials under your hand and
seal. And over and above this title to my esteem,
Mr. Ellis brings with him an open letter of
recommendation
in that very handsome and pleasing
countenance of his, and a frank and hearty manner
which put us quite at ease with him directly,
notwithstanding
a certain awkward consciousness of
the narrowness of our present accommodations,
which might have made a visit from any other
stranger rather embarrassing. His willingness to be
pleased, his relish for the amusing points of the
half-savage state, and the good-humor with which
he laughed off sundry rather vexatious
contre-temps
really endeared him to us all. Half a dozen
men of his turn of mind for neighbors, with wives
of kindred strain, would create a paradise in
these woods, if there could be one on earth.
He chose the early morning hour to drive over
from, in a light, open carriage, and reached
here soon after our lazy breakfast, in raptures with
the fine natural road, the soft beauty of the scenery,
and the delicious temperature of the lone and
solemn
old woods through which he passed. He is
an enthusiast in scenery, and as soon as we
discovered
this, we felt easy as to the homely aspect of
things within doors. While we have such grand
avenues and cloistered promenades for the
entertainment
of our city guests, we may consent
without
scruple to receive their visits, sure that they
can never surpass us in points of architectural
grandeur, luxurious divans, or mossy carpets.
By the wayI attempted to analyze, for
curiosity's
sake, the slight feeling of embarrassment
which beset me at first sight of Mr. Ellis. It could
of course have no reference to our real standing in
his estimation; for I knew he must be well
acquainted
with all that is to be known of us both as
to character and condition, and that the mere
outward
aspect of a temporary residence could have
no influence upon his opinion. So that it could
not be the vulgar dread of not appearing genteel
to a stranger. I was obliged to refer my sensations
to a jealousy for the honor of rural life. I was
unwilling
that a man of Mr. Ellis's stamp should be
led to think we had already become coarse, or
rather accustomed and reconciled to coarseness, by
a residence in this rough new country. This was,
as nearly as I could guess, the true ground of my
sudden consciousness of the rough appearance of
things about us. Before Mr. Ellis came, I thought
we were getting on very well, but the sight of an
elegant stranger brought to mind a thousand
deficiencies
that we had forgotten. I was saying,
before I turned aside to give you this glimpse of
my inward thoughts, that we relied on out-door
attractions in entertaining Mr. Ellis. As to other
matters we cannot boastas
par exemple
.
We were seated with your pleasant friend at an
early dinner, when word was brought that a man
without had a nest of young bears that he wished
to dispose of. We had not the least desire for such
pets, characteristic as they would be at present;
but we all wished to have a peep at them; and so,
without ceremony, every body quitted the table,
and ran to the back-yard, where the bear-merchant
waited very impatiently. There were no less than
four of those charming creatures, packed in a coarse
basket, to the sides of which they were chained; so
that when the owner set the basket on the grass,
and poked up its occupants a little, they all pulled
in different directions, or dragged each other about,
and then fell to biting and scratching in revenge
for their frequent tumbles. This was amusing
enough for a few moments, but did not detain us
long, for the dinner was only begun; and we had
a long drive in contemplation for the afternoon.
We returned to the parlor to behold the strangest
sight! We had forgotten the intrusive habits of
the chickens, and so had left the table unguarded
and the doors and windows open; and there were
at least a dozen of these creatures in full possession
of the table, helping themselves from our plates
with a nervous haste that betokened an evil
conscience
.
Nothing escaped their ravenous appetites.
The very
dbris
of their brothers and cousins were
not sacred from their cannibalish propensities. A
plate of butter, upon which Rose had exhausted
her decorative powers, was pecked into the
similitude
of an iceberg; and potatoes were scattered on
every side, like shot after a battle. Some of the
intruders, not having been able to make good a
footing on the table, had condescended to the floor;
carrying every one a slice of bread or a bit of meat
with him. Such a mess you can never picture to
yourself, until you have lived in the woods, and
been subject to the irruptions of the fowls.
Where is your poultry-yard? methinks I hear
you say. Alas! Echo might answer, Where! if
Echo were not tired of replying to such questions.
It is at least six weeks since I engaged the proper
materials at the saw-mill, but the poor miller's dam
was carried away by a freshet, and by
over-exerting
himself in attempting to repair it, he took the
agueso what could I do but wait?
But what did you do for dinner? Mrs.
Williamson
says. This query is more easily answered.
Our drive was all planned, and it was voted
impossible
to await the result of another cooking
process. The side-table having fortunately eluded
the horny noses of our invaders, from its being
covered with a napkin, we made a very delicate
repast on West India preserves with cream and
biscuits
.
But after the said drive had been
accomplished
,
and the fresh air and the exhilarating
exercise
had revived the sacred rage, we called that
light meal lunch, and had a substantial dinner at a
fashionable hour, and probably (for I did not
inquire
)
at the expense of some of our ravenous foes.
And to have seen the good-humored facility with
which Mr. Ellis helped to laugh off our
perplexities
,
and the awkwardness which one cannot but
feel, spite of philosophy, in such cases, one might
have supposed him one who had never breathed
the air of courts, but who had been all his days
accustomed to the shifts and expedients of an
emigrant's
life.
We insisted on his remaining for the night, if
only for the sake of saying that he had slept in a
box; namely, the one which once served to
envelop
a parcel of chairs, and which now fills the
office of a spare bedstead. Mr. Ellis declares that
he never slept more soundly, and I can well believe
it, for he had earned a good night's rest by his
exertions
in threading the farm and the country round
it, during the whole day.
* * * * * *
As we sat at breakfast in the morning, an old
man, one of our good neighbors, came in with a
long-handled dipper, and asked if we kept lightning
in the house.
No indeed! said Mrs. Sibthorpe, looking of
course somewhat puzzled.
Why, do tell! said the old man. But
may be you don't know what it is,if you don't,
I'll bet you a cookie you can't guess.
We all tried. Florella's guess was gunpowder,
Mr. Ellis's, oil,mine, candles.
The old man laughed.
No, no, said he, you haven't come within
rifle distance! Why, it's emptins! My woman
wants to set some griddles, and she took a notion
she must have risin' to put in 'em.
How is the good lady? asked Mrs. Sibthorpe.
She! you couldn't kill her with a meat-axe!
She's real savage upon vittles since this last turn
of agur. I'd sooner board an Irishman! There's
no whoa to her, when once she gits a goin' upon
pork!
And our friend took up his lightning and
departed
,
without the ceremony of good morning.
* * * * * *
As I was showing Mr. Ellis the piece of land
which I intend planting with
morus multicaulis,
he called my attention to a fragment of fine
bituminous
coal which he had turned up with his foot.
The land hereabout is not what is usually
considered
as a coal formation, but I should not be at all
surprised to discover a stray stratum. The state is
known to abound in coal. I think I shall make
some small examination either this autumn or early
next spring. At present, laborers are too precious
to be spared for any new plan. I begin to fear we
shall not be ready to plaster before the frosts set
in. We met with an accident the other day,
which, though of no great consequence in pecuniary
amount, will necessarily delay us somewhat. I had
purchased a quantity of green lumber, which was to
be kiln-dried before it was fit for use. But, by some
unaccountable accident, the whole took fire and was
consumed while the workmen were gone to dinner.
So I have either to send a great distance for
seasoned
materials, or to wait the repairing of the
milldam
,
and then the chance of another attempt at
kiln-drying. I think I shall prefer the former mode,
although it is much more expensive; since time is
just now of more consequence than money. The
conflagration cost me about two hundred dollars.
A smaller disaster was the loss of a quantity of
lime which was on its way from a place about
fifteen miles off. The teamster was benighted,
and obliged to stop for the night at a log-tavern,
owing to the extreme darkness caused by an
approaching
storm. The wagon, with its load of lime,
was placed under a shed, and my man went quietly
to sleep, lulled doubtless all the sooner by the
pleasant pattering of the shower. About midnight
all were awakened by a sudden blaze of light, and
it was found that the lime, not having been
protected
from the wet by the leaky shed, had set all
on fire, and it was only by great exertion that the
house was saved. So I was obliged, not only to
put up with the loss of the lime, but to satisfy the
teamster for the damage done to his wagon, as
well as the tavern-keeper for the loss of his shed.
One learns something by these things, though at a
rather costly rate.
You have gathered doubtless from my sketches
of affairs in general, that I, who came here for
boundless leisure, am the busiest of men. It is even
so, but I find much to interest me. I read no
books, it is true, but I am continually turning some
new leaf in the book of life, and the study of
human
nature. Mrs. Sibthorpe is not very well, but
she is in fine spirits; and Charlotte is as brown and
as happy as a gypsy, and with the same reason;
health, unbounded freedom, and a life in the open
air. A little companion or two would leave her
nothing to desire; but even this deficiency she
scarcely feels; for her mother is of that cheerful
facility of temper which makes her good company
for any body.
We are all embrowned beyond belief. I am
always, you know, something of a bonze in figure;
now I am a bronze in complexion. Conceive the
attractions of a bronze bonze!
Under any color however,
Ever truly yours,
T. Sibthorpe
.VOL. II. 10
LETTER VII.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
September
1
st
.
A letter
is certainly your due, my dear
Catharine
;
but yours of some fortnight since,all kind,
and lively, and sympathizing, and
conceding,
as it
is,deserves a better reply than this dripping sky
will help me to indite. Why is it that I, who ever
loved so dearly a rainy day in town, find it
suggestive
ofnot melancholyfor melancholy and
I are strangersbut of stupid things, in the
country
?
To account for the difference drives me into
the region of small philosophies. In the one case
there is the quiet that bustle has made precious,
the leisure which in visiting weather one is apt to
see slip from one's grasp unimproved; a contrast
like that which we feel on turning from the dusty
pathway into the cool shadea protected shade,
as of a garden, where one locks the gate and looks
up with satisfaction at high walls, impassable by
foot unprivileged. In the otherthe contrary
casewe have leisure in sunshine as well as
leisure
in the rain; we have abundance of quiet at all
seasons, and no company at any, so that when the
rain comes it can but deprive us of our accustomed
liberty of foot. The pattering sound so famed for
its lulling powers is but too effectual when it falls
on roofs not much above our heads; and the
disconsolate
looking cattle, the poor shivering fowls
huddled together under every sheltering covert, and
the continuous snore of cat and dog as they doze
on the matsall tend towards our infectious
drowsiness, that is much more apt to hint the
dreamy sweetness of a canto or two of the Faery
Queene, than the duteous and spirited exercise of
the pen, even in such service as yours. Yet I have
broken the spell of
Sluggish Idleness, the nurse of sin.
by the magic aid of a third reading of your letter.
And now I defy even the
Ever drizling raine upon the lofte,
Mixt with a murmuring winde.
I have forsaken the sofa, and put up the pretty
mignon
volume of Spenser, your own gift, and now
I set out resolutely to say nothing at all, in
sufficient
expansion to cover this fair sheet.
To begin with the beginning of our cottage
affairs look more promising. We have had our
raising, and within a week the building has
assumed a hopeful distinctness of outline. Two
new carpenters have been procured from, a
great way off; and two masons with their
assistants
;
and some lime to replace that which chose
to burn itself up a few weeks since. Oh, we are
certainly getting on finely! The raising was quite
a sight, I assure you, and the rustic feast with
which it concluded had much of interest for us. I
watched every step of the former, and felt some
desire to preside at the latter; but Mrs. Boardman,
at whose house it was held, understood the matter
much better, and gave, I am told, entire satisfaction,
which, I dare say, I could hardly have done. At
least, so whispers my indolence. The corner of
our garden, which John found time to plant, has
yielded us many valuable things for the table, and
just now, the first fruits of a fine bed of melons.
The specimen that he brought in this morning in
triumph quite perfumes the room, and from present
appearances we may expect a hundred such. I
never saw so luxurious a growth, and the fruit is of
such a variety of delicious kinds, that I fancy we
shall scarcely regret your peaches.
I have, as you may recollect, become thoroughly
American in my predilections for the tomato, and
I insisted upon abundant provision of it, much to
John's dissatisfaction. Since the weather has
become so sultry, I make this vegetable almost my
only food, and fancy it to be the most wholesome
in the world. Mr. Sibthorpe takes to himself
great credit for his fortitude in seeing me eat what
is to him an abomination, but I am firm in the
faith that I shall yet make a convert of him. I
fancy he learned to detest tomatoes while he was
in Italy. He has a truly English horror of the
indescribable messes which are found on Italian
tables. I am told by some Western people that a
free use of tomatoes is one of the best preventions
against ague.
You will have perceived before this that these
quiet and prosperous times afford but little of the
stuff that letters are made of. I write principally
to tell you that we are going on so smoothly that
there is nothing to tell. But you
will
have letters
at all events, and I dare not refuse. If they tire
you, you will be able to console yourself with the
proverb Heureux le peuple dont l'histoire
ennuie
.
Yet I have laughed this morning, and that
heartily
,
but I fear I shall scarce be able to amuse you
at second hand with what depends altogether
on certain
un-writable
turns of countenance and
manner. The hero of the occasion was an old
pedler who came jogging along in his hearse-shaped
cart, soon after breakfast, and before this dripping
humor beset the weather. He stopped his cart,
on seeing several men at work, and it was not long
before the laughter of the men, who usually pursue
their business in solemn silence, drew my attention.
The aspect of the pedler secured it, for he was a
personification of Momus. His face was very red,
and of a most grotesque turn, and his nut-cracker
nose and chin were like nobody but Punch. His
gray eyes twinkled through a pair of mock
spectacles
made of a strip of tin twisted into the requisite
10*
form, and placed far down his nose, so that he was
obliged to throw his head back in order to look
through them. When I went to the window, he
was enumerating the contents of his covered cart
with a bewildering rapidity, but as soon as he
observed
me, he stopped short, pulled off the remains
of an old straw hat, and made a very low bow in
the style of Sir Pertinax, who thought the world
was to be won by booing.
My dear beautiful lady, said he, could I
sell you any thing this morning? I sell things for
nothing, and I've got most every thing you ever
heard tell on. Here's fashionable calicoes,
holding
up a piece of bright scarlet,splendid French
work collars and capes,and here he displayed
some hideous things, the flowers on which were
distinctly traceable from where I stood,elegant
milk-pans, and Harrison skimmers, and
ne plus ultry
dippers! patent pillscure any thing you like
ague bittersShaker yarbsessences,
wintergreen
,
peppermint, lobelytapes, pins, needles,
hooks and eyesbroaches and brasslets
smelling-bottles
castor
ilecorn-plastermustard
garding seedssilver spoonspocket-combs
tea-potsgreen teasaleratustracts,
song-books
thimblesbaby's
whistlescopy-books,
slates, playin' cardspuddin' sticks
butter-prints
basketswooden
bowls
Any wooden nutmegs, daddy? said one of
the men.
No, but as I come past I see your father a
turnin' some out o' that piece o' lignum vit
you got him last week, so you can get some o'
him, said the pedler quietly; then turning again
to the windowCan I suit you to-day, ma'am?
I've all sorts o' notionspowder and shot, (but I
'spose you do all your shootin' at home,) but may
be your old man goes a gunnin'I sha'n't offer
you lucifers, for ladies with sich eyes never buys
matches,but you can't ask me for any thing I
haven't got, I guess.
While I was considering my wants, one of the
men must try a fall with this professed wit.
Any goose-yokes, mister? said he.
I'm afraid I've sold the last, sir; there is so
many wanted in this section of the country. But
I'll take your measure, and fetch you a supply next
time I come along. This of course produced a
laugh.
Well! I want a pair o' boots, any how, said
the prostrate hero, rallying, to show that he was not
discomfited. These here old ones o' mine lets in
gravel, but won't let it out again. If you've got any
to fit me, I'll look at 'em. And thus saying he
stretched out a leg of curious wire-drawn
appearance
.
Any to fit, old boss?
Fit you like a whistle, sir, said the pedler,
fumbling among his wares, and at length drawing
forth a pair of
candle moulds,
much to the
amusement
of the bystanders.
The rain which had begun to fall now cut short
our conference. I bought a few trifles, and the
pedler received his pay with a bow which was
almost
a salaam. Mounting his blue hearse, he drove
off in triumph, not minding the rain, from which
he was completely sheltered by a screen of boughs
fitted in the sides of his wagon, and meeting over
his head,a protection against sun and rain which
I much admired.
This is the first specimen of Autolycus that I
have seen. There are scores of pedlers travelling
the country, but they are generally grave,
business-like
personages, standing much upon their dignity,
or rude and saucy, and disposed to attempt bullying
one into buying. One of the former kind told me
that he was about retiring from this section of
the country, and had it in contemplation to go
to the south.
So much for my laugh, which I could have
justified
more fully if I had been industrious enough to
write out more of my recollections. But indeed,
spite of good resolutions, there
is
something wilting
in this gentle, uniform, soft-dropping rain. It
takes the energies out of my
morale
as it does the
starch out of my collars, leaving all alike limpsy
to use a favorite term of Mrs. Boardman. I
must yield me to the drowsy influencesnot
however without having fulfilled my intention of
covering this goodly sheet with an infinite deal
of nothing.
Mr. Sibthorpe, who pretends to be busied in
arranging a multitude of accounts and such like
rainy-day improvements, while he is in reality
catching a very consoling nap now and then, is
just now awake enough to beg his duteous
remembrances
to your ladyship, with like friendly
greeting to Mr. Williamson and to Mr. Ellis, who
lives in our memories as
a most engaging wight,
Of social glee, and wit humane, though keen.
Charlotte's little love too, and a larger share
From yours,
F.S.LETTER VIII.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
September 22d
.
* * *
Ought
a letter to be a transcript of
one's better mind, or only of one's present and
temporary humor? If the former, I must throw
away the pen, I fear, for some time to come. If
the latter, I have only to scrawl the single word
AGUE a thousand times on the face of my paper,
or write it once in letters which would cover the
whole surface. I have no other thought, I can
no longer say,
My mind my kingdom is.
I am deposed, and this vile blue-visaged fiend
has usurped the throne. There he sits with his
yellow eyes and his quivering chin, making hideous
faces at me, and calling up dreams, which might
terrify one far stouter-hearted than I. I see my
wife, pale and ghastly, with filmy eyes, imploring
help, which I cannot give her. My daughter, stiff
cold deadthe life pressed out of her little
heart by the chill monster. Waves of sorrow,
heavy, tangible, rise to overwhelm me; no friend
remains to cheer my dying pillow. Stretched on
the damp ground I see all around me graves
yawning
,
and wild shapes impatiently waiting for my
last breath. The clouds teem with lurid fires;
the very light is burning flame, while I shiver with
cold. Horror pursues menever again, O my
friend, shall this friendly handjust here came
the sweet voice of my little darling.
Dear papa, she said, laying her cool hand on
my forehead, dear papa, why
will
you write
when you are so ill? you promised mamma to lie
still on the sofa, if she would go away and get
some rest; and very soon you started up and said
you
must
write; and ever since, I could hear your
pen, scratchscratchso wildlyI am
frightened
,
papa! shall I call mamma? she always
persuades
you to be
so
quiet
It is even as you see, my dear Williamson, and
I shall send this very awful scratchscratch,
that frightened poor little Charlotte, that you may
have some idea of the condition in which one
comes out of an ague fit. I had begun to feel
relieved, and thought my fever had subsided, as it
probably would have done, if I had remained quiet.
But the slightest intellectual effort, and particularly
the least indulgence of the imagination, recalls and
redoubles the departing horrors.
I could with difficulty be persuaded by my little
trembler; but after she had enticed me to the sofa
I soon fell asleep, and so remained for two or three
hours, when I awoke quite relieved. And this has
been the course for a fortnight past. However, I
believe I am now quite cured, and I shall endeavor
to provide against a recurrence of the evil by all
sorts of precautions.
The most intelligent people here advocate a
depletory
course, and think it safe to use tonics only to
break the habit of the diseasenot to prevent
it. I would willingly have submitted to be let
blood in the cold stage, (a practice much approved,)
but that, with my constitution, I fear the effects
of a habit of bleeding.
Poor Rose will have nothing effectual done for
the obstinate ague. She has been persuaded by
some of the neighbors that it is dangerous to be
bled, and equally so to take quinine; so she shakes
and burns every other day, and cries and bewails
her hard fate most piteously while the fit is on,
and the moment it is off, feels entirely sure she
never shall have another, and goes to her work
with delighted alacrity. But the poor thing loses
strength perceptibly, and we have now two maids
who attempt to fill her place, poorly enough. John
and his wife both have aguefortunately on
alternate
days, so that they can nurse each other.
But Mrs. Sibthorpe is the nurse of all, besides
doing much to supply the deficiencies in the
clumsy service of the new maids. These treat her
as a sister of the craft, and seem disposed to put
upon her a regular and very liberal share of the
household duties. One of them proposed to her
the other day to assist in the washing, and upon her
replying that she did not know how to wash, held
up her hands and eyes in a paroxysm of virtuous
astonishment.
Not know how to wash! Well! I should think
it was high time you did! every woman that
is
a
woman had orter know how to wash.
Florella, who was highly amused, led the damsel
on by saying that she had not lived where such
things were customary.
Why! I s'pose
somebody
washed, didn't they?
I should ha' thought you'd have wanted to help!
Now, the woman I lived with afore I came here was
as pretty a woman to live with as ever I'd wish to
see. Me and her used to work together all the
forenoon
,
and then after dinner we'd set down and take
comfort, or go and drink tea with some of the
neighbors. That's my notion! There wa'n't no
pride about Mrs. Mucklewain.
That lady's disinterested admirer, however, has
so much of this same troublesome quality, that I
have written to Detroit to procure some domestics
of a different cast. Florella puts up with this sort
of impertinence with immovable patience and
good-humor
,
and even declares that the exercise which
she is obliged to take in order to keep things
tolerably
comfortable is decidedly beneficial to her health
and spirits. But it is easy to perceive that there
must be an end to this view of the case. This
accumulation of petty cares steals away one's whole
time, and it is too uncongenial not in a little while
to affect the spirits also. But we do not despair.
VOL. II. 11
It can hardly be that this lack of good household
service should prove an insurmountable evil.
It is a standing marvel to me that people, who
are such worshippers of common sense and
practical
utility as the Americans, should have made so
prodigious a blunder as to this matter. They will
embrace the most odious, filthy, and debasing
callings
for the sake of making money; yet the mere
name of a difference in rank is sufficient to drive
them from one that is comparatively easy, and in all
civilized countries respectable, according to the real
worth of those who exercise in it; while the
remuneration
is, or might be large, in comparison with
any thing which the parties could earn in any other
way. In England, though service is no
inheritance
,
according to the proverb, yet it is a very
excellent business; and its rules are as well defined,
and its claims as willingly acknowledged, as those
of any other useful art. The relation between
employer
and employed is so well understood, that one
party is as little liable to encroachments as the
other, and there is perhaps no position in which
real worth of character is more certain of securing
due respect than that of a domestic in families of
the middle ranks. Wheneverif everthis shall
be the case in America, English people of the better
classes will flock to our shores. This is all that is
needed to render the United States a very desirable
residence to those who are crowded out of the
struggling mass in the old world.
In spite of sundry agues and other hindrances
among the workmen, our cottage is nearly finished.
We shall be obliged to wait some little time for the
plastering to dry thoroughly, since I am not
disposed
to adopt the theory of some of my neighbors,
who insist that the dampness of new mortar can
never hurt any body. We have begun the
unpacking
of the furniture however, and find things in
good order, spite of their long sojourn in an open
shed. The piano-forte is of course untuned, sadly
every note set up for itself, like the jangling
bells of a Spanish city, and some even divided
within themselves. Florella has fortunately been
taught to tune, as every lady should be who brings
an instrument into the wilds.
October
5.
A most uncomfortable state of confusion has
prevailed since I had proceeded thus far in this
medley. My ague had not done with me, as I
had fondly hoped; but was only waiting to take
fresh breath for a more furious onslaught. I
consented
at length to be blooded in the cold stage,
and have not had a fit sincebut will refrain from
further prognostics as to recurrence. Besides this,
the free and easy damsel, whose wise sayings you
find reported above, was attacked with fever, and
lay very ill for eight or ten days, during which
time, what with constant attention and night
watches, we were all quite worn out. Some of
the neighbors were ill, and others were afraid the
fever was ketchin'  and as I was myself ill nearly
all the time, the burden of affairs came, as usual,
upon Florella. She is quite well, however, and
made very happy by the recovery of the girl, whose
situation was at one time rendered extremely
alarming
.
We should have sent her home as a matter
of course, but the weather was unfavorable, her
home was a very wretched one, and her attack very
suddenso that it was scarcely possible without
great inhumanity.
We have now the most charming weather, and
we are enjoying it to the uttermost. I fancy that
sunset in the region of these great lakes is more
miraculously splendid than elsewhere, and certainly
the sun sets nowhere on such woods as those of an
American October. You have seen them, I think;
if not, one day's drive would repay you for a
journey to Michigan. You have a painter's eye, I
know, and a poet's heart; and fate ought to have
endowed you with unbounded leisure, so that you
might fly a thousand miles to gaze on a glorious
sunset without incurring the imputation of having
shot madly from your sphere on a fool's errand. I
cannot but believe that there are other worlds in
which we shall yet be permitted to enjoy the many
innocent delights for which time and opportunity
are denied us in this. Meanwhile
we
are making
use of the present, and it does my heart good to see
the light that dances in Florella's eyes, and the
deepening bloom on the cheeks of my little
Charlotte
,
while we thread every alley green and
bosky
dell in these boundless glades. Roads are not
of the slightest consequence. We can go as we like
on foot, in the carriage, or on horseback;the
elastic sward is like a scarce moistened sponge,
and diversified every where with streaks of velvet
moss; and if one did not find here and there a
fallen
tree or a huge branch broken off by the wind
and left to decay as it fell, you might easily fancy
yourself in one of our own sylvan parks, the proud
boast of English wealth. Vert and venison are
here in abundance; and we can dispense with
enclosure
,
since fences of any sort would be sadly in
the way of such insatiable rangers.
My plans and projects of all sorts are of course at
a dead stand for the present; I mean the execution
of them, for as to the projects themselves, a certain
degree of fever only warms them into more
luxuriant
life. I have never woven such splendid webs
as during the fever which follows what is called a
slight
ague. At such times imagination is often
exalted and memory excited to a surprising degree,
while reason still remains lord of the ascendant,
and makes grave remarks and draws sober
inferences
,
as the wild pageants flit by. At some such
moment I had a distinct recollection of having seen,
years ago, some mention of the manufacture of
indigo
from oak saw-dust,somewhere in France, I
think,but further I cannot go. Will you, who
have access to references of all sorts, find out for
11*
me what it is I am thinking of? the piles of that
humble material which now meet my eye every
where, make me feel not a little curious on the
subject.
You may thank or blame the ague for this
ladylike
letter. Such moonlight as this would have
been irresistible, but that with moonlight comes
dew, and with dew dampness, and with dampness
certain associations no wise pleasant to one who
has been for weeks either trembling on the verge of
ague, or popping in
Like your friend,
T.
Sibthorpe.LETTER IX.
Mr. Sibthorpe to Mr. Williamson.
My dear Williamson,
November
15.
Didn't
I say something, in one of my late
letters, about an October landscape? I had not yet
seen a November one in the forest. Since the
splendid
coloring of those days has been toned down by
some hard frosts, and all lights and shades blended
into heavenly harmony by the hazy atmosphere of
the delicious period here called Indian summer,
Florella and I have done little else but wander
about, gazing in rapture, and wishing we could
share our pleasure with somebody as silly as
ourselves
.
If the Indians named this season, it must
have been from a conviction that such a sky and
such an atmosphere must be granted as an
encouraging
sample of the far-away Isles of Heaven,
where they expect to chase the deer forever
unmolested
.
If you can imagine a view in which the
magnificent coloring of Tintoretto has been
softened
to the taste of Titian or Giorgione, and this
seen through a transparent veil of dim silver, you
may form some notion of our November landscape.
It may have been the effect of this Arcadian
scenery, which seems made for painters and poets,
and which ought to purify the thoughts and exalt
the imagination of every thing endowed with soul,
it may have been this, more than the simple
reality that gave so touching a character to a
funeral
service that I have just witnessed in our
neighborhood. I have seen, as you know, much of
this world's splendid pageantry, never more lavishly
bestowed than in doing honor to the senseless
dust;I have gazed and listened while royalty
was inurned amid the thundering of cannon, and
the spirit-quelling tones of music, like the voice of
the everlasting grave warning the sons of men of
their inevitable destiny; but no splendid rites ever
possessed the solemnity which seemed to preside
over that hushed assembly of plain men and
women
gathered from far and near, at the call of
sympathy
alonesympathy in the fate of a man who
had no claim to their especial regard beyond that
of having needed their assistance while he lived.
He was a man not remarkable in any way;
an easy commonplace insignificant sort of
person
,
whose lot had been like that of many such
charactersa series of misfortunes unaverted by
any vigorous effort of his own, and gradually
breaking down his spirit, and leaving him at last to
be provided forfirst by the kindness of
individuals
,
and latterly by the publicso that at the
time of his death, he was neither more nor less
than a town pauper. He had been long ill, and
had left a large family utterly destitute, and now
the concourse assembled at his funeral exceeded all
customary gatherings, and the sympathy was deep
and general. It was not regret, for his condition in
life was fixed beyond hope, and he was supposed
to be quite prepared for a change of worlds. Death
had come not in the hideous skeleton form with
which he is endowed by vulgar superstition, but as
a merciful and soft-voiced angel, sent to bear the
soul from pain, and care, and humiliation, to
happiness
and repose.
It was pure human sympathynot hollow
shownot venal paradebut a touching
recognition
of a common nature and interesta
spontaneous
vibration of the public heart-strings at the
thought that a mana brotherGod's image
shrined in clay,one who had acquired
respectability
by misfortune, and awakened affection by
needing kindnesswas at last gathered to his
rest. I despair of giving you an idea of what
seemed to me to be the all-pervading expression of
the scene,but I may confess that even I, though
but little given to shedding unaccountable tears,
found myself betrayed into a softness somewhat in
unison with the many sobs which attested the pity
of the crowd.
The discourse which was delivered over the
body was solemn and earnest, and I found much
that was appropriate and likely to be useful, but to
me the effect, as a whole, was marred by the
attempt
to frighten people into piety, by means of
the mere bodily terrors of the last hour; an
attempt
which implies a departure from the simple
truth, since it is not to be pretended that religious
people dread death less than others. It is however
a common instrument of exhortation, and every
exaggeration of fancy, and even the destructive
agency of superstition, is sometimes resorted to, to
heighten its effect; as if the bondage through
fear of death, were not heavy enough already;
or as if lifelife temporal and life eternaldid
not furnish a thousand inducements to holiness,
where the death-bed can offer one.
This style of preaching is in use elsewhere, but
I think it is more particularly in vogue in these
newly-settled regions; perhaps because it is
supposed
that rough people need more urgency, or
that they will be more easily aroused by what is
addressed to the imaginationan opinion from
which I dissent entirely. Earnestness and
simplicity
,the
simplicity of immutable truth, are
the great and only requisites in addressing the
uneducated
;
and every attempt at mere effect is
rejected
at once, by people whose distinctive trait is
plain common sense.
As we rode slowly to the distant burial-place, the
long train of humble vehicles, the delicious
atmosphere
,
and the soft-toned lightthe aspect of the
dying woods and the peculiar nature of the
occasion
combined
to excite the imagination to the
utmost; and I found my reveries leading me to the
primal time when the veiled Isis was believed to
welcome the return of her offspring to her
mysterious
bosom;when simple and passionate
tragedy
was the outpouring of this same
ever-welling
fountain of human sensibilities; and majestic
sculpture gave form and substance to the lofty
creations of the soulthe fruit of vague longings
after immortality. The very simplicity and
humbleness
of all the outward circumstances gave a
solemn dignity to the scene; and I never felt such
an overwhelming sense of the equal value of all
souls in the sight of God, as while I watched the
lowering of that rude coffin into the earth.
I returned home in a softened mood, which I
willingly prolong by attempting this sketch of
my feelings, and I claim your indulgence for what
may seem extravagant, on the score of your
reiterated
request that I would give you an impartial
transcript of the impressions made on me by the
ordinary course of things in this new world.
The feeling of literal and unmodified equality
which is evinced by such scenes as the one I have
attempted to describe, however beautiful and
touching
when applied to the claims of suffering
humanity
,
takes, it must be confessed, a different shape
when it is brought to bear upon matters of
business
,
with which it has, it seems to me, no rational
connection. I love the one manifestation, but I
cannot help detesting the other. When my
fellow-creatures
through pressure of misfortune require
my aid and sympathy, God forbid that I should
bring into account the difference which
circumstances
may have placed between us, as an apology
for neglect or unkindness; but in transactions
which are conducted on business principles, and in
which every particular is specifically bargained
and paid for, I must acknowledge, that continual
attempts at encroachments and imposition are very
annoying, and go near to provoke one into
condemning
the whole system, as subversive of good
faith and good order. If a friend promises me his
assistance on some particular occasion, and
afterwards
finds himself constrained to disappoint me,
I can readily accept his apology, since the promise
was only a favor; but if I agree with a workman
for a certain stipulated price to perform a specified
amount of labor at a fixed time, I can ill bear to
see my business neglected, and to be told in
extenuation
that home affairs required his attention, or
that another man's business was more pressing than
mine, or that there had been a previous
engagement
which was forgotten until now. Yet all this
has not unfrequently occurred during my
operations
here; while any delay on my part would
have been resented as an imposition, and probably
have brought the law upon me immediately, though
public opinion would have been decidedly adverse
to my attempting to obtain redress for these
incessantly
violated engagements. A very one-sided
equality, certainly! And the same views prevail
as to domestic service; a strict and punctual
compliance with the letter of the engagement is
exacted on one side, and an unlimited discretion
exercised on the other. A person on whom you
depend for the main business of your household
will quit you in the midst of illness or during the
stay of visitors, and that without a moment's
warning
;
feeling quite satisfied with saying in reply to
your remonstrances, Well! I thought I could stay
but you see, our folks wants me
to hum,
and so
I've got to go!
But I am falling into the scolding line, one in
which I do not often indulge, and which, indulged,
certainly unfits one for making the best of things
as they are. We have, just now, two very decent
maids, besides poor Rose, who, with all her
feebleness
,
is invaluable as a balance-wheel. John and
Sophy are pretty much self-absorbed; and have
imbibed so much of the spirit of the country, that
they seem ever on the watch lest I should
remember
that they called me master for five years, at
home. The English of that class do not bear very
meekly the change in their condition when they
become independent farmers in the new world.
Their children will take equality more moderately
and more rationally, for they will enjoy some
advantages
of education, which their parents never had.
Florella's love and my own to you and yours.
The new house and its arrangements suit us
extremely
VOL. II. 12
well, and with some society such as we
could
select, would leave us little to desire as a
residence. I trust you are thinking seriously of a
flight across the lakes for a summer at least.
Yours ever,
T. Sibthorpe
.LETTER X.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
February
20.
I have
grown very lazy of late,so much so,
that even letter-writing has become quite a task.
Perhaps it is only that I so much prefer flying over
this fine, hard, smooth snow in a sleigh, that I feel a
chill of impatience at in-door employment. I make
a point of duty of Charlotte's daily lessons, but
beyond
that I am but idle just now. The weather
has been so excessively cold for some days that we
have had much ado to keep comfortably warm, even
with the aid of great stoves in the hall and kitchen,
and bountiful wood fires elsewhere. These wood
fires are the very image of abundance, and they are
so enlivening that I am becoming quite fond of
them, though they require much more attention than
coal, and will, occasionally, snap terribly, even to the
further side of the room, though the rug is generally
the sufferer. An infant of one of our neighbors was
badly burned, a day or two since, by a coal which
flew into the cradle at a great distance from the
fire. I marvel daily that destructive fires are not
more frequent, when I see beds surrounded with
light cotton curtains so near the immense fires
which are kept in log-houses. How much more
rational would be worsted hangings!
It is no uncommon thing to employ a horse to
bring in the back-log, and the fire is built in due
proportion to this foundation. I cannot describe to
you my astonishment, when I was sitting by a
sick woman, at seeing her husband coolly drive his
horse into the room; and I was scarcely less
surprised
when I saw the prodigious log which
followed
at no great distance, fastened in a great chain.
The animal seemed to understand his business
very well, and after he had backed the log into
a convenient position on the hearth, and felt
himself
free from it, he walked quietly out of the
back-door, which had been set open for his egress.
This sharp frost, though rather inconvenient at
home, makes fine sleighing. The sun shines
brightly, but seems to have no effect upon the
crackling snow. The runners whistle as they
skim over the smooth track, and the horses are as
much inspirited as we by the keen air and the
exciting rapidity of motion, so that they go like
winged creatures, their feet seeming scarcely to
touch the dazzling sheen. Of all the delightful
modes of conquering space, this is surely the most
delightful, and to me it has almost the charm of
novelty, for city sleighing, with its thousand
hinderances
and dangers, is but a poor attempt at such
a bewitching flight. Dancing has been called the
poetry of motion, but I think sleighing, in the true,
free, forest style, deserves that praise still better.
You should see one of our fine, tall, elastic young
woodsmen, in his close cap and trim costume, a
gay sash streaming behind him, standing in his
sleigh, and skimming along the path, holding the
reins with a careless natural grace, and seeming
scarce conscious that his fiery steeds are at full
speed, though the air is full of the sparkling
fragments
thrown up by their dashing hoofs. You
would find in the picture no inelegant
representation
of the car of Apollo with Phaeton for a
charioteer at the very least, though this last is all
too poor a comparison, since our youthful aspirants
might be trusted with the day-god's own team.
Oh! sleighing for me, beyond all the
exhilarating
devices that have ever yet sprung from man's
teeming brain. Railroad speed is so nullified by
the mechanical means necessary for its
production
,
that it is mere rambling dulness compared
with sleighing. And then the splendor of the
landscapeevery branch loaded with piled silver
every twig sheathed in crystaland earth's
broad bosom, covered with a mantle of immaculate
purity, inlaid throughout with diamond sparks that
dazzle the eye, which is yet fascinated by their
twinkling brilliancy.
Once lately we had a mingling of something
!else with the usual pleasurable excitement of a
sleigh-ride. We were going twenty miles or so to
dine with our friends the Cs, and for variety's
12*
sake tried a newly-opened road through the woods.
The sunlight was splendid, the way had been
well-enough
tracked, and we found the sleighing
excellent
,
and the shifting shadows of the overhanging
trees a very charming feature of the new route.
We had made perhaps half the distance, when
we met a prodigious saw-log,that is, the huge
trunk of a tree, drawn by oxen, on its way to the
mill. This great body enjoys royal privileges on
the highway, for it could not turn out without a
certainty of turning over;so, the track being but
single, ours was the task of finding a way through
the deep snow at the side of the road. To effect
this, our man and the other were obliged to plunge
in and make a path for the horses by buffeting and
trampling the snow as well as they could, a matter
of no small difficulty, as it was nearly breast-high
in some hollow places. Then the horses were led
forward through this devious track, plunging and
snorting, and showing no little reluctance to such
cold swimming; and at last landing us safely on
the road again, at the expense of a dip which nearly
overturned the sleigh. We were scarcely calmed
down after this excitement, when we met another
log, and had all the plunging, and tacking, and
dipping
,
over again, but still regained our track in
safety. I was beginning to confess that I was not
at all sorry that we had passed the saw-logs, when
another came in sight, and I begged to be allowed
to alight and make the passage afoot.
To this there were a thousand objections;I
should get very coldperhaps freeze my feet, and
certainly encounter a great deal of unnecessary
fatigue. I saw that Mr. Sibthorpe was very much
annoyed by my alarm, and our driver confidently
asserted that we were perfectly safe; so I thought
of my reputation, and crouching down in the very
bottom of the sleigh, submitted to my fate with
the best face I could command. Another log
passed, and yet another, and at length I ventured
to ask one of the men how many were behind, as
they seemed all of one party.
Why! I guess there an't more than a dozen
or so, said he. I would fain have turned back;
but in that case, we must either have repassed all
that had gone on, or have travelled at their snail's
pace; so I said nothing, but cried a little behind
my veil. By and by, we absolutely saw the last
one, and this being once ascertained, I took my
proper seat, and set about behaving like a lady
once more, though my nerves were more in a
flutter
than is becoming in a backwoodswoman. I
tried to laugh off the whole affair, and declared
that it would be pleasant to look back upon, as a
novelty in our woodland experience.
But what saith the sensible proverb, about not
exulting till you get out of the wood? I forget,
but I commend its practical bearing none the less.
We had scarcely a mile yet to go when we
encountered
an apparition yet more appalling than a
saw-logan immense herd of unruly cattle driven
by two or three men on horseback. No sooner
did I become sensible of the approach of this
tremendous
looking
cortge,
the drivers cracking their
whips and shouting wildly to preserve command
of their riotous charge, than my newly-built fabric
of fortitude crumbled into very dust, and I shrieked
and cried like a naughty baby. We had none the
less to go through the whole drove, and as they
went stumbling and plunging by, their feet were
often on a level with the top of our sleigh, as they
trod on the crusts of the high banks at the side of
the road; and although Mr. Sibthorpe and our
Phaeton stood up and kept them from absolutely
trampling on us, yet their too close neighborhood
and their fierce threatening aspect finished the
disgrace
of your poor friend. I remember nothing
more until I found myself stretched on the floor in
Mrs. C.'s parlor, with half the household engaged in
recalling my scattered wits. Tell it not, after all
my boasting; but make all the charitable
allowance
you can. * * *
We returned by the common road, you may be
sure. My high aspirings were completely
humbled
,
yet I did not the less enjoy the exquisite
moonlight by which we came home; but in spite
of past terrors, sang and laughed, and could, but for
very shame, have screamed like a child, in ecstasy
at the heavenly splendor of the scene.
Do not imagine I set Charlotte such a bad
example
as that of these riotous spirits that I describe
to you. She, dear child! was enjoying the ride in
her own way; lying fast asleep in her father's lap
all the way home.
Write oftener. I thirst for letters. If you had
ever spent a winter in the country, with frozen
lakes lying between you and the busy world, you
would need no urging, I am sure.
Yours in all affection,
F. S.LETTER XI.
Mrs. Sibthorpe to Mrs. Williamson.
April
22.
Once
more, with pen in hand, dearest
Catharine
;
and oh, how glad and how thankful to find
myself so well and so happy! I could have
written
you a week ago, but Mr. Sibthorpe, who is
indeed
a sad fidget, as I tell him every day, locked
up pen, ink, and paper, most despotically, leaving
me to grumble like Baron Trenck or any other
important prisoner. To-day the interdict is taken
off, and I must spur up my lagging thoughts, or I
shall not have said forth half my say before I shall
be reduced to my dormouse condition again.
I dare not begin with any other subject than the
boy, lest the writing materials should be locked up
for another month; but I shall leave all particulars
to your imagination, or to Mr. Sibthorpe's
indefatigable
pen.
I
see in the new comer only a very
hungry citizen, who bids fair to be robust enough
not to discredit his birthplace, and who already
claims the rule of the houserather prematurely,
as I think. He is well cared for, by a stout dame,
who has had abundant experience; and I interfere
very little with her management, being rather
occupied
in stealing lessons against the time when I may
very likely be obliged to take the sole care of him.
The spring has opened charmingly. The early
bulbs are all fully blown, and a beautiful perennial,
here called the Ohio bluebell, a far larger plant
than the one we know by that name;and the
flowering currant, a climbing shrub, already strung
with golden, clove-scented wreaths, looking at a
little distance like miniature laburnum. Some of
our neighbors have fruit-trees in blossom, and
currants
already formed, in distinct clusters. We must
wait a year or two for ours. The wheat has
already
taken the hue of the richest emeraldthe
most beautiful green indeed that it is possible to
conceive; and the grass is beginning to emulate it,
in spots where that has been improved by
cultivation
.
Wild grass does not spring so early, except
in moist situations. The cows have been picking
a little on the marshes, for a week or two past, but
the pastures near us are still rather brown.
The trees do not yet begin to wear the least
tinge of green, which rather disappoints me, as I
had always supposed they kept pace with the grass.
The fallows are silvered over with strawberry
blossoms
,
rich promise for June. The asparagus beds
of an old settler in the neighborhood have been in
cutting order for ten days or more.
So much for the country chronicle for April,
which I dare say will find you in deep deliberation
upon spring ribbons or the last light mantilla. My
preparations for enjoying spring have been a pair
of very stout shoes, water proof; and a great
bonnet
braided of oat-straw by a good lady of my
neighbors. These, with a pair of indescribable
gloves, will furnish me forth for public appearance
for some time to come.
I wish you could have been here this morning,
when I had a visit from an old woman who is my
adviser in perilous emergencies, such as the
contumacious
refusal of a turkey hen to sit still on
her eggs, or the obstinacy of a caldron of soap,
refusing
to come, and so justifying the opinion of
some ingenious philologist that the term
soap
is a
contraction of so hap, betokening the uncertainty
attending the manufacture. This good dame
dabbles
in half the circle of sciences, and when I ask
for information on any particular point, I always
get a vast deal of gratuitous information. This
morning the matter in hand was Charlotte's wrist,
which she scraped badly in falling out of her swing
a day or two ago. The place looked so angry this
morning that I sent for old Mrs. Lettsom in her
surgical capacity.
Land o' Goshen! said the good woman,
holding
up both her hands, when Charlotte, with doleful
eyes, unwrapped her arm, why, that does look
perfectly awful! I never see sich a one but once
since I was born, and that was Miss Taylor's, and
she came nigh hevin' to hev' her hand took off!
Charlotte looked at me, perfectly aghast, and
began to cry sadly.
Law me! said Mrs. Lettsom, don't you be
scar't!
I
can cure ye!
I've
cured worse things than
that. I cured Miss Taylor's, quick as wink! Jist
smash up everlastin'; and lay on a good mess of it,
and it'll get the information out on't like
witch-craft
!
This sounds like a stupendous operation, but a
little inquiry brought to light the true nature of
Mrs. Lettsom's everlastin', which is only a soft
cooling herb much cultivated in these regions.
This being disposed of, I had the usual
discursive
lecture.
That everlastin', said the good woman, is a
prime thing to wrap up the axe in, after you've
cut yourself a choppin'. As long as that keeps
moist, the wound'll keep cool and easy. The bees
knows the good of it, for when they've been a
fightin', you'll always see 'em a huntin' for
everlastin'
,
if there is any, and they go and get it for to
heal 'em up. But bees is dreadful knowin'
critters
!
They understand what you say jist as well
as any body. If there's any body dies in the house,
they'll all go away if you don't take no notice on
'em; but if you go and talk to 'em, and tell 'em
that sich a one is dead, (calling him by name,) and
hang a black cloth over the hive, and tell the bees
if they'll stay you'll do well by 'em, why, they'll
stay, and go to work peaceable. And if there's
dissension in a house, the hives ought to be set a
great way off, down in the garden, so that the bees
can't hear what is said. There was the Johnsons
VOL II. 13
down in Austerlitz; there was a division in their
family, and the bees began to grow dreadful uneasy,
and hardly made any honey; but by-'n-by, one
day, Johnson gin' his wife a whippin', and the bees
all flew away. And, any how, bees won't never
thrive well unless you talk with 'em; you must
take your knittin' work and go and sit by 'em, and
tell 'em things, and talk about the neighbors and
sich, or they'll get lonesome and discouraged, and
your honey'll be all bee-bread. Now, honey is
one o' the best things you can have in your family,
for it's good sweetnin' for any thingcake or
coffee, or any thing. You take a table-spoonful
of coffee to five quarts of water, and sweeten it well
with honey, and bile it about an hour, and it'll be
as good coffee as any body need to wish to drink.
To be sure it gives some folks the corry-mobbley,
but I know how to cure that, jist as easy! Take
and stew angle-worms, and spread a plaster on 'em,
and lay it on your stomick, and drink red-pepper
tea bilin' hot, and see how quick the pain'll leave
ye!
But here comes my master with a brow of
ominous
anxiety; so I must break off my gossip for
today
,
though I feel I shall forget before to-morrow
sundry recipes with which I meant to have enriched
your collection.
April
24.
* * * What do I hear, my dear Catharine?
are you really serious in your idea of going abroad?
Oh, how that will break in upon my pleasant
dreams! To say nothing of my hope of visiting
the city before a great while, the very landscape
looks distasteful to me when I think that you are
not to gaze upon it with me for these three years
at least! I know I ought not to complain, but I
must lament my sad disappointment. This world's
course is so full of uncertainty, that a three years'
separation is a serious matter, since it makes
reunion
hardly a thing to be depended upon. You
think it will benefit your children, and so it may,
doubtless, in many respects; but if they are to live
in America, would it not be better to bring them
up here? I think I have not observed among
those Americans who were sent abroad for their
early
education, very favorable results. But these
are selfish views perhaps. I am not a good judge
when the question under discussion involves a
separation
from you. * * * * Do you know, I
never sing our dear old song, Love not, without
such tender recollections that I have learned to
reserve it for the lonely hour when I can indulge
my reminiscences without witness? You remember
it, dearest Kate, do you not? or has the stream of
new music swept it away? Love not! love not!
the thing you love may change! We never
thought of the timid cautionand why should
we? Sing it for my sake, and keep it sacred, as I
do, till we meet again. Oh! must it be so
long? * * * *Letter
Boston,
May 5, 1835.
Sir,
I have examined the sheets you put into my hands, and am happy to say, that I
think your work will be found, both by teachers and pupils a valuable auxiliary
in the acquisition of the French language. The manner in which you have
obviated the principal difficulties in the first lessons, and the general plan of the
work, make it a very useful first book for those who are old enough to study with
some degree of judgment and discrimination.
Very respectfully, yours,
T. B. HAYWARD.
Mons. Bugard
.Letter
Temple-place,
May 6, 1835.
Dear Sir,
I have examined the sheets of the New Practical Translator, and believe that
the work will be very useful as an introduction to the translating French into
English, as it affords an easy explanation of most of the difficulties that are apt to
embarrass beginners.
Yours, respectfully,
GEO. B. EMERSON.
Mons. Bugard
.Letter
Boston,
May 8th, 1835
Dear Sir,
I have long felt the want of a First Book for beginners in the French
Language
,
upon the progressive principles which you have adopted, and shall show
how sincere I am in this recommendation of your undertaking, by the immediate
introduction of the New Practical Translator into my school.
Respectfully yours,
GEORGE FOWLE,
Teacher of the Boy's Monitorial School.
Mons. Bugard
.Letter
Boston,
May 8th, 1835.
Sir,
I have looked over the sheets of your New Practical Translator, and am
much pleased both with the plan of the work, and with the style of its execution.
It must form a valuable accession to the means already within the reach of the
young for acquiring a knowledge of the French Language; and, if it finds with
the public that measure of favour which it merits, I am satisfied that you will
have no cause to complain that your labours, in this department of instruction,
have not been well received or well rewarded.
Very respectfully, yrs.
JOHN PIERPONT.
Mons. Bugard
.Letter
Boston,
May 11, 1835.
Dear Sir,
I have examined attentively the plan of your New Practical Translator, and,
to some extent, the mode in which the plan has been executed. The work appears
to me to be well adapted to promote the improvement of those who are
commencing
the study of the French Language. The real difficulties, in the progress of
the student, he is furnished with the means of overcoming, while such as will
yield to moderate industry, he is judiciously left to surmount by his own efforts.
Very respectfully, your friend,
E. A. ANDREWS.
Mons. B. F. Bugard
.Letter
Brown University,
May 11th, 1835.
I have examined, with care, The New Practical Translator, by Mr. Bugard.
The plan and execution of the author appear to me judicious, and I am acquainted
with no elementary work, so well adapted for communicating a knowledge of the
French language.
ROMEO ELTON,
Prof. of the Latin and Greek Languages and Literature.Letter
May 13th, 1835.
Dear Sir,
I have examined with much pleasure the sheets of the French Practical
Translator
,
which you were kind enough to send me. As far as I am able to judge, I
should think it would be found a very useful auxiliary to the French instructer. I
concur fully in the opinion of the work, expressed by Mr. T. B. Hayward.
Very respectfully, your obdt. servant,
F. P. LEVERETT.
Mons. B. F. Bugard
.Letter
Mons. B. F.
Bugard,
Sir
It gives me much pleasure to express the high opinion I entertain of the
New French Practical Translator, as an introduction to the study of the French
language. The plan of it is very judicious. While those difficulties are removed
which perplex and discourage young learners, it demands sufficient exercise of the
pupil's own powers to keep alive the interest arising from the consciousness of
successful effort.
Very respectfully, yours,
JOS. HALE ABBOT.
Mount Vernon Street,
Oct. 20, 1835.Letter
School for Moral Discipline,
Oct. 28th, 1835.
My Dear Sir,
I should be happy if I could from my own knowledge give you a
recommendation
of your book, the Practical Translator. But, from my own little knowledge
and from the most thorough information I can obtain, I am satisfied that we have
no so valuable book of its kind for the study of the French language, and have
therefore introduced it into my school.
I am, dear sir, very respectfully, your friend,
E. M. P. WELLS.
Mons. B. F. Bugard
.Letter
Jamaica Plain,
Nov. 21st, 1835.
Dear Sir,
I have examined with much pleasure the new French Practical Translator,
which you were so kind as to send me. I consider it a very valuable book for
beginners
,
as it removes many difficulties, which have heretofore embarrassed them.
I shall immediately introduce it into my school.
Very respectfully yours,
STEPHEN M. WELD.
Mons. B. F. Bugard
.Letter
Salem Classical School
.
Salem,
Dec. 5th, 1835.
Mons. B. F.
Bugard,
Dear Sir,
It gives me great pleasure to add my testimonial in favour of your
New Practical Translator, to the many you have already received. I have
used the work with a great many pupils in this institution, and find it a very
excellent
and interesting manual. It is of great service in removing the difficulties
which beginners encounter at the commencement of their French Studies. I wish
you much success in introducing it into our Schools and Academies.
Truly yr. friend,
H. K. OLIVER.